
                   Excellent teacher
                
                   Any professor that says to wait to asks questions till the end of the class is not a good teacher. Was not interested in the students, could care less if you passed or failed. If you get a 69.9 it is a D in his book, WT really needs new chem professors.
                
                   This professor was great, he taught me so much and his class was'nt too difficult. His curves are really nice, and if you study you will make over a 100.
                
                   This guy will put you to sleep, then his tests are the only grade no fall-back cushion grades at all, just the 4 super ridiculous hard tests.
                
                   Class was hard and boring. Didn't particularly like him. Did grade on a big curve though.
                
                   Great professor concepts are very easy just go to class
                
                   i am just coming back to school after a 3 year lay off.  i have not missed a class and have a very high grade. do the problems in the back to be successful. he is a great guy!
                
                   My &quot;C&quot; was due to factors that had nothing to do with the instructor.  His tests are the toughest I've ever faced, but he grades on a humongous curve.  I liked him.  He's strange, but in a likable way.  He's Albert Einstein with combed hair.
                
                   He is a very nice guy. Class is kind of hard but not impossible to pass. Requires you to study (not a blow off class that you can just not show up to) I found it helpful to work ex problems in the book at the end of chapters and read when things weren't so clear.
                
                   Really cool teacher!
                
                   He is great!
                
                   I had Dr. Carlisle for both second semester general chemistry and inorganic chemistry.  He is always willing to help his sutdents!!!  If you lack the necessary mathematicals skills for chemistry, his classes will be very difficult for you.  But don't blame him for your lack of pre-requisite skills!
                
                   very hard to learn from. I had to get a tutor and did better on the tests after I was getting tutored. I didn't even come to the last 2 weeks of class and learned more. Nice guy but bad teacher.
                
                   Carlisle does not explain anything well in Chemistry II and if you ask him a question he make you feel dumb.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Pretty easy. 5 question tests, with the formulas written on the board. Cookbook type stuff.
                
                   The book he wrote is a must! It helps greatly and has practice problems for each chapter. I couldn't have done so well without it. Overall his class is very enjoyable and he is always willing to help you. 
                
                   The class is vigorous and tough, but if you do the "recommend" homework and go to class, you will pass. He is also very helpful and available when you are having problems or need extra help. He wants his students to be successful.
                
                   Took Dr. Khan for Chemistry II (1412) during the SUMMER. the course material was very difficult but he explained everything very well! great lectures, cool guy! but there's only 3 tests and  the 3rd test counts 50% of the grade. you get the grade you work for. again this is his SUMMER course. he may be different during semesters. 
                
                   Get ready to study for exams a week ahead!! He does his best to help you understand the subject, but let's face it; chemistry is hard in general. Oh yeah, test are worth about 30 percent, final 60 percent, and 10 percent in class participation. (I think, I can't remember at the moment, but its very similar) Make sure to get his BOOK, its a must!!!
                
                   Chem in general isn't easy so don't expect to skip class and pass. He recommends you to buy his book which helps in the long run and has past test examples. Speak up if you have questions and he will answer them. 
                
                   It's not that he's a bad prof, but Chemistry is just a hard subject. His self-written book is super helpful and he's a pretty funny guy. He knows what he's talking about (unlike most) and will help you whenever he can. The curves on the tests are nice (10-20 points). People who fail his class usually don't show up or don't study. 
                
                   He is a good professor. The criteria is tough and he is wiling to help you as long as you go to him and ask for it.  Has a book to go along with his lecture which is quite helpful and doesn't make the class drag.  The main downside is that the only grades are test grades, so there's no extra fluff to help your overall grade. Must work hard in class
                
                   Wow! Mixed reviews. I got a B, but was close to an A (95 going into the final). I could have done several things differently. If it is in his book, you must know it - understand it & memorize it. Some exam questions were copies to the practice ones, but with 1-2 slight changes, so be careful. I did not get the grade I wanted, but that's on me.
                
                   I agree with the last post, I personally know that this class was hard, and some exam questions I didn't think was right.  But with the curves etc., you should be fine.  He is fair.  One thing that I do agree with, is buy his book!!!  I got an A in the course, but would not have without the book!!! 
                
                   Thanks Dr. K.!!!  You're the best!!!
                
                   Khan's class is not just about learning the concepts and memorizing what needs memorizing - you need to memorize his exact words.  Buy the supplemental book - it's full of his slides with fill-in-the-blanks.  All he does in lecture is read the slides.  Tests are really tricky.
                
                   Tough and confusing tests,  he uses  the a-j scantron - which sucks since they're your whole class grade.  Be prepared for trick questions. And the final is worth 50% of your grade. I wouldn't take another class with him. 
                
                   It doesn't matter if you like him or not - he's so in love with himself that  other people's opinions are irrelevant.  Your Biochem grade is 3, multiple choice exams (including the final) and the final is worth 50%.   He is intentionally tricky - puts incorrect structures and misspellings as options.  Buy the supplement book and study it. 
                
                   I'm a nursing major so passing Chemistry basically determines if you get into the nursing program. Overall, Dr. Khan is one of the BEST professors I've ever had! He knows what he's talking about and is totally open to helping you out. But, you have to study or you'll definitely fail. It's not easy, but if you study, it can be. 
                
                   I had Chem II and Biochem I with Dr. Khan.  Exams are multiple choice.  BEWARE on exams - he will intentionally provide incorrect answers with misspellings and incorrect structures.  He was great in Chem II, but seemed to have more of an attitude during Biochem.  Would I take another course with him?  I'll look into other options first.
                
                   Great guy. The semester I took was the first to get his book. SOOO helpful I think it was $40 but worth every penny. After tests make sure to go to office and look at it. Questions from other tests are similar to final.
                
                   Great professor. Challenges students during lecture and on exams.  If you can pass Organic I and II with an A or B at WTAMU then this class is not that difficult.  Lots of information to memorize, and solid study habits are a must.  I spent 20+ hours preparing for each exam, and the final was cumulative.
                
                   Class is tough, tests are surprisingly tricky.  It's a fun subject though, and he knows what he's talking about.
                
                   to hard!!!!!  Boring!!
                
                   I don?t know?I did really well on his final.  I liked his class and thought he was very helpful.  True?he?s tough and you have to do the homework, but welcome to college!!!  Plus, he is not hard to look at first thing monday morning!!
                
                   He teaches from a slide show and sounds like he is questioning what he is saying. When some people ask questions, most of the time he has to say he will get back to them because he doesn't know. There is hardly any homework, but it is sometimes hard because he doesn't go through examples in class.
                
                   Dr. Tao, aside from his accent, is a pretty easier teacher. yes you have to work for your grade and do the homework but he is willing to help you. it can be hard to focus in his class though
                
                   Great Guy!
                
                   Great Guy!!  Very smart!!  Best Professor in this department!!!
                
                   Difficult to understand in the beginning, but once youâ??re in the class for more than a month... Best part is he helps you with in class quizzes and hw if you ask
                
                   It is really to understand.
                
                   Dr.Tao is the bomb!  I took him for chem 1411 and 1412 during the summer and the class was not that tough.  Why&#63; Because I did the homework, attended class, and studied for tests.  Office hours are helpful, and Dr.Tao is always available after class for any clarification.  For the people who say Dr.Tao is laughing at them, please understand that he
                
                   For his Chem 2 class he improved his teaching method by placing the quizzes intermittently through the class period,we were more attentive so everyone did much better. He strongly encourages you refresh your own math, but will certainly help if you stay up with the course work. Go to class, do the homework early, you can do it!
                
                   really hard to understand. Must do the homework and quizzes. only 2 tests that are worth more then half your grade so if you fail just one your kinda screwed. he wasn't that helpful and when you would ask a question he would most the time just laugh at you. would not suggest to anyone
                
                   Understand that this is a SELF TAUGHT COURSE. You have to read the book before class and do the homework early if you want to do really excellent. I hated the quizzes because there was never enough time for me because I am slow and kept trying to learn from the lecture rather than the book. Yes, he is hard to understand, so sit at the front if you 
                
                   If you could understand him you were doing great. When I asked for help, he laughed at me. Daily quizes are done by a remote you buy at the bookstore (if you have the money). HW was online. Basically, you either do really well or fail.
                
                   His English is not the best, but after a while you can understand him better if you go to class and listen.  I took Carlisle for Chem 1 and barely squeaked by with a C, so I swapped to Tao and now I have an A
                
                   I thoroughly believe that I might have a different opinion of him if he would stop with the daily quizzes, and slow down his lectures. His accent would be difficult enough to decipher at a normal pace, much less the cheetah-like speed at which he talks. Definitely not conducive to learning a difficult subject like chemistry.
                
                   Very bad.
                
                   very awesome teacher!!! love the class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Bethel is a great professor that is always willing to help! Lectures are definitely a must and he gives homework through OWLs that are actually really helpful when studying for his exams. He's overall an amazing professor that I would take again without a doubt.
                
                   I suck at Chem but this was a hard class. Bethel is willing to help if you go to his office hours. His lectures are clear cut but I feel like the exams are harder than the hw. Also, a lot of HW! The SI didn't really help me. I just did a lot of practice problems to prepare for the exam. More math problems than concept questions on the exam.
                
                   Bethel was a good prof. He is helpful during office hours. I bought the book, but I think I only opened it a few times. He has clicker questions during class which count as a part of your grade so going to class is important. Lots of online homework each week. The tests seemed really hard to me. I went to A plus and pulled through.
                
                   He was an amazing professor! He clearly knew what he was talking about, and made lectures fun and interactive. The examples given were extremely relevant when it came to homework and tests. I didn't even take the seal off of my textbook (that's how great his notes were!). Tests were more difficult than the practice given, but definitely doable!
                
                   Very helpful and makes class a little more interesting with his dry humor.  If you go to his office hours it helps a bunch!
                
                   Dr. Bethel was my favorite professor. Hilarious dude and always super helpful in office hours. He ended up being very willing to curve grades for those who attended office hours regularly and worked hard. Would definitely take him again for Chem 102
                
                   I have a crappy high school science background so this class was tough. You have tons of homework. If I hadn't gone to tutoring (4.0 & Go is great), I would have definitely failed. SI sessions sucked, total waste of time. Bethel is pretty hilarious, if you love corny science jokes, which I do. I never went to office hours and don't regret it.
                
                   Bethel is a great professor and wants people to share his weird love for chemistry. He is a goofball which makes class somewhat enjoyable. Go to class because there are always clicker questions for a grade and he does examples just like what is on tests. Tests are tough and he's a tough grader. Lots of homework but actually is beneficial.
                
                   Overall, he is a great professor. Test are very hard, and you must pay attention in class to understand the material. Gives HW, but it helps you understand the material better. If you put in a lot of effort then you can get good grades, if you don't then you won't. Didn't really need textbook. Clicker questions are used for attendance.
                
                   Dr. Bethel is a very good professor. However, his tests can be very difficult and hard to complete within the 50 min class time. There is A TON of homework  but it really helps your grade out. Definitely go to A + tutoring, as they give you old test questions and Dr. Bethel's examples in class are sometimes simple compared to what is on the test.
                
                   He's an amazing teacher! I didn't read the textbook because he never tests over something he hasn't lectured, so DON'T skip class.  Clicker questions are really easy and a nice grade booster.  He's always available for office hours, but I never went because OWL kind of helped me understand all of the concepts.  
                
                   Dr. Bethel can go a little fast, but he posts notes online so you can always go back to them. He does lots of examples in class, but be prepared to do a LOT of homework to learn the material. Tests can be tough and tricky, he gets test questions from practice OWLS in the adaptive study tools section, so do a bunch of those to help study!!!!
                
                   Dr. Bethel is a great teacher. He has a specific system of clicker questions and weekly homework that force you to learn the material and he gives lots of examples so it is easy to understand the material. 
                
                   Dr. Bethel is a very intelligent man and has a hard time breaking chemistry down to  a more learning basis. If you do not have a strong chemistry background, I would not take him. A+ Tutoring Center helps a lot. 
                
                   Bethel is a really nice guy, but a really hard prof. He flies through lectures, gives tons of HW and his test are full of tricks. But that said he is the second-best chem prof. He is super helpful in office hours, literally will sit and do hw with you. Just be prepared to have to do A LOT outside of class to learn the material. 
                
                   He explains everything clearly in class, if you pay attention you will be able to complete the class easily
                
                   Dr. Bethel's lectures, although clear, were some what confusing. I highly recommend A+ tutoring or 4.0 and Go, before even taking the first exam. I went to 4.0 and Go and they helped out a lot with the confusing lessons. Always go to class for clicker questions, even though he is monotone and tries to be funny. And don't procrastinate on OWLs.
                
                   Though chemistry is a tough subject, Bethel is ready to help. I've gone to countless office hours and I have an A in the class. I really love his module set up of teaching (they're powerpoints). He posts them online and I take my notes on them during class. Very helpful for studying!! The tests are 20 questions and pretty easy if you review. 
                
                   Dr. Bethel is a pretty nice professor. His tests are hard but any chemistry test is going to be hard. I went to aplus for tutoring. He gives OWL homework that can be long at times but its easy and helps a lot if you really try on them. He's always open for questions and he doesn't make you feel dumb for asking. 
                
                   Descent prof, approachable, honestly not that funny or vibrant (occasionally he'll crack a joke). The lectures can be long and tedious & could sometimes put me to sleep. The tests are difficult, I recommend going to 4.0& go; they help break down the material that Bethel speeds through! Either way it's a hard course & there are worse profs to have. 
                
                   Dr. Bergbreiter is the best professor I have taken at Texas A&M. He is absolutely brilliant, and a fantastic teacher. He really cares about whether his students pass or fail, and puts a lot of time outside of class into helping his students learn. It is by no means easy, but he is the best Ochem prof out there.
                
                   He is best prof I have had, but if you are just looking for an A in organic go elsewhere. I probably could've had an easy A taking another class, but I worked hard for my B in the class and I don't regret it because I learned so much. He is so incredibly helpful and he devotes so much time to be around to answer homework questions late at night.
                
                   Very difficult course, but worth the hard work because you actually learn the material.  He is always willing to go above and beyond, and will give you as much help as you ask for.  I took him for both semesters of organic chemistry, even though I knew I could probably make a better grade with an easier professor.
                
                   Very nice to undergrads, very mean to grad students.  Looks like a cross between mortician and homeless person.  Very, very, intellegent.  Breadth and scope of his chemical knowledge and intuition is truely astonishing.  Not very creative as far as research direction, also stifles creativity of graduate students working for him.  If you wourk for him you WILL be his ****, this is both bad (obviously) and good.  He is feared/reveared not only by students but also by most faculty and is very protective.
                
                   I had him for Organic I and II and Polymer Chemistry.  Pros:  He's a great lecturer, he really knows his stuff, and he's pretty funny.   He forces you to actually understand the material, rather than just memorize it and then regurgitate in on the exam.  Cons:  He can be rude, pompous, and has personal hygene issues.
                
                   This guy hands down knows how to teach. I only had taken chemistry at the sophomore level (that's required by the state) in high school and had no opportunity for AP Chemistry. I walked through this class and it's because of how easy he makes it. He forces you to learn the processes of what's happening, not memorizing. Easily my favorite professor.
                
                   Larry Brown was very nice and passionate about his subject however I wouldn't retake his class for Chemistry. Who knows maybe if he somehow switches to a subject I enjoy more I would retake his class but overall Chem teachers my friends has were much easier if you're just trying to pass. Nice guy, hard class.
                
                   Tough Class. Tests are fully write out, class is basically just another math class.
                
                   I always enjoyed his class, but definitely need to spend more time studying for his tests than some other professors. He has a lot of resources online (notes, previous tests) that are useful to look over. His office hours are also super helpful, and I visited him several times. He grades tough but its doable... just be prepared to study hard!
                
                   Dr. Brown's class is extremely hard. All his tests are write out, no multiple choice. He'll help you during office hours, but unless you're a chem god you'll probably need to go to tutoring.  I personally would not recommend his class.
                
                   Best Chem 107 prof 
                
                   Tough tests, he wrote the textbook so you actually have to read it. Class is mostly math based.
                
                   Has a real passion for chemistry and knows how to teach. Homework for the class is pretty math heavy, but the exams are not. Exams are like puzzles that you have to get used to. Concepts in lectures were pretty easy to understand but I read the book before hand, so I would recommend that.
                
                   Very hard class, the lab is even harder
                
                   Dr. Brown is very enthusiastic about his class! If you aren't so great in chemistry expect the extra help but his exams are pretty predictable on what he will ask because he gives you previous exams. Take him! He's great! Chemistry is tough in general but in my opinion he's the best professor
                
                   Dr. Brown is a great professor. His joy for chemistry is clear as soon as you walk into class. Although his class is hard, it's fair. Dr. Brown loves helping students understand chemistry better and is easy to talk to. If you work, you'll get an A.
                
                   This class is so hard..... 
                
                   Larry is awesome. He wrote the book so he knows what's up and how to explain it. His tests aren't that bad but you have to study for them, he gives you past exams so do all of them and you should be fine. He does some experiments in class that are super cool. Find a study group, do the homework, go to class, take notes, etc. You got this!
                
                   If you put forth effort you can pass this class
                
                   Brown is awesome! The homework is online, fairly easy, and even comes with hints when you get stuck. Definitely the professor you want if chemistry isn't your strong suit. 
                
                   Dr. Brown is a fast-talking and fascinating man. He loves what he teaches, but that doesn't mean he'll give out easy grades. Go to office hours, do problems from the back of the book, and some outside tutoring wouldn't hurt. Great professor.
                
                   Definitely my favorite professor this semester. He goes into enough detail for you to understand. If I was confused, I read the book. You can get the 2nd edition for dirt cheap nearby. You have to know the material for the test. He was always there to answer my questions and help me understand more. Get him, he's great.
                
                   Dr. Brown is a amazing professors. His class wasn't one of the easiest, I must admit, but it's college, you have to put an effort to succeed. He enjoys teaching. Jokes a lot. His tests are challenging, but closer to the end of the semester, I was able to solve problems with my eyes closed. 
                
                   Prepare to study your heart out. Dr. Brown is an amazing professor, but his exams are hard. He's willing to go over homework and exam questions during office hours, which is great, but I would really suggest doing  the additional problems at the back of each chapter, since some of the exam questions come from there. 
                
                   The information for the course starts off not bad but gets harder as the semester progresses. All tests are manageable and he sticks to the same format as the past exams. Best way to study is to actually try to understand how to do problems instead of just learning how to because if you don't actually understand, the tests will be very hard. 
                
                   nice guy, good looking
                
                   speaks english, really smart guy. cracks jokes sometimes but can have sarcastic sense of humor.  owls and a+ help a lot. all exams were multiple choice.
                
                   Very clear about what will be on exam, tries to help students out a lot, go talk to him and let him recognize your face, makes SI taught by him before the test, go to those, usually have the test questions on their somewhat with different numbers. Great professor with strong accent that takes some getting used to, had for CHEM-101 and also did well
                
                   Strong accent, but you get used to it. Uses the book alot for questions during lecture and for review. Doesn't assign many OWLS. No clicker. Takes questions from lecture and changes numbers for exams. 4 midterms and a final. 45 minutes for each midterm and then lecture for the remaining class time. ~10 MC problems(5pts) and 2 workout(20pts)
                
                   Great prof. Stay in class and pay attention for the first two weeks and you won't notice the accent anymore. His slides are extremely clear and are posted online. Very sweet and easy to learn from. Highly recommend!!!
                
                   His accent was hard to understand but after awhile you get used to it. His were hard and his TA was mean. Honestly I found it hard to go to class since it wasn't mandatory. Just study really really hard.
                
                   He can be a little unclear at times and his tests are constantly changing. He removed the curve that he previously added to our grades and told us about it during the final review. Don't expect a curve, study hard and you'll do fine.
                
                   I took AP chem in high school and found his class very easy. hardly ever went to class (lost clicker points...) and still made an A. He has an accent and its hard to get used to but he genuinely wants his students to get a good grade.
                
                   great prof
                
                   Great prof! Very enjoyable and helpful. Tests are hard, but you will do well if you study and attend the lectures and the reviews.
                
                   He is a great prof! He is very hard to understand due to his thick accent but is so enjoyable. If you do the practice problems at the end of the chapter, go to his test reviews, finish the owls, and take the clicker question its an easy A. Also if you need help he loves trying to explain it to students and will go out of his way. GREAT PROF!
                
                   Good teacher but ill take time to get used to his accent
                
                   Great Professor! Loved Him!! Very funny and really wants his students to succeed! Tests are fair just practice online homework that he assigns! I Would highly recommend!
                
                   His tests are really hard because they're all free response. If you've had AP Chem prior to his class, you'll be fine. I didn't take AP Chem and it was hard to understand him. He's really nice though, and will help you.
                
                   GO TO OFFICE HOURS. I benefited in his class because I attended office hours and was active in class. Class is mandatory because he has clicker questions and because without it, the material would be near impossible to learn. I sat front row and he learned my name and gave me great help preparing for tests. Awesome guy.
                
                   He does clicker questions. Seriously wants you to pass his class and helps often. A little goofy but overall he's not that bad. Very vigorous course.
                
                   His exams are almost exactly like the old ones.  As long as you UNDERSTAND the old exam, you'll get an A.
                
                   If you study the old tests you will be fine.
                
                   very goofy guy.  likes to tell stories about himself and his wife making out.
                
                   Nice guy but interrupts your train of thought by telling lame stories in the middle of sometihing you're trying to understand. Not very helpful when you ask a question... I like the class though.
                
                   Nice enough guy, but a little weird. Might stop in the middle of a long chem problem to tell a story about baling hay fifty years ago.
                
                   Dr. Collins ruined my first semester at Texas A&M, I literally was depressed because of this class, I went to A plus and, all the SI sessions and attended class every day and I had to end up Q dropping his class. For all the upcoming freshman DO NOT TAKE COLLINS!! He is teaching some upper-level madness at a tremendous speed. I cried a lot.
                
                   Great Professor, knows what he's doing, class itself is hard, but I'd rather have him than any other professor, he knows and is passionate about teaching chem.  107
                
                   Cool guy just give him a chance the class is hard but putting yourself in a state of mind that you aren't going to pass or that your teacher is hard isn't going to help your case.
                
                   His tests are reasonable and have no curves. However, he curves the final grades. He only had six clicker quizzes throughout a semester, which if you miss one, it won't be counted. The problems on ALEKS aren't really helpful to prepare for tests, I would recommend reading the textbooks. He is funny and nice, but his office hours are always packed.
                
                   This is chemistry!  Do not expect it to be easy!  Read your text, pay attention in lecture, and do your homework!  It amazes me that students are complaining about a professor that knows the material, teaches the material, and tests on the material he teaches.  Put in the effort or change your major!
                
                   Dr. Collins is an amazing chem professor!  A lot of people are saying that you have to have taken AP chem to pass his class.  I did not take AP chem, in fact I hated chemistry in high school.  Dr. Collins totally changed my perspective and helped me learn and enjoy what I was doing.  I would give anything to have him as a chem professor again!
                
                   Though not the best prof to take, he at least fully understands the material he's teaching. He has a tendency to move way too fast and acts like everyone is on the same page. His tests are harder than other chemistry professors', so be prepared to use any resources you can. For me, 4.0 & GO saved me during finals. Not the best, nor the worst.
                
                   Dr. Collins was an amazing professor. Although I have to admit I hated him at first, his class grew on me. His tests correlate exactly with the notes and the book. Read the book and take good notes and you will be fine. He likes to trick you on some test questions but overall he was a great prof and I would definitely take him again.
                
                   Hardest class I had all semester. I ended up having to drop by midterms, but continued to attend lecture to get the material. (After all, I paid for the class) Dr. Collins is (sometimes) funny, is passionate about chem, & pushes you harder than you've ever been pushed. If you're ready for a challenge, go for it. If not, I would choose someone else.
                
                   Don't ever take this man. He gives terrible jokes to get you throughout the day. His tests don't match up to the material he tells you to study and especially not the book.  25 question tests and stupid random bonus questions. He was new so I didn't find any reviews on him otherwise I wouldn't have wasted my time. TRUST ME, DON'T DO IT
                
                   Dr. Collins CHEM101 is tuff. It is a weed out class and can be very time consuming. It took for me to study four days in order to get a C in the final to barely pass the class. It is certainly do-able but don't expect a walk in the park.
                
                   If you're looking for an easy A you're not going to find it here. While I didn't agree with all of his teaching methods, they were still effective. All of his tests were fair since stuff he couldn't teach during class was taught in the homework. ALEKS is the bane of my existence, but its still better than OWLs.
                
                   This class was beyond hard. I went to tutoring sometimes 4x a week and the ALEKS took up more time than any other homework I had. Collins is very condescending and expects too much of a chem background from his students. Tests are not fair and he does not curve at all. Cracks too many jokes during lectures. Many tears were shed on my behalf.
                
                   Do not take Collins if you can avoid it. He's a very interesting guy with a lot of passion for chemistry but his tests are hard and he does things a lot differently than the other profs. He didn't curve any tests but did end up curving the class at the end (much to our surprise). His online homework is ridiculously time consuming. Struggled for B
                
                   Honestly, if you can avoid him then do it. The homework takes forever and this would be fine if the homework actually helped, but it doesn't! It's just a bunch of busy work that takes away from actual studying time. His lectures are too fast and confusing. He also requires you to memorize all the formulas and constants where other profs give it.
                
                   STAY AWAY FROM HIM SERIOUSLY HARDEST CLASS I HAVE EVER TAKEN his lectures do not prepare you for the exams S T A Y  A W A Y
                
                   Just don't take him, unless he's literally your last option.
                
                   Makes you memorize every formula throughout the year. Not there to help you.
                
                   Dr. Collins is THE WORST professor I have ever had at TAMU. His exams do not cover what he lectures about and is very degrading when students ask him questions. He gives way too much homework and says that when our test averages are failing that "we need to work harder". DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF!!
                
                   He is going to tell you that a C is average. He isn't lying. If you want an A expect to study your butt off. The ALEKS homework is so tedious, and time consuming. The tests are hard and purposely try to trick you and give you no room to work out the problems.  BUT Dr. C does try to teach. If you attend lectures you will learn something!
                
                   Don was awesome, he has a tendency to get off topic sometimes but he loves to teach and he loves his students and the most he wants is to see everyone do well. He is my favorite professor of all time.
                
                   Cares deeply about his subject. Tests are fair and while not easy, typically have a very nice curve. Occasionally will start to ramble into areas beyond the scope of the class, but is still quite interesting. Highly recommend taking this class, but only if you've had AP chem before.
                
                   Dempsey's lectures were very scattered and confusing. With the curve added at the end of the class I was able to get an A, but I had the lowest possible score for an A. The one thing that I owe this grade to is A+ Tutoring. Ali is the chemistry guy there and he is AMAZING. Definitely recommend getting the season pass if you're taking Dempsey. 
                
                   Dr. Dempsey is not the best teacher. None of his students, including me, understand what he is talking about during lecture. Test averages were really low (40s). Barely has a curve even with the horrible test grades!
                
                   I would NOT recommend this professor to even my worst enemy. This guy doesn't know what he does in class. The only way you will learn is by teaching yourself from the OWL problems or textbook. Test averages are LOW (around 40-50s). He does a very slight curve which is most of time not sufficient to give you a good grade in the class. DON'T take him
                
                   His lectures were pretty boring but the tests were pretty easy and the class averages are always high. 
                
                   I had taken Chemistry in High School, so I knew what to expect coming in to class, this is a hard class and you have to be prepared to work for it, that said he did post his old tests before hand and the ones in class were almost identical to them, so the tests weren't too bad if you looked over them, he also curved the class a lot, almost 6 points
                
                   I am awful at chemistry and he does not lecture very well. He gives a lot of OWLs but they count 20% of your grade so do them. He tries to makes jokes, but overall an awful professor. Upside is he already curved the class at the beginning by a lot. If you know chemistry really well then he might be a decent professor. Half of class dropped 
                
                   Dempsey is overall a horrible professor. He doesn't know how to teach properly like all other professors. He gives a LOT of homework. I literally taught the course my self by reading the book and doing the OWLs. The average on his tests are in the 40s. If you take him you probably will either end up dropping or getting a really low grade (C or D). 
                
                   He seems like a really nice guy, and loves the material he teaches. However, he is the worst teacher I have ever had. if you take him be prepared to teach yourself. My friends all thought the tests were easy and made 90s I thought the opposite. If you are good at chem definitely take him for an easy A, if your not good at Chemistry then you'll fail
                
                   He's a really bad lecturer but his tests are quite easy if you go over the bookpowerpoint the day before or 2 days before.  He's also a super nice and funny prof.  Plus you DEFINITELY can skip class.  And he always pushes back OWL deadlines. 
                
                   Dempsey is the worst professor a college student can have. His lectures are are horrible.  He focuses too much on really easy things such as addition and subtraction and focuses too little on extremely hard stuff such as equilibrium, titrations, and chemical radiation. Then he puts all the hard stuff on his tests!! In short, DO NOT TAKE HIM!!! 
                
                   He was the WORST teacher I've ever had. I spent forever doing his OWLS that it started to affect my grades in my other classes. Going to every class, all his reviews, and doing 100% of the OWLS don't help. I still failed every test below a 50 and had to end up dropping the class. DO NOT TAKE HIM!
                
                   So I took this class in high school but didn't get credit from A&M. I cruised through Chem 101 but Dempsey was the worst professor I had all year. Going to lectures is a waste of time but he gives random clickers so you have to go. Way to much HW also. I would stay up forever teaching myself the OWLS only to have them extended on the due date. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM. He goes so fast during the lecture that you don't have time to even comprehend what was said or write anything down. He gives about 50 sections of owl a week. His tests are so hard that the average test grade in my class was always below a 60. Gives clicker questions for a grade randomly so don't skip. AVOID IF IT ALL POSSIBLE!
                
                   He gives about 40-50 owl groups a week, and he is not very organized. He usually ends up pushing back the homework because he is not on track with his own calendar.  101 was very easy for me, but 102 has been a struggle because of him. He is not good at teaching. But, he does curve.
                
                   I had a great experience with Dr. Fang. He was very clear and concise with what he wanted you to learn and didn't waste time talking about other things that aren't related. His tests are tough with around a 65 average overall, but they aren't too bad if you pay attention in class and have a natural love for chemistry. He wasn't "inspirational".
                
                   Tests are straight forward, with a few tricky questions thrown in. He refuses to use power points (which I liked about him) so you have to be on your toes ready to take good notes. His notes and examples are directly from the textbook, so if you miss something he said, its easy to go back. He gets annoyed when people ask too many questions.
                
                   Class isn't mandatory, but he does have clicker questions worth a small part of your grade. He's a really good professor, and happy to answer questions during class. He's known to make minor errors in some problems, but he always corrects them. Tests aren't impossible, mainly related to problems he works through in class.
                
                   He's extremely helpful, but uses OWL's for the homework. I think Satan probably writes those questions, because I've never had such difficult homework for any class in college. I'm already bad at chemistry, and OWL's frustrated me so much that it was almost impossible to pass that class. Be prepared for a challenge.
                
                   Dr. Folden is an outstanding professor. His lectures were very clear, he was enthusiastic and genuinely cared about his students. Also, he offered a review before every test and gave hints during lectures to questions that could be on the test. Still have to work hard, but worth the effort.
                
                   I can't say how awesome Prof. Folden was!He is a great at giving lectures. He tries to make his points very clear and tries his best to make you understand in the easiest way possible. He genuinely cares for his students and on occasion he can be pretty hilarious. You can also tell he loves what he does. Take him! 
                
                   I loved Dr. Folden! He broke down the material so it was very easy to comprehend. He also goes slow enough during lecture so your hand won't cramp. He takes his time explaining the topics -  even if that means his a little behind for the next lecture. His tests are straight forward, and he even holds review sessions (yes, for the final too). 
                
                   He's really helpful, and his lectures are very on topic and clear. Whenever he's asked a question, he always repeats the question so that everybody knows what question he's answering to. Highly recommend this professor... would like him as my organic chem professor!
                
                   Awesome professor. Clear communicator and very helpful.
                
                   He writes out his notes during the lecture so you don't miss any important points. He also holds review sessions before his tests so you know what all will be on the test. Never overloaded us on OWL homework. He breaks chemistry down even for people that dont remember much from chem101.
                
                   Class is difficult due to subject material. Prof is a good lecturer. Allows one page of notes on each test.
                
                   Doesnt teach. Reads straight off the powerpoints. Tests are usually only 25 questions long and can be easy if you read your book and teach yourself the material. Also very hard to understand when he talks
                
                   Ochem is hard no matter who you take. GG simplifies the subject, but by no means makes it easy. He clearly cares about his students and wants them to succeed. I went into his office many times after getting my exam grade back and was able to get points back. If you put in the effort required, you will do fine in the class.
                
                   Very good teacher! Although he tries to help you memorize the information more than learn it. His tests are pretty easy! I would recommend over other teachers. 
                
                   The subject matter is tough, but he did the best any professor could with it, he really cares and is always willing to help.
                
                   I took his class in 1987.  I got good enough grade to get into medical school but organic chemistry not really usually in real life.
                
                   Notes are available at Copy Corner. Buy them. He gives old tests as practice which are super helpful. Made the material decently easy to understand.
                
                   Note set available for purchase at copy corner which is really nice. He gives you old exams to practice, easier than other professors available.
                
                   Organic Chemistry 2. Class was very difficult, but professor was clear of what he wanted us to learn. Use pracice problems for test. Greatly Help. GG was funny and very helpful. Highly Recommend.
                
                   amazing professor!!  makes you laugh with all his stories!!  tests are a bit challenging but it is hard subject matter.
                
                   Had GG in 1992 for organic chem.  He was a GREAT prof.  If he still gives tutorials for his tests, GO!!  Some of the problems he worked in the tutorials were on the test!  Very nice, loved his subject, and a great teacher.
                
                   pretty good, knows his stuff
                
                   G.G. ROCKS!!! I highly recoomend him for ANY Chem course. He REALLY cares about his students learning something fromhis course!!
                
                   He is a fun teacher, but that doesn't mean the Test are easy!
                
                   Amazing Professor. I Highly recommend him for Organic!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Amazing teacher
                
                   Kenn Harding is the rudest most arrogant ass of a professor you will ever take. He is not willing to help his students in class or lab. Tests are impossible and he does not do much to help you prepare for them. DO NOT TAKE HIM. 
                
                   You need to come to class for reading quizzes.period. Gives a curve but usually its like 2 points doesn't help very much. He gives a study guide before the test, but MUCH easier than what is actually on it.
                
                   Daily quizzes which can be difficult.  Knows his stuff, but sometimes uses words he considers trivial when they are not.  Need to read and come to class prepared, everyday.  Grades very fairly.
                
                   He's a fairly good prof for the difficulty of the material, he just tends to get distracted a lot due to his ADD. I've heard he prepares you for the MCAT though which is a plus.
                
                   He is a fair professor, sometimes he goes fast but he has to cover 2 Chem classes in one, so you should expect that with whoever you take. All his power points are online but if you don't go to class they won't make sense. He is a funny guy too which is a +. He also give out study problem for the exams.  Try, go to class, and do the study problems.
                
                   It's hard to tell you what to study for this class because well..I did it all and still got a C. I read the chapters, did the end-of-chapter questions he told us to do, and fully understood the Chem OWLS and still did terrible on tests. WARNING: Watch out for the Chem OWLS he assigns...THERE'S A LOT.
                
                   This professor expects you to have an almost perfect understanding of high school chemistry before starting the course. The speed is too fast for some students and very often you will find yourself lost. The tests are hard, but the curve does bring the grade up. Attend all the Recitation classes and SI classes early on to do well in the class.
                
                   Terrible Professor. He explains things in the most complicated way possible, and even when he tries to explain problems, he purposely talks over your head. He also moves faster than all of the other professors, so even A-plus and 4.0 can't help you because they are behind teaching the other classes. Don't take his class. Take Brown
                
                   he rambles and makes class super dull. His test are hard but he curves massively
                
                   I really liked Lin Jiang, and I ended up with a B. I was expecting a very hard class because it was Ochem, and I feel like she is one of the easier Ochem profs. She will help you in her office, and she's actually very nice even though she may be hard to understand. I would def. take her again. 
                
                   Lectured off of power points that were posted online. Went to every lecture for the first test and then maybe went to half after. Attendance is not mandatory grades come from OWL homework, tests, and the final. Curved a good amount at the end. Ended up with an A. I would recommend reading the book along with the power points.
                
                   You might learn more with the other profs but with Jiang she actually curves which from what I hear is very rare with the other profs (if it even happens). Ochem is Ochem so its going to be hard regardless but with Jiang its definitely easier honestly because of how easy she grades. She was also helpful if you had questions
                
                   Very mono-tone during lecture. Easy for your mind to wonder off, hard to keep focus. Pay very close attention
                
                   Dr. K was one of the best science teachers I have ever had. I'm glad I was part of the last class she taught before retiring. She did so much to help you're grade that you would have to try really hard to fail her class. She was probably my favorite teacher for first semester in college. Hopefully her chem 102 notes will help me out next semester
                
                   Dr. K was an amazing professor! Chem can be a hard subject to grasp, but she does her best to make sure you know the material. Gives a lot of different "extra credit" so you can make an A in the class if you try. Tests are very similar to her previous tests that she posts on her webpage and her notes are very helpful too!! Love her!! 1010!
                
                   Dr. K is the best Chem teacher ever! Obviously the class is extremely difficult because it's chemistry but she does everything possible to make sure you succeed, and she curves a lot at the end of the semester. She's also really helpful during office hours.
                
                   Dr.K was awesome. I believe after this semester she is retiring. She was a great teacher and allowed me to understand and love this course. Everything that was expected was clear. The OWLs were annoying after a while but they helped with understanding different concepts. The BOPs gave you a 2 point curve to overall course grade.
                
                   Practice tests are very similar. Aplus helps.. she isnt the nicest when it comes to asking for help. Kinda looks at you stupid. But pretty easy.. just make sure to study alot gen chem isnt suppose to be easy.
                
                   She was recommended by a friend as one of the best teachers she ever had, and ended up being one of my favorite teachers too. She explains the material very well and you can get a B on every test and still easily get an A with all of the other opportunities she gives.
                
                   101 was a breeze, tons of extra credit and spoon feeds you. If you are literally a potato that'll be the only reason you could fail. Tests are straightforward, examples in class.  102, the material is hard as heck but she does well to teach it as much as your learning capacity will allow you. Worknote load is the same. 95 in 101, 80 in 102 :( 
                
                   Dr. K was the best educator I've had through all my schooling. (However I believe she's retiring after Fall 2014.) It was never a pain to sit through one of her classes. She is very helpful during her office hours and responds to emails almost immediately. Take her while you still can!!
                
                   Dr. K was GREAT! She is very easy to talk to and always explains things very clear. She posts info prior to beginning the class about important dates and such and is always there to remind us of homework and such. She holds weekly review sessions and gives many opportunities to boost scores. I would definitely recommend her. Chem 112 is different.
                
                   The class was pretty easy. She gives you a lot of opportunities to bring your grade up. Class is mandatory, because she gives clicker quizzes everyday, but she only takes your top 20.
                
                   Best chemistry professor i have ever had! I have always been good at chem but even my friends that haven't still love her! Lots of homework, but it will help you SO MUCH on the tests. SO DO THE HOMEWORK. Also, your grade isn't just based on tests, she incorporates quizzes, homework and optional writing assignments to help you.Best prof!!
                
                   greatest prof i have ever had, gives opportunities to suceede and i suck at chemistry made a B , buy the notebook copy from copy corner it helped alot
                
                   Dr. K is super awesome! She's kinda funny and really teaches the material, never just stands and lectures. Pretty interactive. Lab sucked but thats not taught by her. She's pretty lenient about late work too as long as you talk to her. She just wants her students to be successful.
                
                   best professor i have ever had take her i disliked chemistry she is a great teacher and offers plenty of resources to do well in the class
                
                   TONS OF BUSY WORK!!! She is a good teacher but you will be spending valuable time working on "bonus" problems (she grades on a curve so these are basically required) and OWLs. In addition, you have to download and play the game "Second Life" and play it for quiz grades (waste of time). Also, you must write essays for CHEMISTRY! busywork busywork
                
                   Really great professor. Easy to understand, plus she has her own set of notes.
                
                   Dr. K is an amazing prof! I barely got by with an 80 in high school chem and I was nervous for college chem. However, Dr. K knows her stuff and makes the material so much easier to understand. Take her- you will not regret it. Also, don't buy the textbook. She has all of her class notes for the entire year bound and sold for $20
                
                   Dr. K is a fantastic professor, she is very helpful and truly cares about her students' success in her class. As long as you make an effort, do the suggested work and all the built in extra credit that she offers there is no excuse for you not to make a B or better in the class.
                
                   I hated chemistry until I had this professor. She is absolutely one of the best teachers I've ever had. She has a book of notes, buy it. That's all I ever used to study and I got an A. Go to her office to get help, wonderful lady.
                
                   She was a good professor, lots of resources at the students disposal, and she was ready to help. There were a few extra things we had to do, and attendance was guaranteed by the fact we took this 2-3 minute quiz over what was taught that day in class. To put it simply, I'm now going to take her for Chem 102.
                
                   Tests were incredibly hard, sometimes having a class average of mid-50's. The tutor I went to who had him before said there was no way to study for his tests - he doesn't go by the book, homework, or class notes. He goes through the power points really fast and doesn't usually post them on WebCT beforehand so taking notes is tricky.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   if you have to take Chem 315....Take him,TAKE HIM, It's worth it........ Don't miss the chance and get stuck with the lady who teaches QuantitativeAnalysis..
                
                   Simply the best.
                
                   DO THE STUDY GUIDES AND PRACTICE TESTS. They are identical to the actuall tests. he is a great proff and is really funny. Subject matter is hard(its chemistry)but he simplifies it and makes it easy. With out a doubt , the best chem proff there is.
                
                   the BEST chemistry teacher there is for chemistry! all my other friends complained about their teachers. he is very simple and tests are extremely easy if you do the study guide and practice tests he puts online. i went to a tutor but made HIGH A's on the test. the only problem were his quizzes which i always missed because of skipping class.
                
                   Prof is very easy. Must attend class for the 6 easy pop quizzes he gives. Also his tests are strictly based on the notes. (reading book is unnecessary). Owls are easy and manageable. His exams are not tricky at all and there is few calculations, mostly concepts. Final statement take this Prof.
                
                   Not very good at explaining things.  Had to teach myself thru the text/tutor.
                
                   Good professor.Willing to help.Fair grading. Good sense of humor
                
                   Very good at explaining concepts in lecture. Has a slight middle eastern accent, but he is understandable. OWLs can be a pain in the rear at times. Highly recommend him as i will be taking CHEM 102 from him as well.
                
                   Really easy chem professor as long as you pay attention during his lectures you wont need a book. He has an accent but he is still easy to understand.
                
                   Very good professor overall. Notes/lecture were easy to follow. Tests were easy to prepare for. He posts practice exams and study guides online. Quizzes are all unannounced, but weren't too difficult as long as you reviewed your notes.
                
                   Pretty good Professor...would recommend if you have no chemistry background. All notes are in class are used on the test. only thing need to purchase was for the OWL for homework. Which there are A LOT of! Overall pretty good.
                
                   He's indian so sit close to the front if you want to understand him. However, his tests are directly over the notes, which he writes during class with you. So be sure to attend class.
                
                   OMG!  If he makes it the next few years, I will be surprised!  This guy is ancient!  It takes him so long to work out problems (he goes over every one) that he hardly teaches anything new.  The problem with that being, he tests you on everything, even if it wasn't covered in class!!  If you can, get another prof!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   If you're good at chemistry, he's not bad.  Works VERY slowly on problems in class, so he doesn't always cover everything thats on tests.  VERY old and slow, may not be teaching much longer.  Puts up jokes periodically on overhead.  mildly entertaining, not very interesting or energetic
                
                   He's a really nice guy and is always willing to help. It's easy to get an A in this class because if you don't earn an A Dr. Mohammed will find a way to get you the A you want. I think he's a good prof and I've learned a lot from him. Great guy.
                
                   Participation bonus points are awarded through in class clicker questions. Graded assignment took weeks to be handed back out.
                
                   I've never been good at chemistry but Mullen definitely made this class bearable! She curves ALOT. I would definitely take her again.
                
                   She is an awesome teacher!! Go to lecture and do ALL the owls and you will do perfectly fine. She is always willing to help, tests aren't that hard and she curves A LOT! I would definitely take again. By far the best prof I've had so far.
                
                   I was terrified of organic chemistry because general chemistry was a complete disaster for me (CHEM 101:C & CHEM 102:D), but that wasn't the case for CHEM 222! Attend class, complete the homework ( NO Owls :) ), and ATTEND OFFICE HOURS anytime you do not understand a subject. If you do all this you'll make an A like I did.
                
                   Dr. Mullen is a GREAT professor. I was so scared about this class but she was amazing. You need to go to class for clicker questions and quizzes, but there are tons of opportunities for bonus points and she's such a good teacher. She will answer ALL your questions, she curves, and she's really nice. Put some effort in and you'll get an A. 
                
                   Dr. Mullen really cares about you learning and tries her best to help you succeed.  Extra credit was offered numerous times, and all of her quizzes were announced. Her tests were quite challenging, but she curved a lot. Going to a tutoring service helped me out the most with this class.
                
                   Awesome teacher and a really caring woman. She is kinda nerdy but in the likable way. She posted notes before class to print off most of the time, but often did not get them ready in time. I'm awful at chemistry so it was difficult for me to understand but she's willing to help. The OWLs helped with grades and she held review sessions before exams
                
                   She isn't the best at teaching chemistry but with tutoring, you'll be fine. Do ALL the extra credit she gives out and do the practice exams! Go to class because there are clicker questions most days they are a chunk of your grade. As long as your practice what she's teaching, you'll be fine.
                
                   Very good prof. Offers curves,  practice exams just like her test, and extra credit. She is very nice, and is willing to help you anyway she can. Her test are sightly difficult but not bad. I would recommend her for sure!
                
                   She is really an awesome professor. Even though I never read the book, I got through her class because of her lectures. She tends to crack some jokes so the lectures themselves are not really boring. She is really helpful, giving practice exams that look like her test and gives a lot of extra credit. I really recommend this prof.
                
                   Take Dr. Mullen! She is so sweet and really cares about you learning. Tests are really difficult, however she gives tons of curves and extra credit.
                
                   This prof is absolutely amazing! While her tests can be quite challenging, her office hours are very flexible and are what got me through the semester. She cares for her students success and is an amazing professor. She curves very graciously so if you did bad on an exam, you may get a 5-10 point curve on it. All I have to say is GET DR. MULLEN!
                
                   Dr. Mullen was great! The tests and the material are hard but she really cares about everyone understanding it.  She is very funny so class was never boring! very fair, understanding professor
                
                   She curves all tests A LOT, but for a reason… go to class to do clicker questions. she's pretty entertaining and always willing to help you in her office hours!
                
                   She gave great curves. The exams were hard, but if you do the review you should be fine. She's funny so the lectures aren't boring.
                
                   Dr mullen is a GREAT chemistry teacher, I was worried about this 222 but it was not a tough class at all with such a great teacher, she used a different online homework than owl, called sapling made it much easier to understand, the tests were difficult but if you study and go to class an A should be easily achieved
                
                   He's from Costa Rica, so his accent is terrible. How is he able to teach something as difficult as Chemistry, when he's struggling to find the right word to say&#63; He studders so incredibly bad, he spends all class trying to figure out this one word he wants to say, rather than figuring out another word to replace it with. AAHHH!
                
                   Don't take him!!! Whatever you do!!!  He goes on long tangents over things that aren't even on the test... Save yourself some time and don't take him.
                
                   She's a good professor if you learn quickly. It really seemed like she expected everyone in the class had taken AP Chem in high school and in my opinion her lectures moved a little too fast with not near enough attention paid to working problems. I learned too late, but thoroughly reading the textbook helps tremendously.
                
                   Very good professor. Doesn't teach in the spring semester so take in the fall. Sometimes lectures are confusing if you aren't paying much attention. If you have a good grasp on chemistry you will make an easy A in this class. Tests are multiple choice though so no partial credit.
                
                   Pellois is pretty much your average run-of-the-mill professor. Go to class because she doesn't post notes online, and there are iClicker quizzes that count for a small percent of your grade. If you pay attention and take notes, the exams are not bad at all. Grade cutoffs in this class are lower than others (86 is an A). 
                
                   She's a very nice lady, very willing to help. Not super easy but that's to be expected with chem 107. 
                
                   Dr. Pellois was a good professor. The class is difficult especially if you are not a science person. She goes slow when explaining things, but lectures can become hard to pay attention in.
                
                   Best prof of my semester. She's so friendly and approachable. Lectures are long if you don't enjoy the subject, but just commit to paying attention because basically everything on her exams she taught you how to do in lecture. So much that you don't really use the book. Assignments are very numerous but are only a small percent of the grade.
                
                   Dr. Pellois was the highlight of my first semester of college. She is very kind and approachable, and takes the time to carefully explain tougher subjects of the class that she knows people will have trouble with--and it turns out, they end up not being hard to understand at all. She also does several experiments in class, which are all very fun.
                
                   Very good professor, it's just a little tough to stay awake in her class because she's very quiet.
                
                   I actually liked this professor. I mean if you actually care about the subject you shouldn't have a problem staying awake, she even does little demonstration experiments in class to show how stuff works. Doesnt have any accent which is always a plus.
                
                   Like the other comments said, it's really hard to stay awake in her class. She knows her stuff, but doesn't know how to deliver it to the students. Very hard to ask questions in the lecture, and her go-to line is &quot;come see me during office hours&quot;. Take her class if you want to test your attention span.
                
                   It was hard to pay attention during her lectures; she doesn't keep your attention (I frequently ended up falling asleep).  Her tests weren't that bad.
                
                   This professor is knowledgable of her subject, but does not manage to make class at all interesting or engaging. Even for a dedicated student, her class is a hard one to stay awake for.  Also, her use of an online textbook and online homework will leave you pulling your hair out after you spend hours not trying to complete the homework, but rathe
                
                   Took him in 1988 and apparently he hasn't changed his 'monotone'. Luckily Chem tests in 1988 were semi-departmental and so you could attend any lecturer's class to prepare for the tests. I went to Dr. Kennicutt's class.  Don't get me wrong...he knows his stuff and am sure he is great one-on-one. But he didn't make it easy to stay awake for class :(
                
                   This guy wrote the book on general chemistry.  Seriously, look at the cover of your general chemistry book.  It's says PECK right there.  Dr. Peck is very smart, and obviously loves what he teaches (in-class demonstrations).  He's also a fossil.  This makes him hard to understand sometimes.  So go to class and sit in the front, go to SI, and comfort yourself with the fact that you'd have to be studying just as hard as you would if you had Williamson.  There's no way to make general chemistry easy.
                
                   Peck can be boring at times, but if you personally take the time to talk to him about any problems with the course, he is very good on a one on one basis.
                
                   very monotone and boring.  i couldn't help but sleep every time i went to class.  but i always showed up in case he had one of his pop quizes.
                
                   very very boring monotone voice and it seemed like he was disinterested in the class.
                
                   Dr. Peck has Perkinsons Disease so it's very hard to understand him some times. He is very confusing and the course material is complicated. He has a very annoying voice and makes you want to go to sleep!
                
                   Dr. Powers graduated from Harvard, so it without a doubt he knows his stuff and expects work to be done. Lectures were engaging, but pretty confusing to keep track of the notes he handwrites on the chalkboard. The online homeworks were quite long but helped! His exams were pretty tricky. Be ready to work hard for your grade by reading, for example.
                
                   Lectures are very informative, using material from the book and from his own experiences to keep the class interesting. Course concepts are quite difficult, so tuning out is not an option. Dr. Powers did seem confused by the lack of questions in lectures, but it was due to his MASSIVE amount of office hours and that he explains everything so well.
                
                   Pretty good instructor, explains everything well. Also does curve, but at the end of the semester, 80% is an A
                
                   OWL assignment due every week. Sucks at lecturing. Posts an exam review but then doesn't post an answer key to it so you never know if you get the answer right or wrong. His exams are nothing like the review & he says he uses questions that he gave when he taught at Harvard. The class average for exams is usually a 60 & he doesn't curve. DON"T TAKE
                
                   Technically a TA , but she is pretty awesome! Super energetic and truly cares about her students! The class is pretty difficult though. 
                
                   He was difficult to understand but the tests weren't too hard
                
                   Doesn't use OWLs or clickers or even the textbook really. Just go to class, study his notes and practice problems, and you'll be fine. The only grades are exams, and they're all fill in the blank, but as long as you study you're fine. Easy A.
                
                   GO TO CLASS.  You don't even need to read the text book, his exams come strait from his lectures, so take really detailed notes and don't skip.
                
                   I took Rabe for 101 and 102. There are no OWLs or clickers (the book isn't necessary either), just taking notes. You have to go to class to do well- questions come straight from his notes. He does a lot of practice problems which are exactly like what you should expect on the exams.
                
                   Didn't like that the only grades are exams. No hw, quizzes, etc. But he's a good teacher, and tests come from notes.
                
                   Very easy professor. If you attend all the lectures, take good notes, and pay attention, you will easily be sitting on an A or a B. I got lucky to have him since i am somewhat of a weak chemistry student.
                
                   Best Professor! He is very helpful and test are very reasonable!
                
                   he was honestly a hard professor because his exams were ALL free response (fill in the blank), but everything comes straight from his lectures. he is also very encouraging and a good professor just really expects you to know your stuff and on the exams, you either know it or you dont...there really is no guessing.
                
                   He acts like he is hard but over 50% of the class gets an A or B. He follows the book, but his notes...He get his test exactly from his notes. He is very straight forward and you learn the information. He doesnt try to fool you. His test are fill in the blank coming directly from his notes!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst part is that the class is at 3:00 on Friday.
                
                   This course is quite demanding; however, if the proper amount of effort is put forth you will do fine.  It seems to me that Dr. Romo teaches on a level more suitable for graduate students instead of undergrads, but I liked it because he really pushed me and taught me practical problem solving skills.  If you want a challenge, take Dr. Romo's class.
                
                   Tries to help, but his tests are impossible. The average grade is usually failing...he curves but not until the end so you're never quite sure where you stand. If you are a chem major and the advisors tell you to take this, TAKE HONORS INSTEAD...theirs is better.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   First he gave horrible test that had nothing to do with the topic, so he would curve the class significantly.  He had a few errors in the tests themselves that I pointed out and he refused to give me points back. Tests come out of nothing he taught or the online hw and when you ask what to study he said look in the book for practice problems. avoid
                
                   Tests are so hard. Study, study, study & study some more. 
                
                   He's super enthusiastic about chemistry and tries to make it interesting with lots of demos. He was a bit of a push over and definitely took into consideration that we have lives outside of class. He's not too bad on tests and gives lots of curves. I would take him again.
                
                   His lectures help a lot with understanding book material. Part of the grade is participation. Difficult tests but there is an end of the semester curve.
                
                   His tests are difficult, and the homework that was due often went farther than what he was lecturing about. His tests are curved a lot! He seems like a bit of a push over. He did some cool demos. I enjoyed his class because he was really enthusiastic but I would not choose him for a prof again.
                
                   Very passionate and knew a lot about Chemistry but being a new teacher, didn't know how to relay the information. Made lecture fun with demos periodically. Although the tests had 50-60 averages, he made up for it with a large curve (77-100 was an A). I would definitely recommend him again! 
                
                   Dr. Sheldon was a great professor. His passionate in teaching Chemistry really helped me understand the material. Also, he loves to do demos where he performs cool experiments RELATED to chemical principles taught in class. Although his tests were EXTREMELY hard, his curves are pretty significant. Overall, I would strongly recommend him. 
                
                   Great guy, but a decent professor, probably because it is his first year teaching here. Very generous with his curves on tests, because the tests were very difficult. If you really pay attention in class and don't to miss class you should be fine to pull of an 'A,' but just because he is a nice professor, its not an easy class.
                
                   I took him for Chem 101 and absolutely loved him. He was very interested in the success of his students and gave great curves. The tests were tough but I went to 4.0 and Go and did just fine. I would definitely recommend him. He seemed like such a sweetheart. 
                
                   He seems like a really nice guy and he's very interested in chemistry. His tests were tough but were extremely curved. 
                
                   Sheldon is just adorable and always excited about chemistry.  I enjoyed working with him although his class was very tough I feel like he was a very helpful teacher. You need your book and to take many notes but overall if you go to office ours you should be safe. He give niiiiiiice curves! 
                
                   not easy as you think for a new professor. seems to make hw due before he finishes teach whats on them. gives really nice curves to make up for the lack of well teaching. if you are a visual person choose him, he loves his demos & videos!
                
                   Gives big curves on tests and at the end of the semester. He's really passionate about chemistry and you can tell by the way he teaches. He does cool demos and gets really excited. Lots of OWL homework. You have to read the book for the tests.
                
                   I grew to love Shelly. He was very excited about chem and made it easy to understand. Demos every Friday were great. There were clickers, but he gave you the answers and you only have to get 80% correct to get full credit, so you really only HAVE to show up 80% of the time. The tests are difficult (50-60 averages), but the curve helps a lot. 
                
                   Really good professor who is really enthusiastic about the subject. She is very easy to understand and willing to help if you are confused. Chemistry isn't an easy subject in general so you will never find a prof to get an easy a from. However, if you put in the work and study there is no reason why you shouldn't make an a. she is very clear about 
                
                   Dr. Skiles was a great chemistry prof! She explained the material in normal people terms and did not use PhD language.  She used a lot of examples that were really helpful. I would definitely recommend to take her class.
                
                   Took for chem 1 after dropping it first semester, she made a big difference. I owe my grade (B) to A+ but her enthusiasm and lectures definitely helped. You won't survive on going to her class alone, I definitely recommend outside help. Her tests aren't hard at all and she doesn't try to trick you. Her examples helped and I overall enjoyed her.
                
                   Dr. Skiles makes chemistry enjoyable, if you like quirky jokes and goofy awkwardness, you will love her lectures. The tests are tough, but if you use all of the available resources you can do well. If you have to take chemistry, I would definitely recommend her, she does AWESOME demos whenever applicable, and occasionally gives free clicker points.
                
                   Easy A or B for a science and history credit! TAKE WHISKEY CLASS. He makes class fun and quizzes are self graded and self assessed. Super helpful and you can tell he loves what he does. Don't buy the textbooks though
                
                   He always keeps lectures interesting! There are only 4 tests(including the final, half of which was take home). However, don't be fooled by the fun and light appearance of his lectures. The tests are very hard, but he curves nicely. It is absolutely necessary to read the book and do the practice problems. His test questions are always tricky!
                
                   You don't really need the textbook (except for sample probs), there are no owls and only 4 tests. However, these tests are VERY challenging (the test average will usually be 30-50 range). Thankfully, he curves grades so if you get within this grade range you'll get a C.
                
                   Great prof. He is interesting. Class isn't boring, no owl homework or quizzes. I went to tutoring because his test are pretty hard, but hardly went to class. He curves a lot so even if you make 40's and 50's on the test you can still come out with at least a C. I definitely recommend him especially if you are a working student.
                
                   His lectures are okay, and you will learn chemistry but his tests are unreasonable and not a good representation of either the material from his lectures or the book. FYI the test grade averages were always in the 30s and 40s
                
                   Simply go to class and he explains pretty much everything you need to know. In addition to class lectures and doing the online homework, the tests really arent that bad. He does curve his tests and there are no quizzes or required homework. He's super nice and super helpful!
                
                   He makes lectures fun, but half of things he talks about in class are never on the test. It is hard to know what he will test you on so study everything. The other good thing is that you have a chance to get 100 extra credit points that really helped me. Do all of the owls that helped  on the test more than going to class.
                
                   Simanek realates chemistry concepts to real life so that it's be easier to understand.  He also keeps your attention during class unlike some other professors.
                
                   Nice.
                
                   she is good.
                
                   He cannot teach
                
                   This professor did not care about his students regurgitating information but rather wanted them to learn it and truly understand the concepts. He was a great professor. If you go in and talk to him during his office hours he will tell you what you need to work on studying.
                
                   Very easy to follow + a good teacher; wants to make sure students understand the material. Tends to be a bit overly redundant at times, though.
                
                   extremely hard would not take him unless you are BMS or engineering major you will need the guide to general chem to survive and you will have a load every night he isn't that helpful and his tests aren't always straight forward his reviews are very ambiguous and imprecise
                
                   Best professor ever! cares a lot about students learning to learn and study. very helpful. nice person
                
                   I'm a freshman, and even now I can tell that Dr. Stone is one of the best professors I will ever have. He teaches you what WORKS and gives you all the tools you'll need to survive just about any problem or equation you'll ever come across. But the key is that it is up to YOU; if you practice, you will be rewarded in this class. EXCELLENT teacher!!
                
                   All I have to say....DO the suggested homework! Even though it is not for a grade. This helps tremendously. Don't pay for a tutor - it is a waste of your time and $. Lecture and homework will get you through this class - he is a very intelligent man.
                
                   For both 101 & 102. Great prof! He does not use a traditional curve, so if you study well and work the problems, you should get an A. Office hours are very helpful for reviewing tests and understanding material better. Easy to talk to. Wants students to succeed beyond his class.
                
                   His lectures are not mandatory but if you don't understand Chemistry well then attending is a must. He only has test as grades but if you practice the material then you'll be okay. SI are helpful for more practice work if you need it.
                
                   Dr. Stone is the best professor/teacher I've ever had.  His lectures are so easy to understand, he is funny, and he is very willing to help out any student.  He is very straight forward and to-the-point. .  Overall I have not a single complaint.  If you pay attention and study, you can easily get an A or B.
                
                   AMAZING TEACHER! If you want to learn, take his class. He is VERY talented on teaching, it is very difficult to NOT get what he is saying. His test REALLY test you if you learned ur material and if you are familier with it. He's grading system is on competing against other student in your class, so it's not that bad. I WOULD SO TAKE HIS CLASS!
                
                   Very nice professor.  Gives plenty of A's.  You just have to beat 85% of the class.  You don't have to attend lecture and there are no quizzes.  All that counts are tests.
                
                   Good prof, knows what he is talking about. Must pay attention in class or you will fall behind. He stresses vocabulary and his tests are usually comprised of matching (vocab), multiple choice section, and 2 free response questions. If you study hard you shouldn't have a problem getting a B in the class. Forget about an A unless you are a genius.
                
                   This is one of those professors who is easy to undertand, clear on all of his points, and yet very hard to get an A from.  We had three tests, and two of mine were pretty well above the class average (while one was just a little above it) and I still only made a B.  But as a person who doesn't get Chemistry, I will say that I did learn a lot.
                
                   Great teacher, but you have to study to make it in the class.  He is helpful.  His lab reports take a lot of time, but replace quizes.  Keeps the class interesting, goes faster than most other profs and you will learn a lot.
                
                   He does want students to learn, but he tells you what you need to do to pass, and if you do it you can make an A.
                
                   He is such a nice guy and helpful if you come talk to him, but his class is almost impossible to make an A in
                
                   Very hard to understand and follow. Not only does he have a thick accent, he also has a monotone voice, so it is hard to understand and hard to stay focused. I pretty much had to read to pass the class because I got nothing out of lecture. Do the homework because it will help save your grade. 
                
                   Although he might not be very clear during lecture, if you just take notes, ESPECIALLY THE PRACTICE PROBLEMS, and do the owls, then you will do just fine on the tests. He has an optional test review before every test and he will tell you what the difficult questions are going to be and what you shouldn't bother studying. Very helpful if you ask
                
                   His class was pretty tough. I ended up with a B in it, but it was very stressful. Assigns owl practice problems for each section which take A TON of time, but help your grade. DO NOT  WAIT UNTIL THE LAST MINUTE TO DO THE OWL. His tests were pretty tough, but going to A+ tutoring helps. The lab that goes with this class was very hard and stressful.
                
                   This is college. Nothing is easy. He is a wonderful teacher. Took him for two semesters. Extends owl deadlines, tests are doable, READ YOUR TEXTBOOK AND DO THE PRACTICE QUESTIONS IN THE BACK TO GET A 100 ON A TEST
                
                   All in all Stollenz is not as bad as he sounds. He has a german accent but it was not that hard to get used to. His lectures are long and boring but he really does care about the subject. He has 3 tests and a final. He does give a lot of homework but his isn't that bad. He curves a ton at the end of the year (I got a B instead of a D).
                
                   He really cares about chemistry and it shows in his lectures. He does have a german accent, but it's easy to get used to. His tests are easy, always multiple choice, and he provides you with the equations you'll need. Grade depends on about five owl (online) homeworks, exams and clicker questions during lectures. He notices who goes to office hours
                
                   He's difficult and hard to understand, but you'll get used to it by the end of the semester. He also does his tests in an interesting way in that he allows you to write two answers on multiple choice questions if you are unsure about an answer (for less credit, of course).
                
                   He is a wonderful professor, he is really quick to answer questions in emails and during his office hours. His tests are beautiful because you can chose two answers if you are not sure what the correct answer is. There is little HW, three tests, took him all semester freshman year. Got an A in the class both semesters. NOT a easy A. 
                
                   Accent makes some lectures difficult to understand, but he knows what he's talking about and has the personality to make you as excited about chemistry as he is. Reading the textbook is essential because a lot of his examples are straight from the text. I bought the study guide and it helped me so much.
                
                   Dr. Stolllenz teaches somewhat in a confusing way and doesnt work out many math problems in class. He is good at teaching concepts, but not explaining the math part.  He is funny and has an interesting personality. He is enthusatic & I love that he did experiments in class a lot to demonstrate. Complete ALL OWLS, they will help SO much!
                
                   Dr. Stollenz was not the best lecturer, however his tests were ridiculously easy.  If you go to A+ and go to his test review sessions, you can easily make an A.  A lot of OWL homework but if you do them all, it buffers your grade.  Go to class for clickers, overall a very easy course and I don't know why people complain about him, it's not too bad
                
                   I took Dr. Stollenz his first semester teaching at A&M, also my first semester as a student, and it was tough. He is a really nice guy and once he adjusted his tests it was much easier. Study 20 hours for a test, go to class, and do all homework and it's really easy to get a B. An A is possible if you work extra hard. 
                
                   Dr. Stollenz has a thick accent but is still a great professor. He is really into chemistry, and does demonstrations to make the class interesting. He is more than willing to help in office hours, and is through. His test are straight forward, and he gives a review the week of the test where he basically tells you everything you need to know. 
                
                   His class is not as hard as people make it to be. Everything you need is literally on the powerpoint slides, study and its an easy B at the least.
                
                   Chem 111 can be challenging. Stollenz does not grade hard and all his tests are multiple choice. Read the book. Bring it to class and follow along in the book while sitting in the lecture. DO NOT MISS CLASS. The clicker points are important. If you read ahead or know chem then the class is really easy. 
                
                   Everyone says he's terrible but he really isn't. His accent is thick but he is willing to help. If you go to lecture and pay attention, DO THE OWLs, and study the PPs (which he puts up a couple days before the tests) the class is not bad AT ALL. I didn't do anything all semester long and passed. Final was pretty easy and he's a really nice guy. D
                
                   If you have a background in chemistry from a high school class, you'll most likely pass. It's crucial to read the book and learn from the online homeworks. His lectures aren't super clear and he's confusing sometimes. 
                
                   Not too bad if you have a good Chem background or had a good AP teacher in high school. If you are learning the material for the first time, it will be difficult to do so from Dr. Stollenz. He does give you the option to pick 2 answers (with slight penalties) on tests though, so that's nice. He takes attendance with clicker questions. 
                
                   Tests are easy as long as you study the OWLS and problems from the book. Go to class for clicker questions. Studying is mandatory. Reading the book helps.  
                
                   His lectures are pretty fun, although he does have a pretty thick accent. Best thing about his class is that he gives a test review a few days before the test where he tells you what is "most likely" to be on the test.  Read the book once or twice and PRACTICE THE PROBLEMS and you will make an A. Attendance is highly recommended for clicker points.
                
                   Taking Chem 234 with Dr. Tammy Tiner was a mistake. There have been about two other instances in my life in which I have had the unpleasant experience of having a professor that is so disinterested in the growth of her or his students. She made it her goal to diminish any enthusiasm for chemistry, and, while ultimately failing, nearly succeeded.
                
                   A plus tutoring helps.
                
                   The class is hard just like any organic class but you really need to read the text book and complete all the homework. I would suggest you go to SI and study groups, her practice exams are kinda alike that they have the same &quot;area&quot; of questions but not the same answers.
                
                   I am a self-learner, that is what helped me survive organic chemistry. She gives practice exams to review- study them but not solely them! OWL homework helps, and make sure you do at least some of the textbook problems . . . I didn't and she had some similar ones on the exams. Overall, you need to be self-motivated and study on your own.
                
                   There are quizes everyday there is no test, but it is homework problems, so if you do the homework you get 5's (the best score) on the quizes. Tests aren't too bad either. She is a really nice lady and a good teacher.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took her over the summer, and it was honestly an easy class for me. I hate Chemistry but she made it easy to understand. A lot of people complain about her, but I suggest taking her in the summer where she only teaches basics, and not as detailed. You will do well if you did your HW & extra credit. Exams are based  on HW take home quiz clicker
                
                   HORRIBLE!!!!! DO NOT TAKE HER!! Unless your genius in chemistry you are not going to have a good time... It was a horrible experience. If you choose her be prepared... Many students stop showing up to class because youtube was more helpful than her.
                
                   She was monotone, boring, and moved far too quickly. She did not even seem interested in the subject.
                
                   Her class is the hardest one I've taken since I've been at this school. Studied every single day, went to tutoring, and still did not pass a test. The Iclicker and homework assignments are what allowed me to not have a 50 in the class. Would not recommend this prof at all. She goes way too fast and doesn't explain the material very well.
                
                   Literally the worst professer I have. The material isn't that hard, yet she makes it seem like  taking O-CHEM as a freshman. DO NOT TAKE HER CLASS!!!!! She's just horrible. She totally misleads you as on the exams/reviews, and gives you not nearly enough time on the exams. Despise her so much....
                
                   A terrible teacher. She goes way to fast, reading off slides that are posted online. The fact that the clocker points are part of the grade is not a bad idea, but she gives very little time to do some long winded calculations. Talks down to people who asks questions. Will also add more questions to the online hw halfway through the week (surprise!)
                
                   Whenever I would go to her office hours to ask for help, she would put me off saying that I should already know this. Attending class was useless because all that she did was read off the power points that were also posted online. I went to class just to get clicker points. Also she wouldn't curve despite the fact that most of the class failed.
                
                   I studied almost everyday but no matter how hard I tried it was no help. She doesn't help much during office hours and is not flexible in terms of making an appointment. She also finds it amusing if you do not understand the material. I do not recommend her at all!
                
                   I do not recommend taking her class. She is not very good at all in explaining anything and kind of just throws the information our there. Really study the clicker questions because they're somewhat similar to her test questions although she does have slight tricks in her test questions sometimes. Good luck!
                
                   Very unhelpful professor, did not know how to teach and expected the students to know chemistry on their own. Her grading system was extremely unorganized. When students asked questions in lecture, she openly passed on answering the question. Horrible, I learned nothing from her, everyone had to teach themselves.
                
                   Trufan was not helpful to me at all. I went up several times after class to ask what work would help me learn the material, and she gave no help whatsoever. She told me to just come to class. She assigned a lot of Owls, which weren't too hard, but some of the Owls she assigned to be due after a test covered the material on the test. Frustrating!
                
                   While I found her tests to be fairly easy and very similar to the iClicker quiz questions in class, Trufan was a terrible teacher. I was forced to rely on learning the subject almost exclusively outside class. Her lectures are poorly organized and hard to follow, her explanations are insufficient, and she almost always seems confused by questions.
                
                   Definetly not an easy class. I don't suggest taking her class if you don't plan in reading your textbook. Gives many clicker questions which at the end boost your grade up. Isn't so picky with special assignment(15 points). Doesn't give too many owls (around 40ish). Test are hard.
                
                   She mostly reads the powerpoint slides to us. And too fast at that, there isn't enough time to write the slides but she does post them online. She is helpful for the most part during her office hours.Her accent isn't hard to understand. But because of clicker question attendance is important.
                
                   do not take trufan. she doesnt teach the material and expects you to know it anyways. the only thing that saved me was prior chemistry knowledge. i really didnt learn anything from her though and instead her class was just a headache
                
                   Trufan is not a good teacher at all. She goes through slides very fast and doesnt leave much time to understand or even grasp the concepts. Gives very few examples. She also gives no time to complete the clicker question that require long calculations. Do not take her!!
                
                   This teacher went through the slides very quickly. There were many clicker questions, most in which she gave not enough time to work the problem out to get the right answer. Her test are 20 questions, and I have only passed 1.I recomend if you want to pass a chemistry class to stay away from her. I went to many study sessions,none proven helpful.
                
                   It's obvious she loves chemistry and she can be funny. She movies very fast through her lectures and gives only one example before moving onto clicker questions. She posts her lecture slides on the website, which is good, but it's still not enough, her exams are very difficult. I don't recommend her if you already struggle with Chemistry.
                
                   She just reads from the slides gives clicker questions every time but it's no use because she doesn't give us enough time. The tests are 20 questions but aren't easy. Don't take her class!
                
                   Maybe gives one example for each major calculation that she tries to explain which is definitely not enough to work the much more difficult problems she asks in the exams.  Lots of math. Goes very fast.
                
                   I was scared going into ochem but Dr. Waas made it not so intimidating. He really cares about his students and if there are any questions about anything he's more than willing to help. You have to be willing to put in the work though! Study the text and really study what he puts in his notes. He does his best to keep everyone on the same page.
                
                   I took him as an 8am and thought he was absolutely fantastic. Easy to pay attention to. That being said, the kids bombing his exams were the ones not coming to class or studying. If you're worried that you're not going to pass/do well in OCHEM, just study and you're already ahead of 40% of his class. He also likes to give questions  from lecture:)
                
                   Dr. Waas is a very good professor, and I wish I could take him for organic  2.  He is extremely good at explaining, making things very easy to understand.  The exams are straight-forward, but they do require a little textbook reading out of class to recognize a couple of the reactions.  This class requires A LOT A LOT A LOT of memorization.
                
                   Dr. Waas was in his first semester at TAMU when I took this course, but he didn't let that stop him from showing his enthusiasm for both the university and organic chemistry. He is available to help outside of class, and genuinely cares about his students' success. He curves tests if need be to help students out.
                
                   He cares about chemistry and learning, but it is definitely not a memorization class.
                
                   He's great, and I hear one of the easier ones. But O Chem is still tough. So go to his office hours, do all of the owl homework.
                
                   A nice guy who wants his students to learn. The downfall of this is that you can't get above a C with memory. Beware the short answer qs. He emphasizes being able to understand the concepts to the point where you can solve anything he throws at you. He doesn't provide tables for the different reactions and can be a bit scatter brained at times.
                
                   Okay so I don't usually rate profs but this guy is an underdog. If you're taking Ochem I, take him! I literally made B's and A's on his first two tests even though Test 3 & 4 are a bit more challenging but it's expected. The tests are straightforward and he's very understanding. Also he can be quirky but you'll get used to it. He's on your side!
                
                   Probably the best professor at A&M. Its naturally a hard class, but he does a great job in explaining concepts. He's very animated in lecture so its easy to stay awake and interested in the material. If you can take his class, but just remember that OChem is still hard so you'll have to work. 
                
                   Watanabe is amazing!!! She totally understands that organic chemistry is not everyone's thing and is always helping and motivating you the whole semester. She assigns homework that is a completion grade, which really helps out your overall grade. She also takes points for attendance. She does weekend reviews herself to help you out. TAKE HER 
                
                   Dr. Watanabe was a great professor.  Almost every kid came to class, because her tests come from her lectures, not the book.  
                
                   Dr. Watanabe understands that OChem is hard and does a lot to help students through it. There are review sessions on most non lecture days, the homework is graded for completion, the exams were fair and included extra credit problems & the grades are curved. She is articulate and easy to understand. Her class also prepares you for MCATDAT and BICH
                
                   Watanabe is awesome. Her lectures are very interesting and she is very passionate. Her notes are pretty straight forward and are just like her exams. As long as you show up, participate, and do the homework, it free points to help grade. She taks attendance. And just practice her notes and you should do very well.
                
                   The class is tough but she understands, she gives great curves and her homework is basically just to up your grade. Do the homework and study, if you try, you'll do well.
                
                   Kenny is an awesome prof. He is very helpful and easy to get along with. He grades very fairly and tells you exactly what he looks for on DRAs. Office hours make ALL the difference. Easy A if you take the time to go to office hours. I would defiantly recommend him to anyone taking this class.
                
                   I suck at Chemistry. However, Williamson is a good instructor and provides the resources you need to pass. The only problem I had with her class was the tests. She would give you a really old "formula sheet" and sometimes you didn't even need half the info on it. Overall, study and go to class. You will regret it if you don't!
                
                   I personally don't think the good word is true. She teaches the class like we are in middle school. Maybe if used half the time she spends doing "demos" and clicker questions to actually teach chemistry we wouldn't be a chapter behind Bethel's class less than halfway through the semester.
                
                   Dr. Williamson's class convinced me to switch my major from bio to chem. She's super helpful and really wants her students to succeed. Her practice tests are pretty close to her actual exams. Go to class because she has clicker questions. She also has extra assignments that help boost your grade. I recommend her 100%. You will not be disappointed.
                
                   I though she was overrated. Her tests difficult. A lot different than the practice tests she posted. She lectured well and included tons of examples Pulled out a B with the help of Aplus and lots of studying. It's a hard course but she's apparently the best out there compared to the rest.
                
                   Dr. Williamson is a gem of a professor. She perfectly balances keeping material challenging with keeping the tests passable. She is also an incredibly sweet person - always being there for students, and never making you feel stupid for not understanding the material. My advice: do her homework and take her advice.  She is amazing; you'll love her!
                
                   She is a wonderful professor who really tries to help her students. Go to class, although it is not mandatory, there are "clicker questions" for points and she is entertaining.
                
                   In the beginning of the semester I used to call her Ickie Vickie, only because I failed my first test. After that i realized how college isn't like high school and you need to work for it, so I did and went to A+ and did all my homework. After all the hard work I ended up making an A in her class. She is the best Chem teacher and truly cares.
                
                   Really clear, fun, & easy (especially if you took AP Chem in HS). Tests are a bit harder than what we get in class and on sample tests, but sample tests are really good to study with. Her office hours are nice. She always does demos for real life application. She's been doing this for a long time. I only had to spend about 1hr/wk for this class.
                
                   Williamson ROCKS! Take her. Take her. Take her. There's no one else that teaches CHEM 101 as well as her! I didn't go to any tutoring agency off campus, and made A's on all tests! You'll have MindTap homework due every Sunday, but it's not bad! Her office hours are so helpful! ALWAYS do the sample exams before tests!!
                
                   I loved Professor Williamson so much, I'm taking her for 102! She's very clear about what material will be on the exams, she doesn't assign too much homework (it's all online), and she's super sweet. Can't say enough good things about her. Take the class alongside A+ Tutoring!!! Do the exam reviews and the homework, and you should be fine. 
                
                   She is an incredibly nice woman and her class was very manageable. Homework and assignments were very doable and her class is made to help those who struggle with chemistry. I took this class alongside A+ Tutoring and it definitely HELPED A LOT. Overall, Williamson was very helpful and I enjoyed her class a lot would definitely take again. 
                
                   I loved having her as my professor. Her homework is very easy and manageable. She is always organized and prepared for class. Her mock tests are so helpful and usually are very very similar to the actual tests. She's also really funny and very friendly. I would definitely take one of her classes again.
                
                   she is a great professor. chemistry is a hard subject but she helps in any way possible and to break it down. she always has an experiment to do in class to help you remember what we learned in class. i love her. 
                
                   Lots of homework but does what she can to make the class easy. Clicker points everyday so attendance is super important.
                
                   Professor Williamson is awesome!! I had a really bad high school experience with chemistry, meaning I took Chem 101 with no chemistry background at all.  I went to her office hours all the time and she was always super helpful. She does demos at the beginning of class and makes the class fun and interesting.  I would definitely take her class again
                
                   Dr. Williamson is such a cute woman! She gives great lectures and uses clicker points every class. She gives a lot of homework and other outside assignments, but as long as you stay on top of them, they aren't too bad. Her tests are a bit tricky on wording so be careful, but she still is the best chem professor here.
                
                   Dr. Williamson is a fair professor. She keeps her lectures engaging by having little experiments in class. Homework is weekly usually due Sunday's. Homework helps a lot when it comes to learning the material. Her exams aren't hard at all. She is hands down the best chemistry professor A&M has.
                
                   easiest chem prof. recommend going to A+ along with her lectures
                
                   She is awesome prof, the best chem prof in all of A&M, will fight for a sport in her chem102 class! Her tests are hard but the subject is hard and be very aware of the wording on the tests the number one reason to fail her test is not reading what the question is asking, otherwise class really isn't hard. Does demos every class and is the best!!!
                
                   She is very enthusiastic about what she teachers. The lectures often have boring material but she spices things up with whacky experiments that relate to the slide show. Tests are very similar to the review. Homework is easy and there is lots of extra credit. I highly recommend taking her. It's an easy A and she's genuinely nice and helpful.
                
                   She refused to answer questions and instead sighed and rolled her eyes, which is worrying when you're asking about using harsh chemicals. Grading was  arbitrary--after we got our papers back we found we got different grades for the same answer. When you ask her to explain why you were deducted points, she won't tell you. I want a refund for tuition
                
                   Class not good.
                
                   Worst professor ever. Is not fair on grading of homework either. Completely turned me away from the chemistry field. Do not recommend.
                
                   He is the worst teacher I have ever had.  The test are nothing like what he tells us to study for.  Some of the things on the test are things nobody has ever heard of.
                
                   maybe it was b/c it was only an integrated science teacher but all he did was read from the book and yet still confused the heck out of me; I was making Cs and Ds on his tests until I stopped going to class and just started teaching myself; then I started making As and Bs; I ended up with a B overall
                
                   1.)Repeatedly has cell phone go off in class and never apologises. 2.)Students are required to buy collection of old tests which is worthless since it contains no answer key. 3.)LOST TEST GRADES and expressed no apology or embarasment about it. 4.)Often completely misundersunds students questions.
                
                   He is the best chem teacher you will ever have at TAMU and thats not a joke!  U will fail at banargee and Jang, only because you cant understand their methods.  Ashley is clear and always willing to help his students!  He's the best!
                
                   This will without a doubt be the best chemistry professor I will ever have.  He is a busy man but is always willing to answer questions if you can catch him.  His vitae can be found at: http://www7.tamu-commerce.edu/chemistry/Faculty/Ashley/Vitae%20Ashlet.html
                
                   He is probably the best Chemistry teacher ever, I had him for Chemical Calculation, and he can explain everything on a level you can understand. He is also the head of the Chemistry department! He is AWESOME!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This professor is very helpful and is a great teacher.
                
                   He's a great professor. He made sure to go over examples while lecturing to make sure you understand what he's teaching you. The class is not easy, by far. There is a lot of studying involved. But whatever he tells you to study, study it and you'll pass. If I had to take chemistry again, I would take the one he's teaching!
                
                   He is a very helpful and knows his stuff. If you want to get easy A, don't take this. If you are trying to learn, then take him.
                
                   Dr. Angel teaches upper-end chemistry classes (quantitative analysis and a grad course - took both).  It's hard work, period.  Labs suck, no matter the class, get over it.  Study more than the night before the test and you will be fine.  Good guy, helpful, but will chide you if you are slacking. Knows his research too.
                
                   Great professor but very challenging. Tests are extremely difficult, but if you go to SI's then they are not that bad. Do the homework and keep a positive attutude. Don't drop unless you talk to him first bc your final grade might surprise you. Best of Luck! (Ask Alexandra for help she's wonderful!)
                
                   He's hard to understand. When I walked out of the class I felt like I didn't know any more than when I walked in. His tests are hard and you really have to teach the material to yourself.
                
                   Good Professor, alittle scatter brained at times. Test can be very hard
                
                   I recommend getting a translator before you register for his class.
                
                   He is a great teacher, he can really help you to understand the concepts, but you really have to listen to him because his language is hard to understand (but you will get used to it). I give him an A+++
                
                   Dr. Banerjee is very difficult to understand.
                
                   communication skills are poor, very educated, but if he cant tell me what he is thinking it means nothing
                
                   I thought he was a pretty good teacher.  I understood the lectures and did pretty well overall in the class.  Alot of people complained, but like the first comment said, those were the people who either never came to class or were just too lazy to read.
                
                   If you have any background in chemistry, his class is very easy.  He is very nice and helpful.  The people who complain in the class are generally just lazy and don't want to have to pick up a book to figure things out.
                
                   Banerjee's lectures are long on trivial content and short on substance.
                
                   I feel sorry for him - he's so insecure about his communication skills, he repeats over and over.  But I get a lot from his lectures BECAUSE he repeats himself.  On the other hand, his lab assistant, Jason, is the poorest example of a teacher ever!
                
                   takes 10 minute to get one sentence through.  enough said there.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is the worst teacher I have ever had.  He hates questions, and never used a lesson plan.  It is such a shame, he is brillant but he can not teach.
                
                   If you can understand him, his wisecracks will drive you nuts.  Hope you have a long attention span because he goes all the way around the point before hetting to it.
                
                   you cannot understand him.  if you attempt to answer a question you will not win.  take someone else.
                
                   if you have to take chem, i would wait until another teacher is teaching. You would do better by bascically teaching yourself.
                
                   This guy sucks!  He absoulutely hates women, and won't answer anyone's questions.  If you have this guy you should drop and take Nixon or some other ENGLISH speaking professor!!
                
                   e man cant speak english, he wont aswer questions and if you dare to ask he acts like an arse.
                
                   THe man cant speak a word of english and when you ask him a question he gets mad and is an ass about answering. dont take him!!!
                
                   Dr. Jang has a good heart. He tries his best to help his students succeed. Chemistry in general is a difficult concept, so yes expect to study a lot. 
                
                   Nice guy and is pretty helpful if you take the time to see him after class or go to his office hours. However, I found him to be a rather poor teacher overall because his accent makes it very hard to keep up with the subject matter being discussed at times. He is also not very good at interpratating what a person is trying to ask in a question. 
                
                   mAN WITH A GREAT HEART, BELIEVES IN PEOPLE GIVES CHANCES.
                
                   Extremely helpful.People say he shows partiality, but he is not.A person with a very kind heart.Not many students like physical chemistry but he is good at it. His english is understandable and clarifies doubts at any time.Gives students financial support and helps as maximum as possible. Overall he desrves to be the head of the department.
                
                   Supports the students as best as he could(If they are from Chinese origin). As a head of the department he never treat all the students equally. A racial criticism is perfectly shown by him.
                
                   People say he has horrible English, but I had no trouble understanding him. If you go to his office hours, he's very helpful. What you put into the course is what you will get out of it. If you're not up for a challenge and don't have the brains or work ethic to match, then don't take his class. But if you wanna learn, this this is the prof for u.
                
                   U r ur own teacher. Not him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   tough but likeable guy. VERY helpful if you go to him for help outside of class.
                
                   You better sit down and teach yourself if you want to pass his class because all he does is read his power points to you in class....and doesn't touch example test problems just expects you to work on them and figure it out yourself before the test.
                
                   He grew up in a Taiwan and speaks english probably better than any Texan going to Taiwan and trying to speek Chinese.Alot of people have given him a bad review probably because they were dumb enough to think Chemistry is an easy subject.He really wants his students to do well.I would take him again.
                
                   Worst teacher I've ever had. Totally unhelpful, I had to drop/pass because I had gone through half the semester and not learned a single thing. Awful.
                
                   really nice guy and every dhelpfuol. Tests were easy if youstudy. If you don't belong in college then you won't do well.
                
                   teaches straight from power point and hardly takes class time to review example problems.  He has very high expectations and what you earn is what you make(no learning curve).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I could not understand what he was saying, he doesn't give you time to take down notes, his test are hard, and very long for a 50 minute class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Most people I talked to  were failing or close to it. a group of people had complained and an auditor was brought in. She promptly gave everyone a 10% curve after that. Her notes are  unorganized and shes incredibly unhelpful when you ask her questions. Avoid if possible, if you have to take her, study study study!Gen chem was less brutal.
                
                   She is not understanding, will not admit clear mistakes, and she does not teach well in general. Avoid at all costs.
                
                   Very sweet and knowledgeable lady. Language barrier isn't terrible. The barrier is almost disabling from Lab Aids. PPT isn't the best thing to learn from, but you have to tell her what you want. She's not a mindreader! She'll provide it within reason: copies of PPTs, quizes & tests, etc. 4 tests + final. 1 quiz per chap. HW ea. class. Drops 1 test.
                
                   Hard to understand...not able to relate to the students.  Her tests are impossible.  She does curve at the end or everyone would have failed.
                
                   HORRIBLE class. She can barely speak English, moves through the Power Point way to fast for notes to be taken, and her handwriting is near impossible to read. This is an impossible learning environment and I am a Pre-Medical major with 94 hours of 4.0 GPA.  The professor is regularly absent from the classroom (3 times in the 1st 3 wks).
                
                   I will always remember the Great George Nixon!  One of my best professors
                
                   Extremely moody with a bad attitude. Teaches important stuff just in an unorganized manner. He just needs to fine tune his lessons.
                
                   He is HARD, seems MEAN, diffcult... but he is one of the BEST teacher you will have in this UNIVERSITY. HE CARES! He wants you to succeed & make something of yourself. He is on your side as long as you work hard. He is also you well-wisher. He also knows how to explain & teach. God Bless Him.
                
                   Nixon is an ass for the first week. He tells you half the class will not pass and the other half will be dropped by the end of the semester. He is by far the coolest professor i have ever had. He is not an easy professor, but he is a great man. The type I would drink a beer with.
                
                   Hard class Hard tests the only interesting things he teaches has nothing to do with the class lab is totally different and easy, I told him I wanted to drop and he gave me a C.
                
                   very hard did not learn anything
                
                   Dr. Nixon is a really good teacher, he is very helpful but very strict in the class room setting.  Even though he might be strict, he is still a very friendly man outside of class and always willing to help you.
                
                   very intimidating guy but really seems to care for his students
                
                   you earn your sripes in general nixons class their is no ****.
                
                   He's the best professor on the entire campus. He makes the class tough so that you will learn something. He takes the time out of his schedule to take care of his students. If you just study and do your homework you will do fine in the class your taking w/ him!
                
                   nixon is tough, but you truely learn from his class. the material has a way of just staying with you. if you want to pursue a profession in medicine or chemistry, this is the teacher to take it from.
                
                   Great teacher.  HE really has a desire for his students to succeed. Come to class, take the notes, attend your labs and you will be fine.  Enjoyed the class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Goes out of his way to help his students. Gotta love that in a professor.
                
                   Nixon is a great instructor.  He is willing to help you out anytime and he will always cut you a break if you truly make an effort.  I learned a lot in the class.
                
                   When I went to him for help he recommended that I go home and raise children instead of going to college.
                
                   His lectures have depth and breadth.  He's tough as a drill sergeant but if you need to be good at chemistry, he's your man.
                
                   He knows his S
                
                   He is a hard teacher. But he is always there to help you.
                
                   I have not had this professor but have heard from seveal students that he is a great professor.  I was very disappointed when I found out he was not teaching Chem 111!  They need him to teach 111 if they want to keep chem. majors instead of Banerjee!
                
                   Starnes is the best and definitely gave me a deeper passion for school and science. I took the best notes in his class! Pay attention, take notes and you will do well in his class!
                
                   Best chemistry professor in the world!
                
                   Dr. Starnes cares about his students- and it is visible. If you don't take notes, good luck doing well on exams. He assigns online homeworks that can help you a lot for your final grade! God bless this professor for giving us so many opportunities to have higher grades (drops lowest test grade & lowest homework grade, gives extra credit, and more!)
                
                   His lectures are great, he is very clear and easy to follow and learn from! Very fair grader and offers extra credit opportunities. Always available to help or explain. He loves to teach and and is always prepared for class. He won't put anything on the test that he didn't lecture over. He doesn't grade attendance, but you get lost if you miss. 
                
                   Starnes lacks enthusiasmpassion for course material which makes it hard to be interested as a student. Assigns a textbook but does not use it as a guide for lecture or assign homework from it. Tests took longer than 2 hours to complete and would include around 20-30 questions from each section so tests would have 100+ questions total. 
                
                   Dr. Starnes came up to Alaska this summer to teach an accelerated course in OChem II.  Let me just say, you guys are lucky! I have never had a better professor.  Offers plenty of help outside of class.  Exams came directly from lecture and worksheets.  We had a different text from what he typically uses but it didn't matter b/c I never opened it.
                
                   The absolute professor. He is the most hard working professor I had ever seen in my entire life. As a graduate student I am lucky enough to share his knowledge in class as well as research lab. Some one said he is late to class, yes he does, because of his schedule, which is so tight. Thanks for Texas A&M to have Dr.Starnes in here.
                
                   I have taken Dr. Starnes for gen chem 111 and 112 as well as o chem 211 and 212. In General I would have said do not take him but now that I have gotten into ochem he is an amazing professor. The tutorial that he also teaches helps. with the tutorial worksheets and quizes he gets keys out so that you can use that to study. one bad thing is that alo
                
                   Easily the best instructor I have ever had. His class isn't easy, nor is it intended to be; you must work for your grade.  With that being said, Dr. S. gives you all the tools necessary (great lectures, old exams, quizzes, tutorials, etc.) to succeed in his class. He has made O-Chem my fav class in college thus far. Chem/bio/pre-whatev&#63; Take Dr. S!
                
                   The best professor ever. Organic chemistry is not an easy material but he makes it as easy and as undrstandable as possible.If you show up to class and take good notes you will have all the knowledge you need in that course in my opinion. If you fail this class it's your own laziness.
                
                   This guy is always late to class (5-10 minutes everyday) He only teaches to the first two rows. He writes quickly and sloppy. He only gave us 25 minutes or so to take the first quiz due to his tardiness. He offers no help in or outside of class. He offers no extra credit options. I would definitely not take this professor.
                
                   Amazing professor. Had for organic chemistry 211 and 212 and it was two of the best classes. He knows what he is talking about. Always went out of his way to ensure that we learned the material. What I learned helped me sufficiently prepare for the MCAT. He may teach fast at times, but will slow down if needed. GREAT PROFESSOR!!
                
                   Amazing professor. Had for organic chemistry 211 and 212 and it was two of the best classes. He knows what he is talking about. Always went out of his way to ensure that we learned the material. What I learned helped me sufficiently prepare for the MCAT. He may teach fast at times, but will slow down if needed. GREAT PROFESSOR!!
                
                   Dr. Starnes is an amazing professor. I have never seen any one that is so dedicated in helping students. The class is hard but he is there all the way to make it easier on students. For students that are thinking of taking MCAT, you will not be ashamed of your knowledge. Dr. Starnes is amazing. Just follow what say is neccessary.
                
                   He's the PERFECT PROFESSOR!!!!!
                
                   She's a pretty sweet woman. She tries hard but puts us through a lot. Online HW and reading turns into a 3 hour process, easily. I loved chemistry and SECOND SEMESTER LAB IS MUCH BETTER THAN FIRST! PLEASE DO NOT STRESS OUT ABOUT FIRST SEMESTER LAB!!! IT DOES GET BETTER
                
                   Overall a great professor. Many students complain about her accent, but personally I understand everything she explains in lecture and so do many other students i've asked. She's great at explaining topics and genuinely cares about her students and will do everything she can to help if you put in the effort. She's also goofy and makes me laugh.
                
                   She is a good professor but very hard to understand when she talks! She has a super thick accent. Chemistry was not my thing so I struggled a lot in this course! STUDY STUDY STUDY CASA WILL BE YOUR BEST FRIEND
                
                   She's one of the better professors at TAMUCC. Honestly you don't even need a textbook. Everything she wants you to know, she'll talk about. She really cares and will help you succeed. 
                
                   Just do the assigned homework and go to class.  She is a great teacher, you just need to get used to her accent.
                
                   She is a great chemistry professor.
                
                   She's awesome, go to class and the practice problems she assigns and you'll do really well in the class!
                
                   DO NOT BUY TEXTBOOK she doesnt use at all. Make sure you attend class, skipping one day and set you back a lot. Subject is difficult in general but she provides you with tons of tools to succeed. MAKE SURE YOU GET HELP WHEN YOU FIRST NEED IT... itll help you in the long wrong. I hate chem and made a C in her class
                
                   DO NOT CHOOSE HER UNLESS YOU WANT TO FAIL!!! She has a strong accent, raises her voice all the time in class which make it difficult to follow. Her class is getting much difficult through semester. She does give practice exam, but do not expect to much from it. Exams are much more harder. She does not make herself clear in explaining the lesson.
                
                   So hard to understand :( and when i asked her for help in class, it was even harder to understand, i don't even think she understood me. Recommend going to the SI sessions instead of her class. She is not helpful at all!!!
                
                   She is hard to understand but if you just do the work that is on blackboard then you will be fine when it comes to taking the test. I highly recommend taking her. I was scared at first but now I actually like Chem because of her. I didn't even by a textbook. I learned everything off of the material she gives us online.
                
                   Ive been to 3 different universities, and Prof. Billiot is easily the best professor ive ever had. She makes chem interesting!! shes funny and helps out alot. I HIGHLY recommend taking her class!
                
                   She had an accent, you get used to it. Don't make it hard on yourself just print the material from blackboard before class and study that, what is on there is exactly on tests. Go to the Si-sessions if you need help understanding.
                
                   She's extremely helpful and gives you a lot of opportunities to make up bad grades. Not always easy to understand, but she practically yells her lectures so you will never fall asleep. Most of the problems on her tests are identical to ones that she posts on Blackboard, so if you do the problems there you will be fine.
                
                   The class is math based take algebra first at least. I struggled but she was a very approachable and helpful teacher! I liked her class because you can tell she is passionate about her job. Tests are VERY similar to in class quizzes and quizzes on blackboard. I got a B in her class. Awesome teacher. Now I am a Chem minor and love it because of her.
                
                   Very hard to understand due to thick accent, poor organization and presentation of material
                
                   A heart-stirring person. Only 4 tests,no homework,no attendence,. At present, I get 2 full marks in exam I&II. Same blackboard practise questions appear in major test. She will give quizs in the class as extra credits.
                
                   She's really great about giving you opportunities to make extra points, (quizzes! so make sure you go unlike myself) She also uses great examples and makes chemistry easier to understand.
                
                   For her first three exams, she allows you to use notecards and most of the material is from Blackboard handouts and the quizzes. BUT her final is HORRIBLE! She puts nothing that you've seen before on there! SO WATCH OUT!...but she lets you use as many notecards as you want.
                
                   Best professors our school has to offer. Her accent may not be english, and after a few weeks you get used to it. There is no reason to fail this class, then something is wrong with you.
                
                   This professor, while being extremely intimidating, knows his stuff and will help you if you need it. This class isn't easy and it shouldn't be. He makes sure you know the material so you can do well later on. It may seem like there is no hope of passing early in the semester and I felt the same way, but I ended up with an A, so don't sweat it.
                
                   His teaching style is different than most professors. The way he teaches actually makes the students learn, but they need to want to learn and put the effort in. His class is a challenge and if you are willing to learn & accept the challenge you will do fine. 
                
                   don't take it with him unless you want to loose your money and get bad grades. he gets mad from any question he is asked. he speaks not clear and has hard accent. you can't talk to him about questions homework exams. not understandable PowerPoint. 
                
                   I took Dr. Coeckelenbergh  for Chem 2 and it was my 2nd time taking the course, 1st time at TAMUCC. I haven't finished the class yet but I feel confident that I'll get a high B or and A. He allows you to bring 10 pages of hand written notes to each test. our first test had a class avg of 35. He cares more about the learning process than grades.
                
                   So regretful 
                
                   I was weary at first bc of the other reviews but I really enjoyed him! He gives HW quizzes that you can copy from your notes. Each exam you can use notes! He is very intelligent and it pushes some people away. He is very helpful IF you ask for it. He has 0 tolerance for even looking at your phone. Has a French accent but I would take him again!
                
                   This is a pretty difficult course. His tests are not very many questions, but they are all free response. If you go to class and do the quizzes and homework you won't fail, but if you apply yourself as much as possible and do well on your final, you should get a decent grade in the class. I managed to pull of an A, it isnt impossible.
                
                   Very math based. He is very knowledgeable but sucks at explaining concepts and mumbles all the time. I took Gen chem 2 in summer and it wasn't bad but a lot of work trying to learn by yourself. Do the homework and you should be able to pass.
                
                   He was very knowledgeable about what he was teaching. That being said, he expected students to keep up with his fast pace. If you didn't understand the material, you fell behind. A lot of the time, he had a hard time explaining things such as answers to student questions. He was lenient on homework; if you showed an effort, you got all points.
                
                   He's a rough teacher, accent, mumbles and thinks he's superior to all. Probably one of my favorite profs You're in college! Expect a challenge! people who rate him bad are ones who failed because they are lazy and refused to study. I loved his class and learned ALOT. If you need to pass, get a different teacher. If you want a challenge, take him.
                
                   Take this class if you like to suffer and fail. The great problem is that he expects you to know a great deal more than what you actually know coming in. His explanations are fast and he often does not give examples, which I think are necessary to absorb it. If you do take him, make sure you have him in the lab. I made an A, so it's still possible.
                
                   Extremely difficult summer course. He makes himself available for students, but it doesn't matter because he doesn't explain things well. No attendance grade but there is daily homework and you will be lost without the reviews. You should take a Physics I course before you take this class. Definitely knows what he's talking about, though.
                
                   Great professor! Wants you to learn, more than willing to help, be prepared to do the work if you take him! One of the few professors on this campus I actually learned something from...
                
                   He's nice and he wants to help but he can't explain himself very well and he expects you to come in knowing a lot more than you already do.
                
                   He cares too much about the formulas rather than the actual chemical knowledge.
                
                   He thinks a class average of 45% is good. He says you can work problems out however you want as long as you show your work, but then takes points off if you do so (even when you got everything correct).  My GPA until this class was a 3.85- I'm not a slacker. Yet I will get a C if I'm lucky. That is what he expects if you go to 4 SI sessions a week.
                
                   I had him for chemistry lab and he is a great instructor! As long as you do the summary and lab reports, you will do fine. However, if you do not do your work properly he will won't help you with your work.
                
                   Very difficult.  Well over half the class ended up with a C or lower.  3 As and 3 Bs out of 49 students - it is obvious he doesn't teach and he doesn't care.  Horrible.
                
                   Be prepared to do some serious work outside of class because answers are rarely given on homework.  Teaches conceptual which is good instead of looking at chemistry as a single math problem.  Though his course is tough, he is the most approachable professor I've ever had and always willing to help outside of class.
                
                   Easy teaching style. Do every single lab report. Do GOOD on the lab reports. Very easy.
                
                   worst teacher ive ever had, hands down.rude, not helpful, doesnt care about his students.avoid at all costs
                
                   Very difficult, doesn't explain anything. Rude when you ask for help, expects you to know everything when he hasn't explained it.
                
                   He expects us to already know all of the material we haven't even been taught. Not helpful at all. Was so rude when asked for help. Grading is terrible. Do not take!
                
                   Really Hard. Good teacher. REALLY HARD, LOTS of reading, you'll have to teach yourself.
                
                   If you see this man on your schedule for lab, just drop the class. I tried writing a review that described how he has no sense of consistency in grading or ability to remember anything longer than two minutes, but I had no room. Talking to him in his office is like talking to a brick wall. Nothing will help you. I can only offer my condolences.
                
                   Have had this professor for lab and classes. I think the reviews that are negative are probably due to a lack of putting in the time needed. He is very helpful and WILL always take the time to explain things to you. If you are going to ask questions at least attempt to answer on your own so that you can ask the right questions. Great professor!
                
                   He can be difficult to understand because he expects you to know material taught in previous classes. If you've forgotten what you were supposed to learn, you should refresh before taking a class by him. He is *extremely* nice  and very helpful if you ask him for help. He expects you to THINK, which is honestly a first for me at this university.
                
                   He's not that bad. You HAVE TO put in EFFORT to this lab. READ the ONLINE textbook, no normal book this sem. Work on the next lab at least 3 days before lab. Actually learn something from it. You have to pretend your a Chemist. The reports are like stories, what happened in lab? Did the test fail or succeed? Why/How? Use formulas and graphs. Bam. A
                
                   Not as bad as he's made out to be. His lecture style can sometimes be incomprehensible but talk to him outside of class and he a nice guy willing to help. Though if you take this class be prepared to do a lot of solo studying if you want to grasp the material.
                
                   Awful. Have him for O Chem Lab--terrible, not very nice, doesn't really tell you what he wants and takes off for stupid stuff. If you're taking O Chem lab, take someone else!!!!
                
                   In Organic Chem 1 Lab, he was rather pretentious and not helpful towards any student. DO AVOID THIS MAN AT ALL COSTS! WOrd TO WISE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   Ok, I am a &quot;biomed monster&quot; in his class and I spend countless hours of my life trying to understand the concepts in his class. Egan will post a question then spend an hour debating whether or not his answer is right, without ever coming to a conclusion. I have learned nothing in his class despite my best efforts. Last class test avg was a 22/100.
                
                   Just kidding. This class is awful, and in conjunction with Microbiology, will probably make your eyes bleed. If you are a self-taught type learner, then this is the class for you. Otherwise, good luck, and get to know your S.I. instructor VERY well. Make sure OWL and Lab are solid.
                
                   In the class right now. Ochem is not an easy subject, and most people in the class are a bunch of biomedical grade point monsters who are used to memorizing facts versus learning concepts. Make use of the S.I., do OWL, and go to his office hours, and you will do well. If you won't put work into it, then you won't do well- it's that simple.
                
                   hes the worst! He's always asking the student questions, and if they don't know the answer he moves on, WITHOUT ANSWERING IT. stinks at teaching!
                
                   Absolute worst teacher I've ever had in my college career. And I'm a chemistry major! This guy does not belong in front of a chalkboard. DO NOT TAKE ANY CLASS OF HIS!!!
                
                   You have got to be kidding me
                
                   This is his first semester and he seems really lost and has a hard time explaining things.  He assumes a lot and expects students to know everything. DO lots of practice problems and go to the TLC!!!!
                
                   This course really made me think and learn. I liked how she cared so much about my learning and that she was knowledgeable about the subject. She wrote down notes which helped me understand the material better.
                
                   Teaches a lot of information in a very short amount of time. Expect 4-6 pages of notes a day and you will be totally lost if you miss a day. Her examples actually confuse you more because she throws in new data in the middle of the problem. Her tests aren't hard per se, mostly you just haven't been taught well enough to understand.
                
                   Doesn't really "teach" anything, just jumps into a lesson and you have no idea how you got there.
                
                   Mrs. Lawson is an awesome lab instructor.  When you get to lab, you have to have your prelab out and ready to sign, but then she walks you through every step of the lab before you do it.  She's very helpful, and will assist you through whatever problem you're having in lab.  She's pretty funny sometimes too.
                
                   I took Larkin for 4401/4402. I got a B in 1 and a C in 2. Buy the study guide (VERY HELPFUL), and go over the notes. If you put in the work, you will do well. I got lazy in the second semester and my grades suffered. However the material is not impossible. Not a very exciting class, but Biochem 2 requires more work/memorization. Stay on top of it.
                
                   Good looking man but boring lectures... Study the notes and your set. Don't buy the book
                
                   Sr. Sem Chem. had to attend class every day for points, write an essay every week, and other things of that nature. He is very easy going in this class!
                
                   He tries&#63; but everyone is lost. Relies on his personal notes and not on if it makes sense to students. Doesn't transition from previous lectures to new. Exams seem quite unfair. Questions have mystery origins: lecture&#63; study guide&#63; text&#63; outside sources&#63; ridiculous. Professor is not worth your money. Little knowledge in return and excess frustratio
                
                   He's hot AND interesting! Use his excellent study guide and the tests will feel too easy. Great teacher.
                
                   he's hot, but nothing that comes out of his mouth is interesting.  Not too bad of a class though.  Well it's not like you have a choice, he's the only one who teaches it.
                
                   he is disorganized, and focuses too much on little details such as how to acess the homework and the resolution on the computer screen. he is a mess, but its kind of funny.
                
                   Uesed the book and takes time grading. He will go out of his way to help his students.
                
                   Uses the book and gave pratice test, which was helpful. But takes a time when grading.
                
                   He uses two books to help you understand what the required book does not give. Don't worry, he does hand out notes that are not in the book. He will go out of his way to help you with any Chemistry class. But he is a bit unorganized and takes a long time to grade h/w and test.
                
                   Not hard if you study. The quizzes on Blackboard are fairly easy, and you get multiple tries. There are a lot of OWLs, though, but they personally helped me study. You can print off his power points online. The quizzes and OWLs are a grade cushion :)
                
                   He isnt the easiest professor, however he is very knowledgeable. Took him for Ochem2 and he is a teacher you have to put alot of work in for a good grade. However he is more then willing to help you understand and work with you if you are willing to go see him.  Go see him after each exam, its what got me a B in the class..
                
                   Not recommend taking him. Talks about how things work in chemistry but doesn't show u, all he does is read off a powerpoint (with not much of an explanation). His classes are barely worth going to since you can just read them at home. The homework is crazy long, almost 100 Qs per ch. and it's not relevant to test. Felt lost & confused whole semestr
                
                   Organic chemistry is already difficult, but Cesar's accent makes it even harder.  His tests are way different from the things he tells you to study, so make sure you are capable of spending time learning something on your own, because he's not gonna help you.   
                
                   He reads of the PowerPoint and rarely does calculations on the board. I can read a PowerPoint. Does not seem surprised when over half of class fails his tests. You will have to do all the homework or you will not pass this class. Encourages students to come to office for extra help but when you go there are is always a long line of students waiting
                
                   Cesar was excellent as an Ochem lab professor.  However, for Ochem lecture, his exams are difficult and what he expects is often unclear. He gave us five exams during the summer, one of which was the day before our final, which was worth 50% of our grade, leaving us no time to adequately study for it. After the final, my grade dropped from B to F
                
                   Very strict about lab rules. Has set format on how the notebook should be written; will count off if notebook isn't in correct format. Really helpful professor.
                
                   Mendez was one of the more helpful lab instructors I have had. He explains the lab in a very easy way and he does a short review beforehand on the harder quizzes. Although he only graded 2 of my assignments he took off a lot more points for minor mistakes than the TA did. He can be funny, and likes to relate things to cheese sandwiches.
                
                   Picky about what is in the lab writeups, but you adjust pretty fast. Very easy grader otherwise. I think everyone in my class got an A
                
                   Makes it very confusing on what assignments are needed to turn in.  Tests and lab reports due every single class.  Gets easily frustrated and is not a fair grader.  I turned in more work than my partner and she got a 100 whereas I did not.
                
                   Mendez is super easy and makes lab quick and fun! If you can't make an A in this class you really should consider dropping out.
                
                   Very good lab proff. Easy grader, not picky with lab reports. Come to class, get an A. If you fail his class you should consider dropping out.
                
                   Great professor!!
                
                   Dr. Val is a terrific professor. He is reserved but very reliable. When I needed help, he was always available during office hours. He is skillful and knows his stuff. I'll be looking for him in my future class taking.
                
                   Warning do not take this class! His expectations are high and isn't clear on the assignments which leaves you confused. I'm an A student and couldn't stand the class because of how unclear he was. He is a nice guy though. If you take his class, I recommend you take your assignment in early to show him before turning it in.
                
                   Very soft spoken and sometimes hard to understand but was always willing to help, did not respond to my emails though.
                
                   Val is an overall wonderful professor. His class can be a little difficult, he is vague at times, but willing to help in office hours.
                
                   Dr. Val is an awesome professor who knows what he is talking about, and he is always willing to help students better understand the material. He expects you to really try to do the work.
                
                   Dr. Val is great! Geochem can be very challenging, but his door is almost always open for questions. However do not go in there expecting him to work out the whole problem for you. Try it out first before you go, he expects some effort on your part. His accent can be a little difficult at times, but just listen carefully and ask for clarification.
                
                   He is very soft spoken and has a confusing Romanian accent. Almost every question is a stupid question to him. Very vague about pre and post lab reports. Sometimes does not include procedure with info about the lab and still expects you to have a procedure ready when you come to class and still grades you on correctness and accuracy.
                
                   This guys awesome. Ive had him for around 2 months and so far one of my best teachers. 
                
                   Amazing professor!! Extremely kind-hearted, and is always willing to help you. Prepares you so well for the tests. 10/10, for sure! 
                
                   Learning material in his class can be challenging because of his dull voice. However, make the most of it and go to SI sessions. This is how I got through his class with an A. Also, he is very understanding and helpful, GO to his office hours for extra help. His lectures can be very boring. Do your homework for extra points on test.
                
                   really good professor:)
                
                   He lectures on what will be on the test. He gives power points over each chapter and also gives exam reviews. If you don't make a good grade in his class it's cause you didn't try or put in enough effort.
                
                   Good professor. Speaks clearly and teaches whats on the test. Easy homework and easy test. Get him if you can.
                
                   Owens is an extremely sweet professor. He is very understanding and willing to work with students who put forth the effort to make a good grade. He tries to make the material as interesting as possible and drops hints as to what's on the test. He also reviews material before exams. He's overall an amazing and kind-hearted professor.
                
                   Owens doesn't take attendance but he does give random quizzes, so attendance is important.  If you don't attend you probably won't do well.  He goes through the material slowly, which can be boring, but it makes it easier to keep up and understand.  He is very open to helping students, go to his office hours if you're struggling!
                
                   A funny, sweet man with good intentions. Attend an SI session every week and you'll be solid. 
                
                   By far the best professor I've ever had. Very caring and nice, and will always be willing to help you get an A! 
                
                   Amazing professor!! Extremely kind-hearted, and is always willing to help you. Prepares you so well for the tests. 10/10, for sure! 
                
                   Very boring and monotone.  Reads directly from the powerpoints all class long.  You will fall asleep at least once in this class.  If you attend his SI sessions, he will sprinkle his magical chemistry dust on your grade though to make sure you pass regardless of if you've really learned anything.  Tests very detailed.  Would not recommend.
                
                   Great professor. He got boring sometimes. I never made a test grade below 101. Do your homework and learnsmart assignments for bonus points. LOVED the class. Print his lecture notes online and use them to highlight during class.
                
                   Owens is an adorable old man & he makes a lot of cheesy jokes. The material is super boring so it's hard to make it interesting but he tries. His powerpoints are good & available online, he does a lot of sample problems in class. Only hard thing about the class is the online homework and actually paying attention. Also 7 pop quizzes but he drops 2!
                
                   His monotone voice tends to make lectures very boring, though all of the notes are posted online so apart from the occasional quiz you do not need to show up. Test are very easy. The only thing about this class that is awful is the McGraw Hill homework. the online homework is really boring and caused me to get a B when I had A+ on all my test. 
                
                   Owens is an okay teacher. Just make sure you sit in front because he talks very low. Try not to fall asleep too... I attend S.I sessions so Im able to pass the class.. without those I dont think I would have passed. Its not that hes a bad gay, just a poor teacher.
                
                   Great Teacher! All you have to do is sit in front and listen to him. He is easily one of the nicest teachers so you can always ask him for help.
                
                   Has a monotone voice when lecturing so hard to focus during class, not an easy class if Chem isn't your thing but with tutoring and doing homework you can pass
                
                   I didn't try very hard and I received a B. If I had tried to study a little more, I would have gotten an A. He had 5 pop quizzes, which is why I came to class. He's a good teacher. The tests are mostly math based.
                
                   I loved this class! Extremely boring material but wonderful GPA builder.  he tells you exactly what is going to be on the test. Just show up for review day and test!
                
                   Get to know him personally, sit in the front and give him some ammo to work with  his lectures. Great guy, was in the NAVY, get a Tutor. It helped me barely get a B. Textbook not in use anymore that I had but I expect more of the same. Pay attention to his hints and review (85%) of tests he will basically spell out for you. He will probably bump up
                
                   Prof. Ownes is a very nice man and wants to be helpful.  I will say that after lecture I basically had to go home re-read everything he went over and then attempt sample problems on my own.  I didn't follow him in lecture very well and I don't think he was very good at explaining things.  However, if you go to the SI sessions, he was super helpful.
                
                   Very nice man.  Be prepared to study a lot and would recommend getting to know him personally.
                
                   Very nice man willing to help in any way.  What he lacks in teaching skills he makes up for in curving.  Really gives every chance to learn the material and get an A. It is chemistry after all so keeping up with the material and not falling behind is important. I would recommend taking the class with him. Study a lot and get to know him personally
                
                   Okay, the class is a little hard but if you put the work in, do the homework, and study, you'll get an A. He curves grades at the end. You just have to actually work, not just expect him to tell you everything. This is college, after all. He's a really sweet man!
                
                   Worst class i've ever taken in my life..i'm currently taking it..the lectures are a snoozefest.. he uses the word UHH after every word and his tests are very hard especially because he teaches absolutely nothing!!! definitely a self taught class for sure....GOODLUCK
                
                   I WAS IN CHEM 2 AND ALL YOU HAVE TO DO IS MEMORIZE THE QUESTIONS IN THE HOMEWORK... THEY ARETHE SAME FOR THE EXAMS NO JOKE!!!
                
                   He is the real educator who is friendly and really want to help you succeed. His class is interesting, Test& Quiz is straight forwards to each exam. if you study, the A is secure. Moreover, he can really help you have better comprehension of chemistry from concepts and math. Strongly recommended.
                
                   The guy's really nice and the exams are nearly identical to the quizzes.
                
                   Had Dr.Munshi for o.chem II lab and he was/still is one of my favorite professors on campus. He is SO enthusiastic and passionate about what he does. He loves explaining things if you don't understand. Not a difficult class if you aren't completely lazy. Definitely taking his drugs and toxins class next year!
                
                   The class is beyond easy, work on the quizzes and reflect off the notes. Hint: If you can master his quizzes, the same questions appear on tests with answers being flipped in different order. The test consist of questions from quizzes with only 5% being from the notes.
                
                   Will help you but very hard to understand but all quiz are on the computer
                
                   He genuinely cares about Chem and education. Initially, it's very hard to understand him, but you get used to it. If you don't understand something, he relishes the opportunity to explain it. I guarantee that he is more knowledgeable than any other chem prof here. If you want to actually learn and are willing to actually work, then he's for you.
                
                   I am extremely lost.READ THE SYLLABUS.He was very vague about the assignments that were mandatory, and he is very particular with the format of assignments.Lectures are monotone.Tests are over lecture material so pay attention. Gets mad if you leave during class.Stay on top of work and READ THE SYLLABUS!!!!!!!!!! and always follow his directions
                
                   Real hard to understand. He's a got the thickest indian accent I have ever heard. He passes out pages of notes for all his lectures and his test questions come mostly from them. By the middle of the spring semester, half my class had dropped. I'd find another professor before taking this one
                
                   He gave no homework, wrote out all the notes and posted them, and had three tests. I have heard O-chem was awful but he really engaged the class and made it enjoyable. He was very approachable, funny, "young-minded", and made this class amazing! 
                
                   He''s not a bad teacher when he''s actually explaining stuff but if you hope for him to lecture on what''s on the test you''re in for a dissappointment. You''re mostly gonna be figuring out things on your own unless you make it to SI. I hear he''s good for O-Chem but skip his Gen Chem class.
                
                   Had a very good way of tying in organic chemistry with real word experiences.
                
                   Dr. Olson is one of the greatest chem teachers I have come across! He is funny, polite, and most definitely knows his stuff! Take him and you will learn! Studying is a must but thats because the subject itself is kind of tough.
                
                   Great experience! I learned a lot doing Directed Independent Studies with Dr.Olson, you learn real lab experience. It's not like your Organic Lab or Gen Chem Lab. This experience will follow you all the way to graduate school and to a new career. Extremely recommend it.
                
                   He is an awesome instructor. Attendance is important, a book is not that important and all the exams are directly from the solution manual and his FREE notes. This class is hard but what Organic Chemistry class do you know of is easy? Hes an awesome instructor and you will enjoy his class.
                
                   The guy is a card carrying chemist! Great experience learning from someone who actually practices organic chemistry. Very enthusiastic. Learned so much after learning nothing with another instructor.
                
                   He was an awesome professor! Took him summer 1 and 2 and I was terrified of OCHEM. Did awesome both halves. He is a bit on the cocky side but I suppose its well deserved achieving all he has at his age. Best way to go for Ochem!
                
                   He was very easy to understand and made the concepts easy to grasp. His tests were quite difficult. I took it in the summer and even being at a fast pace I felt like I learned a lot from this his class.
                
                   Awesome professor. Very helpful.
                
                   Dr. Olson is extremely smart and is an awesome teacher. The only disadvantage is that your grades are only based on the tests and the lab portion. Otherwise, he is awesome and I highly recommend him!
                
                   He's awesome. Think outside the box in a 3 dimensional form and you can really get this. It's actually really fun if you make it like a game. Tests are multiple choice. Have fun with it. Ask questions, he gets excited when the class talks. Funny guy.
                
                   He talks really fast. So while you are trying to copy down notes before he goes on, you are trying at the same time to listen to what he is saying. Very hard to get the best out of both. Had to go to the book to understand anything that he taught in class.
                
                   His notes are very clear and easy to follow. Great professor, his funny chemistry jokes keep you awake. If you wanna learn a hard science from a physically appealing professor, take Dr. O!!
                
                   He is very clear and concise. His love for the subject helps understand it. He's also good looking so, another good reason to pay attention!:P
                
                   Had Dr. Olson for both O.chem I & II. He's a new professor but is really smart & enthusiastic  about this subject. His tests aren't too bad; mostly open ended but he'll give extra credit and curve it if necessary. He's super friendly & always offers to help outside of class if you're struggling. Nice guy and awesome class. Got an A & loved o.chem!
                
                   I had him for O Chem I, it is a very hard subject but if you go to talk to him or if you have an SI for the class make sure to talk with them when you don't understand something.  This subject builds upon what you learn so you need to make sure you understand.  Once the test comes back if you want to talk about your missed questions he will.
                
                   He was extremely nice and helpful, I would suggest him to anyone!
                
                   He is a great guy.
                
                   Excellent professor! This was my second time taking Chem and I got an A! His lectures are super easy to understand! I took this class in the summer and I would definitely recommend him! He does assign homework which is not a grade, but definitely recommend doing it! You will see questions on the test like that! 
                
                   I highly recommend Dr. Silliman. I enjoyed him after taking Chem 2 with him that I jumped at the opportunity to take him for Organic chemistry. He is approachable  if you need help understanding something. Organic can be difficult, but he breaks it down in a way that students can understand. If he taught Organic 2, I'd take him again.
                
                   This man is awesome. He is very clear and specific when teaching OCHEM. He draws out everything in the board and gives you the notes the day before. Although homework is optional be prepared to do it. 
                
                   May be able to teach general chemistry but has no idea how to teach organic chem!  Very unclear, seems unable to explain certain things and expects we come into the class knowing as much as him. Do NOT take his class for organic chem! He left us sitting there feeling stupid and helpless....  There's other professors much more qualified...
                
                   Grade for last post should not be A+.  Failed this class as did many others.  Could not pass a single one of these ridiculously hard tests.
                
                   Would not take another organic chemistry course taught by this professor.  Stands there in front of the camera writing hand-written notes and draws a few reactions.  He draws reaction mechanisms with barely any explanation.  When asked to explain, repeats the same thing again.  Thinks all students are PhD's and thinks we already should know it all.
                
                   Great teacher! makes it easy to understand, highly recommend!
                
                   I completely hated chemistry before taking this class, but Dr. Silliman explains the material in a way that anyone could understand. He is extremely helpful and as long as you do the homework and go to class you'll do well. I highly recommend this teacher! So glad he teaches o-chem
                
                   Where to start with Dr. Silliman, he is such a wonderful professor! He makes chemistry exciting and explains it perfectly. His tests are not hard, but you do have to study. Approachable! He will for sure help you if you have questions about anything. I highly recommend him
                
                   He is a great teacher. Best advice: Don't skip class, take notes, pay attention. Follow those three steps and you will do great.
                
                   He is not a good teacher
                
                   Absolutely love Dr. Silliman! One of the best professors the university has.
                
                   This is an easy class if you put in any effort. Go to class and copy the lecture notes. Everything you need for an A is on those notes. The group project is pretty easy and is done in pieces over the semester so it's not too much work at once. Dr. Silliman makes chemistry understandable and relatable for non-science people.
                
                   I hate chemistry! However, Dr. Silliman really made class enjoyable! He was very approachable, so he would definitely help out if you ever had questions. Overall, I would certainly recommend him to anyone!
                
                   I took this class in summer and it wasn't hard at all. Test are easy if you do the homework. Take him, he make chemistry easy to understand! Easy A, if you study .
                
                   best professor ever! had him for gen. chm 1 & 2 and was suuuuper happy when I found out that he's teaching organic chm! I don't study, and i don't do the homework and I made an easy B+. if you only do the homework he recommend then that A is yours!
                
                   Such a great professor, I Hate Chemisty but after I took his class, I now love chemistry, he made it so easy to understand, just dont miss a day of class or you will get behind and do the suggested homework, The class will be super easy if you just keep up with the work and take notes. Absolutley Great Professor! and hes hilarious
                
                   If you are an intelligent student and are very familiar with chemistry 1406 before taking this course,then you should do well. If chemistry is a weakness,don't choose Vassell. She does not make any specific efforts toward student help/support.Most likely, you will get ignored. Find someone who really cares because you care .
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Useless even going to class. But love the curves.
                
                   He gives a 20 point curve on every test! its an easy A, but you wont learn anything.  At leasst its a GPA booster!
                
                   Sweet man. Famous in the chemsitry world. Tests are pretty hard, but curves a lot.
                
                   Not easy to understand in lecture.  Book is most helpful.  He is not interested in spending time with you if you need help. Not sure about the curve yet but hear he curves well.  I hope so, our class average is below 50% if that tells you anything about his teaching and testing methods.  Tests are absolutely ridiculous!
                
                   Heavy curve on tests....completely useless in class.
                
                   I don't think I would have made it through Organic Chem if it weren't for Balaban's curves.  I'm not sure if it was his teaching methods, the material, or my complete lack of interest, but I didn't learn a darn thing in his classes.  It doesn't seem to have hurt me much, though!
                
                   Horrible teacher hard to understand. 1/2 way through the semester in 101 he decided we didn't need to know what we were supposed to learn and started teaching Organic Chemistry! The book was totally unhelpful and just as hard to understand as the teacher. I asked to met with him after class once and he left and never met with me. Don't take him!
                
                   he knows is stuff but hes very old and old fashion in his teaching techniques , well known for his research but easy if you fail him you seriously need help thats easy as it gets here
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Not a very good prof, but easy to get a good grade.  Old tests available in library with lots of repeated question.  Take him if you don't really care about actually learning the subject.  Curves quite a bit.  Not good at explaining things and hard to understand.  Not too hard to get an A or B in the class with minimal work.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Much better than Lesko, I thought. I made an A in his class after retaking it when I failed Lesko's.
                
                   You'll learn nothing but pass.  Under no circumstances take Lesko afterwards
                
                   He is not very clear and does not go over the information well. I never know whats going on in class. He does have practice material for all tests and quizes and they help tremendously on the tests. He curves a lot so low test scores are not a big deal.
                
                   Dr. Galan was an amazing prof to have for chem 101. She taught in a way that was easy to follow along with, and always did helpful problems on the board.  Usually once a week she would assign a problem at the end of class for extra credit, and that was her way of taking attendance as well. I would definitely take her again if possible.
                
                   I thought her class was amazing. Her lectures are clear. She usually works a problem in class and then you will work a similar problem (with partners if you prefer) to make sure you understand how to do it. I thought it was very helpful because it gives you immediate feedback and you see what you need to study right away. 
                
                   Dr. Galan was a really hard teacher and expects a lot out of her students. BUT! She helps out and is ubderstanding, one of the best people to learn from at TAMUG.
                
                   Reads straight from slides takes extra credit quizzes but never gives the answers for it. doesnt reply to emails.
                
                   Great teacher. Physical chemistry is an extremely in-depth and difficult class, however Dr. Galan was clear and made the class very understandable
                
                   Galan is a very good teacher she explains in detail what you are learning about and will give extra help if needed. She tends to run over in her lectures so schedule a class right after hers or else you will have to leave early or be late to your next class.
                
                   Great teacher! He was able to dumb down some of the material to where alot of us could understand it.
                
                   I had him for lab. He constantly mumbles and cannot give a direct answer. My friend and I made up answers for the labs and made an A. The final was hard because nobody learned anything. The quizzes are on computer and they became class quizzes. Sweet guy who knows chemistry but does not know how to teach it to the class.
                
                   He is a great guy; his lectures are boring, and it is sometimes hard to pay attention in class. However, he is always willing to help and clarify the material. He explains the information clearly when you go to his office hours if you have any questions. Make sure you do the homework; it helps keep your grade up.
                
                   Warped sense of humor, made lab fun!!! Willing to help, answer all questions, doesn't make you feel stupid. Answers questions about lectures. I hope to have him for all future labs thru OChem. I may even schedule other classes around his lab.
                
                   He is very helpful and very funny
                
                   wonderful guy! I wish i had this again this year for O chem. He makes everything make sense. he even explained what was going on in lecture. Really great guy with a great sense of humor! I love him!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a great Teacher
                
                   AMAZING TEACHER! WILL HELP AND MAKE THINGS CLEAR AND EASY! IF YOU HAVE QUESTIONS ABOUT LECTURE, HE WIL HELP AS WELL! THERE'S NO ONE LIKE HIM!
                
                   mr. perrigo was my lab professor in the fall of 1998 and spring of 1999.  he really was VERY helpful and made lab interesting and fun.  i always felt lucky that he was my professor both semesters, and that i didn't have any of those other people who were meanies.  i wonder if he remembers me...i was the one who made that massive flow chart on posterboard.
                
                   very willing to help outside of lab. great guy. very ****ed humor though
                
                   awesome! he made chem lab so much fun. very ****ed sense of humor, but he treats his students like equals. always willing to help and explain stuff. make sure you turn in your labs!
                
                   Tough but fair, quirky sense of humor & really holds you accountable for your own learning.  She seems to be about guiding you to become better.
                
                   I don't understand the previous rating b/c she is nothing like that.  I found her to be extremely helpful, patient, & knowledgeable about everything concerning this course.  I wish she taught my lecture class!  I enjoyed her teaching.
                
                   Took her for lab. Did decently on all of my assignments for class. Ended up with an A for the class even though I know my grades calculated to be a B in the end. She is very helpful and loves chemistry.
                
                   Awesome Teacher. One of the best I have ever had.
                
                   Easy class and great prof! She is really helpful and nice.  The online homework is really helpful.  Lots of extra credit opprotunities if you go to class
                
                   Extremely easy class, I made a D in Chemistry in high school and made an A+ with ease in this class. Much of the class is online homework but if you do it you should easily get an A
                
                   Super helpful...possibly the best chem prof on campus.
                
                   She is a really nice teacher. Very helpful and understanding. Gives a lot of extra credit opportunities. Does a practice final and a lot of homework.
                
                   Grace is AWESOME! She's very particular with her lab reports but that's just how o-chem labs are. She's very understanding, very helpful, and accepts late work. Be prepared to put in alot of hours for only a 1 hour lab though
                
                   She is nice.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She makes lab very fun and is more helpful than any teacher I have ever had. She is always willing to stay late or meet outside of class. I hope to have her next semester!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took her as a lab teacher. She was a pretty good teacher. She was super pregnant when I took her. Every now and then if someone would ask a question she would give a snobby remark. But other than that she was pretty good.
                
                   everyone in my lab section hates her. she does go over the lab before hand but very briefly and if you try to ask a question she acts snobby and gives a rude remark. for a lab everything should be specific as possible well good luck spending the first 30 mins. figuring out what your there to do that day. the experiments were unorganized and boring
                
                   Jessica Williams was an excellent teacher. I had her my first semester at TAMUG for CHemistry 111 Lab. I easily gotan A. She does powerpoints before the labs and if you take notes and read over them before the quizzes you will do excellent.Jessica makes Chemistry easy to understand and if you have any question she'll help quickly! GREAT GREAT GREAT
                
                   I don't like him at all. The problems he reviews are nothing like that is on the test. He doesn't teach where you can do good on his tests you just have to do independent study. Also his grading isnt the same for all of his students. I would not recommend him at all!
                
                   He has no idea what he is talking about and expects his students to just know the concepts by using his useless notes we are required to buy. Don't bother asking questions unless you enjoy a college educated prof. make a fool out of himself. The tests will kill you if you rely on the class alone. PRE-MED students beware he will kill your GPA.
                
                   I was in the top of the class and got a C, definitely do not recommend. I think he just gives everyone C's or lower.
                
                   his jokes arent the best
                
                   Wow this professor really blows DO NOT TAKE HIM,take this course at another college.  He has sum humor but don't let it fool u into thinking it's an easy or passable class. the final is multiple choice and it drops u a letter grade.  he did not give me 2 points i needed for an A in the lab.  DO NOT TAKE BELLER it is HELL, its like independent study
                
                   Beller's a good guy, but don't let his goofy nature fool you. He will make the tests as hard as he can.  He will find little subtleties in the reactions that he mentioned in passing, and make it the focus of a problem.   Sure he's nice, but he's faaar from easy.
                
                   Take Beller for O.chem because he is a good professor and because that's usually the only person who teaches the class.  Really dry humor type of guy, but funny.
                
                   he is an awesome professor. he doesnt mind his language in his classes. tries to be funny and he really is. jeez is his favorite word.
                
                   the teachers funny! i go to him and he helps me a lot. you must practice and practice problems, he makes a work book and if you practice the problems that are in it and understand how you got the  answers you should be fine. He gives you a cram sheet and everything that is on it, is on the test.
                
                   Alright prof class comes out cheap since he makes the notes and lab book. The class is a bit difficult but is mangable if you put the time into it. If you are one to put things off you will not pass Bellers class requires a lot of out of class studying and practicing.
                
                   Class comes out not costing much since he already provides the notes. Helps when its time to study. Avg prof just requires studying. Old test are a big help.
                
                   Brilliant in my opinion, really enjoyed the content of his lectures,
                
                   Not helpful at ALL. His lectures do NOT match the tests he gives. Honestly, you have to teach yourself the content and hope that you're teaching yourself the right stuff.
                
                   Good prof. Helpful if you pay attention.
                
                   I really enjoyed this class. Excellent teaching 10/10 in my opinion.
                
                   His teaching methods are not very efficient. During lecture he uses power-points and for every chapter he has 5-6 power-point with at least 25 slides each. He gives too much unnecessary information; I feel that he should expose students with the most important information daily so they can became familiar with it. I wouldn't recommend his class.
                
                   Hate his class! His test are not over his lecture, or quiz or study guide! He never answers your  questions! The homework isn't for a grade! This class is making my GPA drop bad! Don't take him!!
                
                   Take Liu if you have the chance instead of this guy. His class is not enjoyable at all and everything that I learned I had to teach myself. He doesnt do HW anymore but he does give extra credit on tests and take home quizzes. if you have to take him treasure the book!!! that is the only thing you'll learn from.
                
                   great lecturer
                
                   He tries his best for you to succeed. He gives you a schedule of HW and take home quizzes so you can do everything early in the semester and only worry about tests. I didn't have previous tests. I studied and got an A. Don't like it, you probably don't belong in college. This isn't Middle school-Professors are hard. Oh well. :/
                
                   He is a good teacher, person wise. He runs through his slide about 100mph and the tests have nothing to do with the lectures. The only way you can get by is by knowing someone who took it and had previous test..or become friends with the "Ambassadors".
                
                   Wow...what to say. He isn't very clear at all. His accent is hard to understand at first. He does try to be funny at times but his class is a bore. In 1111 as a recessitation he doesnt really talk about the lab. Your TA's teach you more than he does. He not organized at all and is prone to making mistakes.
                
                   Dr. Chi is very knowledgeable. He could not clarify the core content, unfortunately. I learned lots although I do not understand his topic. The lecture notes from him is very good.
                
                   Dr. Chi is a wonderful teacher.  He explains thoroughly. He is an excellent asset to the Chemistry Department.
                
                   Dr. Chi is an excellent professor. For those of you that are worried about having foreign professors, he is not hard to understand at all. He is very organized as far as notes and posts the PowerPoint for the notes online for you. Quizzes come straight from the homework (which he goes over in class). And he explains the material very clearly. Tests will be easy as well if you do the homework.
                
                   Great professor! He goes over everything in detail and makes sure you fully comprehend everything. If you have any questions, he is more than happy to help you understand. There are quizzes in the class, but they cover the homework for which he gives the answers to (meaning, study the homework and get an A on the quizzes). His tests are easy too
                
                   Dr. Chi wants everyone to learn the subject well. He is easy to talk to and welcomes questions. He really cares about students education.
                
                   great professor!!!
                
                   My favorite professor  at TAMUK, talks about chemistry in a way anyone can understand. Tests are short and only easy if you study the notes you take in class (which is a must!). Online homework gives a lot of points and he gives occasional extra credit homework. 
                
                   One of my favorite teachers. Likes to tease but uses it to connect to the lesson in a way you won't forget. Very clever with words and explanation. Gives review before the test as well as tells you what you need to do well. Genuinely cares for students and whether or not they understand the material. Not the easiest class. MUST do the homework.
                
                   Good Professor i am struggling alot but do the online homework and go to tutoring and you can get a good grade. Dont give up
                
                   By far one of the best science professors who respects his students. Makes the class time fly by from his intriguing speeches. Makes references to real-life events that help relate to what the lecture is about. He grades with a "point system" and Online-Homework will make your grade go insanely high. I recommend him to anyone who needs chemistry.
                
                   A very interesting professor indeed. He uses examples that we can relate to, however his examples tend to get out of hand. What began as an example of some chemical property has turned into a mini-conversation between himself and another student.
                
                   Took him for Quantitative Analysis and Instrumental Analysis and learned a lot of new things in his class BUT he usually spends the entire class period talking about random stuff with his students (not saying I didn't enjoy that ;) ). His tests cover a LOT of stuff he doesn't cover in class, so you really have to know your stuff and study!!
                
                   excellent teacher and a good person.  Need help talk to him!
                
                   Really good teacher overall.
                
                   good guy
                
                   his tests are exactly like the review except for some differences here and there.  I failed like half of the tests and started passing the last ones and got a B.  of course there is the online work.  talks bad about a lot of the nearby towns here.
                
                   The online OWL assignments will make or break you. I had a 60's test average going into the final week but the make-up exam, final, and OWLs bumped me to an A. You will not learn nearly enough in the lecture to pass the test, you'll learn mostly from the Homework. The lecture only reinforces the HM. Take Castro only if you are willing to do the OWL
                
                   Great professor.  Easy class if you do your online homework.  I highly recommend this professor if you are taking chemistry for the first time.  He makes chemistry easier to understand.
                
                   Really awesome guy.  He is fun in class.  However, you must study for tests and do all of you homework for a decent grade.  He will help you if you need it.
                
                   Ok borderline Cool Professor,but you MUST study for Tests and do your On-line Homework.
                
                   Good professor. Ochem is simply tougher for some students than others. He tries to make it simple. Don't miss class. Study everyday and go over your notes. Exams are tough, but at least it is the material he covers.
                
                   WORST TEACHER EVER. 
                
                   I dont know why everyone gives her such bad rates. I made a B in her class and I failed 2 of her tests. Her SI sessions cover an example of pretty much everything thats going to be on the tests.
                
                   I took her class in Spring 2012. She is a great professor and is very helpful. Her class is hard, and you WILL have to study in order to pass, but it's not impossible. I put in the work and got a high A. She provides you with everything you need to do well. The SI sessions are extremely helpful; go to every one if possibe.
                
                   Idk why all the bad ratings for her. Sure, she's not easy, but why should she be&#63; I thought she was a good professor, and as long as you try, and you study some before the tests, there's no reason why an A isn't a possibility. I recommend her
                
                   Awesome person, but I didn't learn anything in the class. The online homework was ridiculous. I spent more time on her homework than the homework of my upper level courses. Do you OWL homework or you'll regret it in the end!
                
                   I'm not a chemistry minded person, but I got an A, so.. yeah. She gives you all the hand-outs, and she gives study guides and even has study sessions. If you learn what's on the study guide, you can get a perfect score on the tests.
                
                   Avoid her like the plaque. This is the WORSE class I have ever taken. She does not know how to teach. I rely on text books to prepare for class, but she does not follow the syllabus and most of her information is nowhere in the text.  AVOID HER IF YOU CAN!!!
                
                   First and foremost, I will be the first to say the EBook that is required is crap. In my opinion this class was a self taught (via EBook) class. INSANE number of hw problems. Spent more time on this class than any other and the absolute best grade that I predict making at the end of the semester is a high C. Do not waste your TIME/money.
                
                   I wouldn't recommend anyone who needs the class as basic to take her; she is much to difficult, and you're more than likely much too stupid.  However, if you're up to the challenge of taking a class that feels like college, than by all means take her.  Also if you're going into a field that requires a strong chemistry background, she's a must.
                
                   This class is super hard...if you want to pass Chemistry with little previous experience...this is not the class to take
                
                   Martino is completely frustrating!!! She doesn't know how to teach- or clarify- anything about Chemistry. Everything I've gotten out of this class has come from my text book, or my tutor. She assigns an absurd amount of homework and she doesn't care about the reasonability of her assignments. She's disorganized, scatterbrained, and sloppy. Don't ever get stuck with her! If I could drop this class, I would.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She doesn't know how to teach well.  Every semester I was at TAMUK I constantly had students complaining about her class.  I would avoid her class at all cost.
                
                   My most difficult class this year, but I'm glad I took it with her.  She taught quickly at a speed I was expecting for college.  If you just want to pass Chem I wouldn't suggest to take it with her, but if you want to get to konw your Chem well, then by all means.
                
                   Do not take Martino if she is the only teacher left to teach chemistry here transfer to another school. Steps are skiped in class when doing problems and moves way to fast for a subject like chemistry. Again you'll regret it and so will your GPA.
                
                   Just do your work
                
                   Really hard, but you'll get the grade if you put in the work
                
                   Dr. Lim is very difficult to follow as she moves way too fast. She is very intelligent, but really should stick to upper level chemistry. The best part is that she curved so much that even if you made a 74 you made an A in the class. She is not helpful in any sense. If you are looking for an easy A without learning anything take Dr. Lim.
                
                   Very hard to understand. Doesn't give you enough time to finish the Owls for the upcoming test. Continually holds the class 5-10 past the release time so she manages her lecture time poorly. I would not suggest this prof.
                
                   Not a very good teacher, but very nice and easy class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great prof makes the subject of Chemistry very clear to where everybody understands what is going on.
                
                   This class is so easy that anyone can pass it. He makes chemistry easy to learn and understand. I recommend him to anyone who needs to take a science class and wants to get a good grade.
                
                   Great Professor!
                
                   Don't like chemistry&#63; that will change once you take Thompson....his lectures are great and he doesn't make you feel like your stupid if you don't understand something                  GREAT PROF.....Not many like Thompson around anymore.
                
                   Take this guy for both 1311 & 1312 if he teaches them. He is the best prof for this. He usually teaches them during the summer, so you may even put it off until you can take him. Worth taking!!!
                
                   He made chemistry really comprehensive and easy to grasp. His class made me more interested in chemistry.
                
                   Take Dr. Thompson for both 1311 and 1312!  He is a very good professor!  Forget taking Olivarez or Beran!  Thompson is a hundred times better!
                
                   AWESOME!!!  BEST CHEM PROF AT TAMUK!!!
                
                   EXCELLANT FOR CHEMISTRY 1311 & 1312!  Took the class once before with another prof who didn't teach very well.  I ended up making an 'A' in Thompson's class!
                
                   Louise is such a  nice professor and all she expects is for you to show up and participate. She has many students available to help with tutoring and you can even approach her with questions if that doesn't help. Her tests can sometimes be challenging because its a lot of definitions to remember but overall if you just study a little you're good.
                
                   Dr. Liu is a great professor, i do not like chemistry, and i thought i was going to receive a C average but ended up getting a higher grade. hard to understand because of her heavy accent but she is great. gives A LOT OF EXTRA CREDIT put effort into the class and you will pass
                
                   Sit in the first couple rows. Go to the SI sessions. Pay attention to the power points. Guaranteed an A. Great teacher.
                
                   Great professor. Tough and rock. Lots of work. I learned.
                
                   Great professor, the class as it is is not easy but you can manage to make an A with the SI sessions and extra credit
                
                   Dr. Liu is the most diligent and excellent Professor in this campus. She is a fantastic professor by all means!
                
                   Dr. Liu is a fantastic professor! She is always willing to help you whenever you may need it.
                
                   awesome professor.. the class is onviously hard is chemistry come On! but she makes it fun.. she make study sessions that help you alot ... I highly reccomend you attend .. K went to almost everywing one ns I got an A .. lots pf extra credit.
                
                   Accent is strange at first, but you will get used to it. Her class altogether takes a little getting used to at first, but once you catch the flow it's not a difficult class. Tests are half multiple choice, half open response. The open response part guides you through the answer, and is actually easier than the multiple choice.
                
                   I love Dr. Liu's Chineligh (English with Chinese style in her language). She always makes me laugh and learn. &quot;Edutainment&quot; teaching skill is very critical for student to learn. She is the most diligent professor. Her next salary should be increased.
                
                   She is rock. Lovely personality. She opens our eyes and create a new world to learn independantly. I love her lots.
                
                   Dr. Liu is the sweet professor and always help students out. She is very strict and provide lots of opportunity for students to enhance their learning skill. She is a tough and fair professor. She cares for our future.
                
                   She's kind of hard to understand but its very easy to get a good grade in the class. lots of extra credit.
                
                   First thing she told us was &quot;edu-tainment&quot;, meaning she was going to try and keep things interesting. She was very nice, but had a hard to understand accent. It's easy if you pay attention and do the homework.  She helps out a lot if she sees students struggling and makes sure they understand before she moves on. Great teacher.
                
                   Took her for recitation. She was really helpful with making sure we were prepared for the lab that was taking place that week. I went to her office a lot for help, and she was very eager to make sure my partner and I understood our lab/lab reports.
                
                   Great teacher with lots of fun. My favorate professor. Sweet!
                
                   Easy A, my chemistry classes in high school were harder. Easy tests, helps you out a lot. Everything is straight from her notes. My only complaints are the difficulty getting used to her accent and the amount of homework she assigns every now and then. Especially good for non chemistry/chem engr majors.
                
                   great teacher! tests are easy and similar to practice exams. lots of extra credit opportunities. helpful with any questions.
                
                   hard to understand. not always organized. papers don't always come back. nice, helpful during office hours. lets you do test corrections.
                
                   Very knowledgeable man all around and all questions will be answered. If you want to really learn, take him for a class.
                
                   He's a smartass..  that's why he's awesome.
                
                   Great professor. I thought I was going to have a much more difficult time in this class. Dr. Hays went out of his way to make certain that I really understood this material. I did well because he puts so much time and effort into his teaching. ***DEFINITELY RECOMMENDED***  :)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Hays really goes out of his way to help students learn Chemistry.  He is a great professor, and I left really knowing the materials well.  Sign up for him if you can!
                
                   After having him for both CHEM 3323 and CHEM 3325 concurrently, I will definitely miss his class. You will certainly gain a more in-depth understanding than students taking this course at other schools. He teaches you how to think, which you will learn to appreciate later. Never miss a class and take detailed notes. Not impossible to get an A.
                
                   Dr. Apurba Bhattacharya is a very unstructured professor. He does not keep updated with his grades. I'm paying for an education that I am not receiving. He tells us he’s not smart,he fails his OWN exams, he doesnt know how to teach, AND tells us grades are NOT important. He humiliates students, rudely, He discourages taking notes during class!
                
                   He's very enthusiastic about he's field of work. If you honestly try, you should be okay in this class. Reading is extremely important!!
                
                   He's an amazing and inspiring professor, knows the subject like the back of his hand and is extremely motivated. Exposes students to new ways of looking at chemistry. One the best classes I took, wish I could take few more classes on Green Chemistry.  One of the Best Professors I had.
                
                   the worst teacher ever..!!! He will humiliate you every time he can. He is full of himself. I don't recommend him. He gets mad whenever you take notes and says that grades are not important, but he ends up failing half of the class and the rest will get a low grade.
                
                   Explain very well but his tests are extremely difficult. He'd give us tests which he said were graduate level, and he even said the graduate students wouldn't pass them. He went on to say how he gave the tests to prove a point. Ended up with a C even though the grades he gave were based on what he thought you should get. Unfair, but smart man.
                
                   Ask for help if you want to do well, Organic Chemistry is not an easy course. He is slow at teaching because he wants everything to be clear but towards the final he covers a lot and you will see everything on the final, if you dont do well on it your letter grade will be affected.
                
                   Best professor by far! The test are somewhat easy if you study, gives you plenty of time to finish, sometimes two days. I really recommend taking him for any class available! My favorite teacher by far! Great lectures throughout the semester, tells pretty funny jokes!
                
                   Great professor, however, the class moved sort of slow-paced for chemistry. Interesting lectures, relates to real life examples and explains everything on board by hand. Great for basics of chemistry. SI sessions are with him and his capable of helping you and is there every day before class for questions. 
                
                   Explains himself well,  extends deadlines and gives many opportunities to pass. If you try you can easily get an A or B.
                
                   Great professor. Great at explaining and getting the lessons across in a way that students can really comprehend. Good sense of humor as well.
                
                   The best chem professor I have ever had, and probably one of the best teachers at A&M- Kingsville! 
                
                   Teacher teaches very well. All the lectures make sense. Show up and take notes in class you will be fine. 
                
                   Show up to SI sessions, tests are long but not many of them. A extra credit is there. Easy A if you put effort in. 
                
                   and I took him for Chem 2401. Very effective teacher, but has little sympathy for laziness. If you are a good student, you would have learned and done well in his class. He will be definitely missed.
                
                   very caring and interested in his students
                
                   Dr. Beran is a very good professor for chemistry.  He's hard and makes you learn the material, but you retain it longer. If you just want to coast through chemistry take someone else, but if you really want to learn and understand chemistry, you should have taken dr beran. Because now he's retiring.
                
                   Presents the material in a clear manner, then moves on. Always in his office and is more than willing to answer questions. Gives lots of x-tra credit chances.
                
                   I didn't pass Chem with Dr. Beran.  However, I do have to give him credit for being a great person and helping me out as best as he could. I still pop in every now and then to say hello...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   avoid
                
                   He is not very clear, and he is really difficult.  Not a good teacher -- even though he really knows Chemistry well.
                
                   Great professor go to class and take notes. His test are a little tricky with concepts, but math problems aren't hard if you understand how to do them, what helps is to go on google and look for different problems, the problems will save you for the test! Pretty much go to class study and you will do fine
                
                   I took chem 1 with a different professor and failed horribly because he made no sense. However this professor was amazing! He started at the beginning and explained everything with examples and pictures. His tests and quizzes were a bit tricky but if you studied it was easy to pass. Totally a nice guy and more than willing to help with problems.
                
                   His quizzes and test r a little tricky but he's a great teacher. take good notes and do ur homework and u can pull an A
                
                   Be prepared to be bored! i thought chemistry was interesting but he taught me otherwise. Great guy, good professor, I recommend over ANY OTHER PROF at TAMUG!!! be wary!
                
                   Be prepared to fall asleep in lecture. Beginning of classes are easy but it gets pretty hard. Do the hw assigned for practice and watch out for the comb-over!
                
                   Great professor! Really knows what he's talking about.  Chemistry is a hard subject so you actually have to study..a lot, if you want to make a good grade.
                
                   He’s a really good professor but he’s extremely monotone so make sure you take the class at a time that you won’t be falling asleep.
                
                   His lectures are very clear and easy to follow.  He keeps copies of old exams in the library so you can practice, which is very helpful.  He's also extremely nice and helpful to students.
                
                   Very nice and thorough! tests are good length but watch out for quizzes!
                
                   very patient
                
                   He's a great teacher-he helped me prepare for Ochem with Lesko-who's the most difficult o.chem teacher in East Texas. He's very clear in repeating things. DO THE HOMEWORK, EVEN IF ITS NOT DUE!
                
                   helped a lot for preparing for ochem with dr. lesko
                
                   This class is only as hard as you want it to be. If you pay attention in class, take notes, and do homework before the quizzes and tests even when it's not due, you should do fine on both tests and quizzes. He's a really good professor.
                
                   hes hard as **** but hes a good teacher when your in class everything looks easy but when you go home to do the work its hard as hell
                
                   Good prof.  Willing to help outside of class.  Test are a little hard so you really have to study.  His voice is very monotone.
                
                   The lectures are super confusing but SI is really helpful. Her tests are pretty easy study and do sapling and owl and youll be fine.
                
                   This is the worst professor I have ever had. Breakdown of every singe lecture: 30 min of talking about personal problems, 10 min of reading word for word from an equation off of the lecture slide, 5 min trying to teach the problem, 5 min of the same smart student teaching us the problem. No chemistry taught here. Avoid this, register early.
                
                   Dr. Lesko is incredibly hard and you will probably be really frustrated while taking the class. I always thought I was failing but ended up with an A! She's tough, but you'll definitely learn the material. Organic Chemistry is hard and she makes sure you have it for life. Do the homework, if you have questions she'll answer them, and study everyday
                
                   Dr. Lesko is a HORRIBLE professor! She doesn't know how to teach the information in a way that normal people can understand. The only reason I got a C is because she had to curve the grades since the majority of the class failed! DO NOT TAKE HER!!!!!
                
                   This woman is so easily distracted it is barely humorous. Every time you ask her a question she gets sidetracked before you get an answer out of her. Also, the whole class is introducing you to new programs and such and she gives you assignments with no forewarning on how to actually DO them. 10 page paper at the end, START NOW. Good Luck.
                
                   I really liked her, she reallys cares about teaching this class, and puts in alot of effort to try to make you understand, but the course work is just really really tough. Read the book, study your butt off and god speed. Definatly the better of the 2 ochem teachers though.
                
                   This is a hard class but if you do the book problems, all the cengage stuff and ask questions it is possible to do well.  When you ask questions, she explains it as if you already understand the reactions and terminology.
                
                   We got moved to college station this semester but she was still really accessable and always asked us what days we wanted to take test and needed her to be up here.  You def. have to read the book on your own because classes isnt enough- she assumes you have already looked at it and approaches it from an understanding not from the very beginning
                
                   If you actually want to learn ochem she is your lady. If you do her extra credit paper (real easy) and make sure you try your hardest, and miss no more than like 2 class days she will probably bump you a letter grade , go to her office for help she explains better out of class. take all online quizzes! Townsan now quizzes are a gaurenteed hundred!
                
                   Ochem is a tough class and she dose not make it easy. If you want a good education and can take a beating, she your lady. Also I will take this time to fess up to posting on the door day of final exam. &quot;REQUIRED for OCHEM final: #2 pencil scantron 220, bluebook, vasilene&quot; She could not talk for 5 minutes when she came in.
                
                   this class is rediculous.  she seriously spent an hour going over how to save a file on a computer. i dont think in this day you could get into college without the computer skills needed to pass this class.  i never went and i did just fine.  its really a joke.
                
                   you can study all the time and still fail she teaches it like a grad course
                
                   YOU WILL STUDY SO HARD AND STILL NOT GET IT. JUST TRY AND GET HELP AND YOU MIGHT DO GOOD. NO PIECE OF CAKE, SHE TAKES HER CLASS VERY SERIOUSLY.
                
                   this class is pointless and I can't believe it is required. It is a joke
                
                   Easy class. Show up and she'll give extra credit
                
                   She gives terrible lectures and the content on the slide packs will be no help at all.
                
                   go see him in his office!! he will help you!!
                
                   use the online tools and go to his office 
                
                   He's a nice old man but I got basically nothing out of lectures. However, he does give out notes packets during every class so if you look over those on your own and do the sapling you'll probably be okay. He gives out take home quizzes which is cool because you can work in groups but he takes attendance too so you actually have to go to lecture
                
                   Read the notes he gives do the OWL hw and you will do fine. Coming to class is hard but it gives you the notes and what will be on the test. He is not that bad once you learn his style. He tests the easiest out of all the teacher at tamug  (ei he puts what he says hes going to on test and nothing more ) 
                
                   Worst teacher I have ever had in my college career. He has a totally incomprehensible teaching method and has no desire to help students pass. His only advice to pass is to use previous exams which are impossible to understand. When asked for help he said "5 people are passing, why should I help you?" Do not take any class with him.
                
                   Sweet old man but horrible teacher.
                
                   Got a C the first semester, but the second semester I am bombing the class - I admit it's my fault. Still, he's just an old man and a sweetheart, but he should probably retire. He spends the class going over a powerpoint. I think your savior in this course will be the study assignments, although he doesn't grade those. Still. Just do them.
                
                   Can see him being a tough professor for many.  If you are a natural chemist and enjoy working problems, then this is the class for you.  Do all the book problems and previous exams and you should be fine.  With a good background and an interest in the subject, you can easily get an A.
                
                   Griffin Chem first semester chemistry is alright if you're good at chemistry. Second semester is a different story.  He is very very hard due to the complexity of the subject matter he is trying to teach and his incomprehensible lecturing style. It is highly recommended that second semester chemistry is taken at Galveston College or elsewhere.
                
                   This is one of those classes that you need the book to help you in immensely. Learning from Griffin himself is extremely difficult, he is a mumbler. Helpful if you go to office hours only.
                
                   Awful teacher. So terrible. I'm a junior and have only received 1 C my entire life. That is until this class. still waiting on grade from portal but i defiantly got a D, maybe an F. TERRIBLE CLASS. Agree with the person above take chem at a community college if you are staying at TAMUG. I wish i had read the reviews for Griffin before i signed up.
                
                   For the love of all that is holy, DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS!Or any other class with this professor! If you want to pass, then do the smart thing and stay away from Griffin.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF!!! I am a  B+ student and have never had such a horrible proffesor. He does not teach, instead reads from his old PowerPoint slides. I attended all his lectures, but got nothing out of them.     Tests are rediculous. I got a D overall. You are better off taking it at a community college.
                
                   Honestly the worst professor I've ever had. I learned today that at the beginning of the semester there were 48 kids enrolled in my chem 2 class. I just found at that after half of them dropped, over half of the remaining are failing and the 3rd highest grade in the class before the final is an 81. What a bad course.
                
                   Avoid taking Griffin at all costs. He should not be allowed to teach at A&M, or any other school for that matter. You will learn absolutely nothing from his class unless you teach yourself 100% of the way. The quizzes in 102 were all over material he did not &quot;teach&quot; and everybody failed. Do not bother coming to class, you will just waste your time.
                
                   During class he talked about his slideshow instead of teaching us. I was disappointed to take the class. I hope he never does the slideshow thing again! I do not recommend him. Take Schmalz instead. He was hard to understand and his tests were much harder than he prepared us for.
                
                   Dr. Griffin is hard to understand during class because he rambles a lot. His notes aren't very useful, and they're confusing. To make an A in his class simply do the homework and take his practice tests. I stopped taking his notes the first week and I have a 96 test average.
                
                   Dr. Griffin does not teach chemistry very well at all. He does not stay on topic; he just jumps around from topic to topic without explaining anything very well. If you have to take this class plan on reading the book and doing the ungraded homework. If you do you should be fine.
                
                   worst teacher EVER. someone who has more than 1 stroke should not still be teaching!!!! his notes were jumbled and incomprhensible. i got a D in his class and couldnt bring it up to save my life! DO NOT TAKE HIM! go to community.
                
                   he is very nice and very helpful if you talk to him.  he is a teacher who is willing to put in outside time to help students.  in chem just take good notes and actually look in the book and tests should not be too horrible.  he was great in seminar because he let us choose our subjects rather than assigning.
                
                   she is amazing and you should take her if you can. She makes the material seem pretty easy which is an amazing thing because chemistry isnt all that easy. Her class is super easy if you actually try. Attendance is not mandatory but if you go she will notice and that might help you out in the end. She also drops one homework.
                
                   She's a young professor with a Ph.D! She wants you to pass, and she gives a lot of extra credit. I dread chemistry, but she made it simple as possible. She is one of the best professors I have ever taken.
                
                   Considering the fact that she has a Ph.D, young, funny, amazing teacher, enthusiastic, beautiful,.... what was I talking about again? Anyways, if you are one of the lucky ones, you'll have her as your Chem. professor.
                
                   She is a wonderful teacher! She tries to make her lectures bearable - because chem sucks- but she makes it interesting and comical. She does great reviews before the tests, which are Extremely helpful. She wants you to pass and it shows. Chemistry is tough, but if you go to lecture and listen you definitely have a chance! I recommend her!
                
                   ABSOLUTELY LOVE Dr. Willoughby. She is SUPER helpful and clear in her lectures. She does not try to trick you on tests. I HIGHLY recommend her over any Chem professor here hands down. Also, go to her office hours, I spend a lot of time in there and I can say she has made me so interested I'm taking Chemistry 2 just because she's teaching it.
                
                   He knows his stuff, but he is a big jerk about it. Be prepared to be yelled at in the beginning of class. Esp. if your class doesn't follow his way of writing lab reports. He is also strongly against cheating. There is absolutely no way you can get away with it. After yelling he likes to make &quot;jokes&quot;. He'll even say &quot;that was a joke&quot;..its annoying.
                
                   awesome dude. i hate chemistry and i got an A. he's really good at explaining things and if you do his practice problems and tests, you'll know what to expect on the tests. i'm gonna take him again next semester for orgo 2. he's one of the best professors on campus...if not THE best.
                
                   He's the best professor I've ever had! Funny and entertaining while still being very informative. Tests are very easy if you do the practice problems/test.
                
                   He is a GREAT professor! Makes a topic as intimidating as Organic Chemistry very easy and understandable. He gives you the notes, and goes at a very student-friendly rate through the material. Definitely take him.
                
                   Dr. Southard is the BEST!  He is very approachable and always willing to help.  All professors should teach like he does.
                
                   Poly Chem was a very cool class!!!!! You need to know some organic chem though.  Dr. Southard is very easy going and willing to help those who don't understand. You couldn't ask for a better teacher!!!!
                
                   This instructor is one of the best I've had...EVER! He is so passionate about what he's doing and he uses that same passion as he teaches.  I am glad that I was able to have him for Organic I and II
                
                   Dr. Southard is one in a million. He loves students and keeps his lectures interesting. He does a great deal of work to provide with as much study material as possible. I nominated him as the most influential teacher because he has helped me understand many complicated subjects in chemistry.
                
                   Mr. Southard's class is pretty easy. I have an A so far and have one more test to take and then the final (comprehensive) He makes things clear and easy to understand. I would take him agian if he taught any other class. You dont use the book much at all, only for additional practice quest 4 the tests.
                
                   Since I have taken Dr. Southard for Organic I & II, I have decided to change my major from Biomedical Science to Biochem. He is so thourough in each of his lectures and clarifies every in such detail. I was afraid going into organic chemistry but Dr. Southard made it so easy and now chemistry is more my field of interest because I understand it!
                
                   Dr. Southard is an awesome professor.  He has a totally nerdy sense of humor that cracks us up.  He is easy to approach and talk to, and will help you if you're having trouble understanding something. All notes are provided, and he gives bonuses on the exams (usually 10 pts. on a question from the previous exam). He speaks softly, so pay attention.
                
                   One of the best.  Prints out all the notes for you and homework is very helpful, as problems on test resemble the ones on homework or the notes.  If you can get him take him.
                
                   He is an awesome professor who makes is material easy to learn and his lectures fun because of his good sense of humor. You can tell he really knows his stuff and loves his job.
                
                   He gives you plenty of opportunity to learn the material and keep a good grade.  He gives answers to the homework.. it's almost impossible to fail.  If you need help, he's very, very helpful and will put off lunch to help you with what you don't understand.  He's an awesome professor.
                
                   He was lenient on grading lab reports. He can be sarcastic at times but he was approachable and answered student questions.
                
                   He gets mad very easily over little mistakes and getting help from him is like anticipating getting your teeth pulled. This is not a difficult lab but if you can, take a lab with somebody else who is more approachable. Otherwise, come to lab with a thick skin. I hated it.
                
                   Very intelligent person about chemistry. Read your lab book and pay attention in lectures to answer his questions. He may seem strict, but if you do your best to stay on top of doing well on the quizzes and labs you should be fine. I highly recommend him if you really want to get chemistry down.
                
                   He's really smart, but if you don't understand something he gets kinda upset. He isn't very approachable, but if you show an effort of trying in his class, he wont be so hard on you.
                
                   He's really smart, but a total butthead,
                
                   He is a brilliant guy who is probably way overqualified for his job position. The class itself was easy, but he was very strict. He would get mad at students in the lab for little things, and didn't respond to things very nicely. But the lab was easy.
                
                   He is an awesome teacher. Biochem is a complex subject and this man made it so understandable. Go to class, study the powerpoints, and ask questions. His tests can be tricky though. He is always ready to help and he cares about you learning. I would suggest to take him for any class you can!
                
                   Had for Chem 2 lab, enjoyed his teaching style, very enthusiastic about what he teaches. You can tell he wants students to learn and have fun. Thick accent but if you've had another teacher with an accent his isn't bad at all. Def recommend!
                
                   This professor was awesome his test came from the power points and there were never any trick questions. Very helpful anytime you need help he is willing. Does a study guide and homework problems do them there probably gonna be on the test. Overall great professor! Even in lab.
                
                   Cool teacher! I'm a better person for taking this class. I am also a chemistry teacher.
                
                   fairly straightforward and good at explaining concepts when he is not losing his temper - rather unprofessional
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very difficult prof but the things that he taught me were invaluable lessons
                
                   Makes his class interesting. Makes Chem more fun!
                
                   His methods of teaching really help you better understand the material!
                
                   He understands that not every one is a chemistry God.  He helps those who ask for it but still tries to make sure he hasn't left the whole class behind.  He is also very fond of &quot;story time&quot; to keept he class from getting so boring.
                
                   If you must take chemistry this is the professor to take! I promise!
                
                   A very easy professor if you show up to class, study his notes,  and do the online homework. He posts his lectures and lecture notes on BB. Print those and bring them to class. Do not skip class often since he gives regular group pop quizzes. Tests are not hard, study the printed lecture notes and practice math problems in the textbook.
                
                   Professor Causgrove is a good instructor. His notes are uploaded to BB, you just print them out, and bring them to lecture. He goes over a lot of examples for each chapter, which is greatly appreciated. He uses an online homework system for his class. Do not buy the book, just buy the access code. You do have to study for his test.  
                
                   He was a awesome professor. He recorded his lectures, so if you miss a day you could go and watch it online. He has a old timey sense of humor, and is never in a bad mood. He prints out his notes, so you can pay more attention to him when he lectures. He's a must for CHEM I!!!!!
                
                   He records his lectures, but attendance is recommended because of the pop quizzes given in class. Always posts his lecture notes on Blackboard. Will need a LearnSmart/Connect account. Book is not required, but is helpful. He posts grades at a reasonable time lapse after quiz/exam. Sometimes gives a point curve on exams also. My favorite professor of the semester.
                
                   Great professor.  Very energetic, you could tell he loved what he did and was very helpful and approachable.  You do have to study for his test, they're not an easy A necessarily but I did learn alot from his class
                
                   He is the best teacher ive ever had! hes hilarious, and knows what hes talking about. he makes the class enjoyable! his notes are pre typed, just print them off BB and add to them in lecture. Exams are really easy if you study from the pre typed notes he provides.. i would definitely take him!!
                
                   I hate chemistry, but this guy made it bearable! Homework is online, exams are easy if you've read his notes prior and practiced on your own time. This professor is pretty cool and funny too. You may need tutoring or go to him if you don't understand things. I recommend him!
                
                   Amazing person, and extremely approachable..will help with whatever you need...couldn't be happier with taking the class
                
                   He is by far one of the best teachers I have had since beginning college. Class is not mandatory but to understand you must go to classes. The notes are pre-typed for students and I thought that many of the tests were easy. My friends had difficulty with them but just go to class and pay attention to what he says is important.
                
                   Kind of corny, but is friendly and will give extensions. bonus work added to test grades. The only way to fail this class is to not do homework. If you do homework than you should understand the material therefore a good grade. Multiple choice test.
                
                   He was great, super easy as long as you pay attention in class.  He's funny and is always acting goofy.
                
                   Good professor for Gen Chem. I highly recommend taking him. Most of his test were very easy. At some points of the semester I had to go to a tutor to get better understand (thermodynamics) but overall his test came straight from the notes. I got a B in the course! He is ADD so he will keep you entertained. Plus, if he gives alot of bonus points.
                
                   I look forward to going to his class each day. Hes got an awesome personality. I hate Chemistry but he makes it tolerable. As long as you can apply yourself you'll do well.
                
                   Great teacher. Kinda goofy, but very nice and approachable. Puts Chemistry in layman's terms. Made it fun.
                
                   Dr. Whaley is always willing to try to help.
                
                   Good teacher knows hes chemistry hes kind of hard but he is very helful.
                
                   The best in the department-Has very reasonable curve formula which he applies to tests-Shows interest in students career goals-Encourages students with positive feedback-Bio majors required to take organic dislike him because they are not chem majors-Sometimes delivers magnificent lectures, other times he seems unenthused-Not perfect but no one is.
                
                   This was the worst experience I have ever had in a class.  He is very frustrating and has his mind on things other than the class he is teaching.  DO NOT TAKE HIS SOLUTIONS CLASS! WASTE OF TIME AND MONEY!  Couldn't teach his way out of a proverbial paper bag.
                
                   Always trying to show off in class w/ stuff that doesn't relate to the material - tries to go over your head.  HW is tough/relatively easy tests.  COUNTS OFF IF YOU WORK AHEAD IN YOUR BOOK!!!
                
                   He is very boring and does not explain clearly.
                
                   Very Boring, thats all I have to say
                
                   Very straight to the point teaching style.
                
                   He is a good teacher for him but not for the student who is trying to learn. He is very long winded. I truly can say that I have not learned a thing in this class.
                
                   I just didn't think he was a personable person. I didn't feel comfortable to go to him when I had a problem. I don't know how I passed his class. Not a bad guy, just not what I thought he should be.
                
                   he started out teaching really good, but spends way too much time on easy Concepts and way not enough time on hard stuff.......he went through chapter 4 in i freaking day
                
                   I did not like him. he would talk for an hour and a half about things not even relevant to the lab. If you go to him he will tell you he has already helped you and thats all. also my lab partner and I had problems with fairness in grading
                
                   Good teacher, people who say he is a bad professor don't like him because he is long winded at times and his expects alot out of his students...which shouldn't be a negative to a student serious about learning.  Professor is hard but helpful. Be ready to keep your pencils sharp in his class
                
                   Do not take this professor he should not be teaching anywhere. He is the worse professor I have ever had. The material is not bad, the concepts are strait forward, but he doesn't teach the class at all.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The professor is a very good teacher. The test and quizzes are hard, but he will help you whenever you need help. He is there to help and will respond to emails very quickly. He is clear-cut when in terms of grading and gives you feedback on what grade you might be making. Chemistry is hard, but he will help you imm anything you need. Great teacher
                
                   Dr. Headley is great. I took him for o chem 1 and although the material is kinda challenging and a lot of information is thrown at you at once, Dr. Headley does a really good job on making the material as clear as possible and presents things in different ways in order to make you think. TAKE ADVANTAGE OF THE TEST RE- GRADES!
                
                   Dr. Headley is great. I had him for O Chem 1 and although the material is kinda challenging and a lot of information is thrown at you at once, Dr. Headley does a really good job on making the material as clear as possible and presents things in different ways in order to make you think. TAKE ADVANTAGE OF THE TEST RE- GRADES!
                
                   Great professor and great guy just a really hard subject.
                
                   Dr. Headley is a wonderful O Chem professor. His tests aren't easy, but they really make you think. He likes to focus more on application, so memorization is minimal in this class. While I didn't find the textbook helpful for the most part, the harder synthesis questions at the back of the chapters were excellent preparation for the tests.
                
                   Allan is the man, great class and awesome teacher, it's hard if you don't work hard!
                
                   Dr. H is a very caring and knowledgeable man, however sometimes his lectures can be confusing. O-Chem is in itself, a tedious subject that requires a lot of time and effort and for someone without a strong chemistry background, like me, it can be rough. He is awesome at answering questions when asked personally, but lectures are jumpy and muddled.
                
                   Dr. Headley is really great, the tests are a bit tough and require a very good understanding and use of the material to finish all the problems. However grading is very open to different approaches to a problem, which is nice. A tip is that the material builds, so if you put in the effort in the first 8 weeks, the material gets easier to master. 
                
                   He really is a great professor. You'll have to apply and practice if you want your letter grade. 
                
                   Dr. Headley is easily one of the best professors I've had at TAMUC. He clearly cares about the subject matter, is transparent in his grading, and always makes himself available for students to seek guidance or clarification. He is very pleasant to be around. I would take more of his classes if he taught more.
                
                   Dr. Headley is an outstanding professor. He does his best to answer any questions, and most of the time he is able to clarify it very well. Tests are not easy, but he teaches you reasoning needed for organic chemistry and how to come up with an acceptable answer. He always says "I'm not looking for the RIGHT answer, but one that is acceptable."
                
                   Great teacher, great person. Organic chemistry is not supposed to be easy, more you practice the more you get better. Helps the student as much as he can. He truly wants his students to succeed. If the mechanism is acceptable you get most credit for it.
                
                   Are you kidding me? This is by far the worst class I have taken in my undergraduate career. The teacher does not teach what needs to be teached. The only way I learned was by reading my textbook and even then I did not learn the necessary information.
                
                   Big disconnect between what is taught in class, what is in the book and what is on the exams.  Has difficulty completing thoughts/topics.  He does seem to want students to succeed.  I wouldn't take his class if offered by another professor.
                
                   You can tell she really enjoys her job & loves her students. The class is kind of difficult just because it's chemistry, but she does a good job at making it more interesting and easier to learn.
                
                   I'll be frank: worst prof I had in four years, not recommended. Lectures were confusing & disjointed. Belittled students in class. Tests were like homework, but neither was from lecture. You MUST go to his office hours; grading seemed based on it. Test problems solved exactly as book did them get no points if not done his way. Grades VERY harshly.
                
                   THIS CLASS SUCKS (Quantum Mechanics)! The class average was a 35, which was a high C. There are three test worth 20,30,40% sequentially, and all are cumulative. Homework has nothing to do with the class. I feel like I have learned nothing in the class, along with most of the students in the class.
                
                   Wheeler is a great professor. 
                
                   Dr. Wheeler is by far my favorite professor at A&M. He is very helpful and works through the problems step by step. He also is very open to helping his students outside of class. On more than one occasion he met up with me personally outside of his office hours to help me with the homework. I would recommend this class to anyone.
                
                   I had already been exposed to the material previously so the class itself wasn't particularly difficult for me. I found Utley to be a funny old man who was a little bit scattered in his lecture however his expectations for you were super clear. He also dropped the lowest test score and curved most exams and gave extra credit
                
                   Utley is a great guy. He cares about his students and cares about what he is teaching. His tests are reasonable and he gives extra points all the time. Sometimes his lectures get pretty off topic but he only puts on the test things he went over in class. He does clicker questions ALL THE TIME so make sure you show up for them.
                
                   You NEED to go to class, and take advantage of those clicker questions, because that is the type of question you'll see on his tests. Just pay attention to the content he emphasizes during lecture and be prepared to teach yourself a lot. His tests are pretty easy even though his lectures are intimidating. (He's also secretly a softie). Just work!
                
                   This class really wasn't that bad. He can be a little all over the place and hard to follow at times although he is very enthusiastic about teaching chem. But doing the OWL hw and taking notes from the textbook is how you can do well in the class. He makes "reviews" for each test that if you go through you can get a guaranteed A/B on the test. 
                
                   I do no recommend this professor. Seemed more interested in discussing his hobbies than teaching chemistry. 
                
                   He's really not that bad. During lecture, it's kind of hard to follow. Don't expect to learn the content during class, just take note of the things that he focuses on and teach yourself at home. His tests are not bad.
                
                   Doesn't really help that much. Shows you how to do the problem but its not always precise. Learn mostly through the owls 
                
                   Not a very good teacher at all. Bounces around from one thing to another and goes WAY to fast to take any notes. You literally have to teach yourself everything. His test are fair though. Do the practice problems in the book to study for exams because they're what he bases his exams off of. That's what I did and faired well on tests. 
                
                   You could get all answers right yet end up with a failing grade.  You must give a DETAILED explaination of WHY and HOW you know your answer and if he doesn't think it is a sufficient description; he will not give you credit for the question.   Does not curve tests, likes to make a A a very spectacular occurrence. He will teach you chemistry well. 
                
                   I am very pleased with Dr. Utley. While I do find myself looking at my watch near the end of lectures, I pin that more on the coursework rather than his speaking ability. He makes Chem more bearable with subtle humor and his clear passion for teaching. My grade isn't fantastic right now, but he accounts for difficulties with a dropped test score.
                
                   This guy isn't THAT bad, relax. He's really smart, he just gets off track every once in a while. Youre at a university, they cant teach 400 students chemistry lessons perfectly in an hour. Its a lecture, so go get the book and READ the chapter, No I don't have a good grade and that's because of the PRE-LAB quizzes. Beware those. Just read the book.
                
                   This review is based on his material for the lab section. The TA as with all chemistries were horrible and impossible to understand. They DO NOT care about you whatsoever. The grading is extremely difficult. The only good thing was the final was not so bad if you extensively review study blue before it. That app will save your grade in Utley Lab.
                
                   Decent professor. He is very energetic but that causes him to be very all over the place in class. His tests are not that hard and he provides prep lists of what to focus on for each test. The textbook is a must since thats what he uses as a guide for his lectures and tests. Also there is a fair amount of online homework but overall not too bad.
                
                   Not recommended.
                
                   His tests are pretty easy if you read the book and do his review prior to the test. The book is a must though. He really cares about his students and how they are doing and never tries to trick you on tests. I really liked him, although he isn't the best teacher ever...
                
                   Nice guy, not-so-great prof. Flew through powerpoints, lectures were confusing and had little to do with the material on the test, and I went to A+, SI, and studied like crazy. Didn't make that much of a difference. :(
                
                   First three tests relatively easy. Last test and final very hard. Very hard to pass the last test and final even after studying. Lecture is hard to understand and he goes super fast.
                
                   he is a very sweet man who really is enthusiastic when teaching but i would not take him again. He never teaches what is on his tests. I went to A+ and that is the only way i ended up with a B in the class. He assigns lots of homework and tests are only 15 questions so there is no room for mistakes. avoid if possible
                
                   He loves chemistry but is horrible at teaching it. If you take this class you are going to have to teach yourself pretty much everything. You get a lot of homework and only about 15% of it is on this test. Don't take this guy.
                
                   Don't take this guy. He's nice, but a horrible teacher. You definitely have to teach yourself in this class. His attendance is mandatory, but during class you can't even take notes because he talks too fast. He gives out test reviews, but maybe only like 5 things on the test are from the review.
                
                   she nice and amazing
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She's very helpful, explains things well. She also gives handouts for the chapters. tests are alot like her lecture and  hmwk she assigns from the book. Go to class, she will gladly answer questions. She cares if you understand. She gives handout for final. Go to her reviews. Dont cram for test!!!!!
                
                   Impossible to understand. He would just read the power points and not draw any mechanisms out. Worst Organic prof in terms of helpfulness and ability to understand him. I do not recommend to anyone.
                
                   His accent is his weakness .u just cant understand it. thats all i can say
                
                   He's super hard to understand, but he's really a very sweet man! His tests come from questions in the solutions manual of the ebook (or the actual book). Do those and the owls and you'll be good! Go to A+ too, that really helps. I rarely go to class and will probably finish with a B. Good luck!
                
                   Proffesor Sun is extremely difficult to understand and his tests are crazy hard. Supposedly easier than Pennington though. OWLs are a must. He gives reviews the class day before exams but they arent helpful. Get a season pass at A+ tutoring as soon as you register, don't wait for it to get hard. Best of luck <3
                
                   What a useless class and instructor! Save you time and don't take Soriaga!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is an awesome professor! He is sooo helpful and makes sure that we learn the material. He gives alot of extra review sessions(extremely helpful),tests are difficult but the material is always well covered, lectures are extremely informative, and his accent is soo cute. I would definately recommend him!
                
                   He is a bright character, and does his best to keep students interested.  He also presents everything very well and gives students many chances to understand topics.
                
                   Dr. Santander is a great professor for ochem. He will teach you if you let him. Ochem is a very tough subject in general, but he wants you to do well and will help you when you need it. Do everything you can to keep up to date in this class because you can fall behind really easily, and almost everything builds on top of itself.
                
                   Very helpful teacher and in general the lectures are useful. Unfortunately his tests are very hard and this was probably the hardest course I have taken. Would definatley recommend going to all SI Sessions.
                
                   Dr. Santandar is a great teacher. Go to his office hours. He is super helpful and learns the names of his students. His sample tests are extremely similar to his tests. I recommend reading, going to class for clarification, then attending office hours for OWLS help. He gives you tons of extra practice and a packet with all your mechanisms.
                
                   Dr. Santander is one of the best profs I had. Coming into ochem, I wasn't strong in general chemistry. I went to him at the beginning of the semester and he took time to explain topics from gen chem to me. He is very accessible as he has tons of office hours. His tests are very fair & his practice tests are a good representation of the actual test
                
                   He's super sweet and helpful. Office hours everyday are amazing!! Lectures are from the book, but he will draw stuff on the blackboard and explain things, which is helpful.  
                
                   Professor Santander is a great professor and just a great guy. His lectures weren't always the most helpful, but he is very knowledgeable and, with work, you can succeed in his class. Gives very helpful handouts for reactions and puts in a ton of work for his students. Practice exams are almost identical to exams given. Overall an excellent prof!
                
                   At the beginning of the semester, he told us he was from chill, and he wasn't kidding. This guy is the chillest prof I've ever had, like so chill. I don't know where "chill" means, but he's even gonna give some of us chocolate from chill.
                
                   Ochem is hard, but his lectures are very informative and clear. Make it easy on yourself and go to class and review sessions because he is really good at explaining things and he will also help you in office hours. Awesome teacher.
                
                   One of the worst professors I have taken. He made me very upset when I did go to talk to him and never helped or answered questions clearly. He doesn't care whether or not you learn or even pass the class and his accent is hard to understand. If you can get ANY other professor- do!
                
                   As I've heard from other students, he is a much better o chem 1 prof, but for o chem 2 he seems very scatterbrained. He definitely knows what he's talking about but doesn't seem to be able to stick to one topic at a time. He goes through the material very quickly and offers help one on one, but every time i left feeling more discouraged. 
                
                   Naturally O-Chem is not easy.  Santander knows his material and is very helpful.  He wants his students to pass, but if you fail to attend class and fail to study, what would you expect but a poor grade?  Santander is super cute and very enjoyable to pay attention to, which makes it easy to attend classes.  The rest is up to you.
                
                   Read that he was pretty easy, so I took him. He would post practice tests, but the real tests were nothing like them and he likes to post tricky questions on the test...the class average for most of the tests are around a 65. The people i talked to who took him for ochemI and thought he was easy then now think that he is way harder in o chemII.
                
                   After reading some of the reviews I thought he would be a nice guy. If you do not understand general chemistry do not take him. If you are weak in general chemistry he will look down on you and not take the time to try to help you. He will look at you like you are a lost cause. Brush up on gen chem and elctronegativity before entering that class.
                
                   Great prof, really cares about his students. Good sense of humor, very kind & personable. Posted practice tests are almost identical to exams except for actual numbers. Very accessible before/after class, during posted office hours, & for drop-ins outside of ofc hours. Will spend as long as you need explaining a topic. One of my fave profs ever.
                
                   He seems to be one of the nicest organic chemistry professors out there.  If you're looking for a prof who lays out everything in a straightforward manner, choose Santander.  He puts up practice exams similar to the real thing.  He's never too heavy on OWL homework and is highly helpful.
                
                   His tests are very straight forward and he is super nice. He will not try to trick you in any way on the exams.
                
                   The hardest I've ever worked in a class. Such an amazing learning experience packed with all the information that exists on each topic he covers. Expect to put more work in for this class than all other classes.
                
                   He's tough but well worth the time and effort. Very interesting and requires group homework and tests are difficult but doable. He's old and passionate about his work. Great community of the class and entertaining. Attendance not mandatory but there are random quizzes
                
                   The prof is good, but the coursebook is extremely difficult to understand and learn from, and you have to read to book to learn in this class. For this reason, I suggest taking another course.
                
                   Dr. Rosynek is great at clarifying concepts in the textbook that are unclearnot explained well. Groups are assigned for homework and quizzes, which at first I didn't think I'd like, but have turned out to be extremely helpful. Tests are tough, but if you study his past exams, you will do well. Tests are more conceptual rather than calculations. 
                
                   Dr. Rosynek is a great teacher who has organized a thorough and fascinating honors chemistry class. Although the material is interesting, it's difficult to keep up with if you don't listen in lectures, read the book, and understand the homework. A lot of studying is required, so I wouldn't recommend taking this class unless you really enjoy chem.
                
                   This class is tough, so don't think you can slack too much on studying for any of the 3 tests if you want the A. That being said, you will learn SO much more in Rosynek's class than you will anywhere else. He's a one of a kind professor whose dad-like humor and passion for the subject is worth the struggle that is an honors intro chem class.
                
                   While this class is difficult, it is not impossible. Homework is due about every week. Groups are assigned to complete this. Attendance is not mandatory but there are pop quizzes (to be done with group). If you have old tests to study, you will do well!
                
                   Dr. Rosynek is extremely smart. The class is fast pace and can get confusing, but if you study his old exams and you will do well. His lectures are interesting and the groups he puts you in are helpful. On his exams there was always one group question that you and your group members could work on together! Put forth effort and he will notice.
                
                   Taking Dr. Rosynek for Chemistry 101 Honors this year, and I have to say, he's brilliant. Not only is he just a gifted intellectual, but also a fantastic teacher that really teaches students the material. His class isn't easy, but if you study and work hard, while paying attention, you'll get the A. In a way, it's the ideal college class. Love it!
                
                   very confusing class
                
                   Enthusiastic and approachable. Funny.
                
                   Dr. Krish is a no-nonsense ochem prof. This doesn't mean he isn't accommodating, if you go to his office be WILL help you and make sure you know what's going on.  His exams are 100% from his very dense in class lectures.  If you live and breath those you will be successful in his class. If you are a pre-med/dent/vet/etc, he is a great prof to have.
                
                   This is ocher so obviously it's a hard class, but he does make the material more clear and explains things well. He is a great professor and cares about your grade, but you do need to go in to office hours for help. You get what you put into the class. 
                
                   Awesome Professor! Presents everything in a clear-cut, precise way. All of his tests come directly from the lecture and he always does reviews during the class before the test, so you always know what to expect. He moves fast, but writes out notes during class instead of using a powerpoint, forcing you to pay attention. Would absolutely recommend.
                
                   I thought Dr. Krish was an amazing professor. I had heard he was very hard, but if you take notes and study for his tests, you can make an A. I love how he tells you what to study for his tests, it is very helpful!
                
                   Krish isn't that bad of a teacher but his tests are much harder than he says in his reviews. You have to work your butt off and the SI's are just about a MUST. Not much of an accent which is good but he tends to be picky about certain minuscule things.
                
                   Dr. Krish is probably as straightforward as it gets. The day before the exam he literally lists every reaction that you need to know and the mechanisms that you need to know. Then it's up to you to memorize it from there. SI is very helpful. I would strongly reccommend taking Krish. It's a tough class, but at least you know what to expect.
                
                   He's a skin-and-bones, no frills organic prof.  He's very straightforward, but have no illusions.  This is OChem.  If you had the most dazzling prof of all time but didn't work your ass off, you'd still fail.  He has an accent, but it's more british than (I assume) indian.  No problems there.
                
                   This guy is great you should take him
                
                   Dr. North was more than happy to help out all his students. He learned all of our names and really wanted the students to learn the material. His test only consisted of 16 multiple choice that mainly could be practiced from the owl assignments. He held review sessions the Sunday before each exam  and loves to do demos! He is an amazing professor. 
                
                   Dr. North always made class interesting. He would do demos in class almost 2-3 times a week. If you didn't understand something, he would take the time to explain it or encourage you to email him or come to office hours. He grades fair and I would definitely recommend him.
                
                   I loved Professor North! You could tell he was very excited about teaching. He was very helpful if you had questions outside of class. His test were very fair. They were 20 questions multiple choice. I didn't use the text book as much... I just went over example problems and did book work, since his tests were mainly "math" problems.
                
                   He is a great professor, who is excited about what he teaches. He does experiments almost every class period, which make it interesting. CHEM 111 is not supposed to be easy but he makes it as easy as possible and give good curves!
                
                   Take this Prof! He is easy. Tests are easy. And he curves each test at least 3-5 points. If you have like an 86 you will make an A and a high B is very easy. The hw is not that bad. Pretty much look over chapter obj and do the owls (the online h.w) and you will be fine. Once again take this Prof!
                
                   His class is a great one to take! He is very fun and knows his stuff very well. He provides help outside the classroom and will give awesome demos during class as well. Great guy.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   good teacher, always available in his office hours. great for honors.
                
                   Very good teacher. always available.
                
                   He was always in his office and he has study review sessions before each exam. Awesome, highly recommended if you want to take an honors chem class.
                
                   Really great teacher! He was always in his office and he has study review sessions before each exam. Awesome, highly recommended if you want to take an honors chem class.
                
                   He is not very helpful in explaining material when one does not understand. Makes rude comments when one does not understand. Test average for overall class mates at a 50. He does not care to help at all. Replies to emails late. Tutoring helps but he makes his test very hard so this does not help in his particular class. Sorry I took his class.
                
                   Very hard and unfair class. Your test grade never really reflects what you learned but rather wether or not your managed to bypass all of her trickery on the exam. The exam is not straightforward and they are written to confuse you. Also the ales homework system is really tedious and once again shows how persistent you are not acquired knowledge.
                
                   This is not an easy class. Not impossible, but not easy. If you want an A you'll have to do a lot of outside studying. The most helpful thing for doing well on her exams would be to do as many practice problems for each concept as you can stand. Chemistry is a tough subject, but if you're willing to put in the time and energy you'll be fine!
                
                   I would not recommend her if chemistry is something you struggle with. She's a no-nonsense professor and her sarcastic attitude is refreshing but kind of intimidating for freshmen. Her pop quizzes were awful, but they don't really matter in the long run. She lectures at a 3 and tests at a 10 so you def have to study and know your stuff.
                
                   There are much better professors to take for Chem101. If you can avoid her, do so.  Her tests are ridiculously hard and was very unhelpful during office hours.  Her sarcastic attitude gave me the impression I was dumb for not knowing certain answers and such.  She uses clickers every day, so you can't skip. Her homework is very tedious. Test avg60
                
                   This was by far one of my toughest classes and toughest profs. While she is a super sweet lady and has a spunky personality, I do not recommend taking her for this course unless you took AP Chem in High School. It was a constant struggle, her tests are extremely difficult, and the material is very tough. tricks often. DO NOT RECOMMEND.
                
                   A decent professor, but she doesn't prepare you for tests which are most of you grade. She admittedly fills tests with trick questions. Not very helpful, even in office hours. Lots of homework, though it helps more than the lectures. She makes teaching seem just a job she has to do. I understood all the material well & got a B. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND.
                
                   She is an amazing lecturer, and the homework is not bad. Her tests are 10x harder than anything done in class or on the homework. You have to study...a lot.
                
                   McCartney is a wonderful professor when it comes to lecture. She is funny and explains things in a way that is easy to understand. Her mock exams are MUCH easier than her actual exams. DO THE ALEKS HOMEWORK IT WILL HELP YOU MORE THAN YOU THINK ON EXAMS. Also, I recommend prereading from the text, as you should for any and all classes.
                
                   Dr. McCartney is a super tough professor who teaches an already tough subject. Regardless though, if you're anything like me, you will have to devote a lot of time to studying for her exams because they are hard. You will learn a lot in her class, she's helpful when you ask, expect TONS of homework (do it because it helps your grade at the end),
                
                   Tests are tough, all but one the average was around a 60. She does lower the grade scale a little at the end of the semester. If you do all your homework and do well on the pop quizzes and go to class you get a lot of free points. MUST STUDY FOR TESTS! I spent many hours studying for each test and still had a hard time. Tests are not like the mock.
                
                   Her mock exams are not nearly as hard as her actual exams. Attendance mandatory with pop quizzes. I would avoid taking her class, more difficult than necessary.
                
                   The sample problems in class and the mock exams are easy, but then the tests are very tricky and hard. The class average was usually a 65. There's pop quizzes and she makes you do clicker questions for attendance. Doing the homework and outside tutoring is basically mandatory if you want to pass.
                
                   Worst teacher I have ever had. She teaches you the basics in class then tests you over these complicated trick questions and topics never even talked about. Online homework is necessary and you need to do it before the test it is only mildly helpful. She is incredibly rude and unhelpful her mock exams are 10x easier and different then tests.
                
                   I don't like chemistry, so I'm probably bias. But I found this class so tedious. The homework she assigns must be done as you learn. I never did it as we learned, but I wish I would have. She has basic slides with definitions and a few examples in lecture. While these can be helpful, you'll definitely have to do a lot of self-learning. 
                
                   Tests have lots of trick questions, they're awful. She's not fun to listen to, very condescending. There's a curve though. 
                
                   She is honestly one of the worst teachers I have ever had.  Her mock test were nothing like the real test and her power point slides were useless.  I went in multiple times to office hours to ask how to improve in the class and she was mean every time and gave no help.  I ended up Q-dropping and have been much happier since.  
                
                   Tests are a lot harder than any practice tests or problems she gives you.  She is an alright lecturer but a terrible human being.  Don't approach her 1 on 1 cause she is always grumpy and sarcastic.  Don't be fooled by her enthusiasm in class.
                
                   Attendance is not mandatory, but she gives pop quizzes, random attendance checks, and you need to go to pass. Complete the mock exams, but the tests are not identical. I never went to office hours because she didn't seem friendly enough to go. 4.0 & Go tutors well with this class. Be ready for lots of online homework and LOTS of study time.
                
                   Her tests are tough but attending lecture, taking goods notes, and doing ALL of the homework BEFORE the tests help. McCartney presents the material in a very broken down straight forward way. Her class is definitely not easy but you will learn the material. Her final is cumulative but it replaces your lowest test grade. 
                
                   The first test was pretty tough, just because the lecture was basic and the questions were advanced, but it started getting easier after that! Attendance is pretty much required due to pop quizzes but its group work!! Final replaces lowest test grade, and 2 lowest quiz grades are dropped. I was in AP CHEM junior year of high school and got an A.
                
                   Took Mawk for CHEM 102 in the summer so it was very fast paced. He is very good about giving you the materials you need to pass although the actual work content is difficult (very math oriented). He provided practice tests, pictures of all the work he did in class, and even podcasts. Overall a very nice guy and very laid back.
                
                   Rework practice problems to solidify the concepts. He is helpful and approachable. He made a large class feel small and would keep class entertaining. If you work hard and put in the effort, you will get a good grade. I found Dr. Keeney-Kennicuts online old exams great practice for Mawk's exams. Mawk is so far the best prof I have had at A&M. 
                
                   I read the book, payed attention in class, and only took notes outside of class. He knows what he's doing, he's the CHEM department go-to-guy. Do the OWL's and fight for understanding. I cannot say how important that is, actually KNOW why you're supposed to do something (for the math). I only needed a 75 on the final to get an A, that says enough.
                
                   Dr. Mawk was my CHEM 101&102 prof. His lectures have  a lot of pictures and work out problems so PRINT HIS NOTES from ecampus. His tests are short (14-18 m.c. questions) but he puts quizzes on ecampus and a practice test for studying & a majority of the questions are the same or slightly altered from those! He is a VERY fair curver as well!
                
                   I took Mawk coming in with an A from CHEM 101. I am hoping for a B (expecting a C in this class). More than half the class has Q-dropped. Mawk is crazy hard (I haven't missed a class all semester and I have to go to 4.0 to actually learn the material). His lectures are literally just working through problems, so if that's how you learn take Mawk.
                
                   Dr. Mawk is a very cool guy, but he can be moody sometimes. His teaching style is very messy, which made it hard to really understand what was going on in lecture. He's one of those professors that's very smart, but not great at communicating his knowledge. However, his tests are very fair. I recommend going to A+ if you want to be sure you pass.
                
                   He is a very nice guy and very gay. Haha if you go to offfice hours he is very helpful. He is also very hard to understand if you don't pick up on things fast. His test are short and hard. I would not recommend taking him. I would only take him if chemistry is easy for you.
                
                   I personally did not appreciate Mawks humor. Not that it was offensive, just redundant. He moves quickly and expects you to catch on quickly, so come to class after reading what will be covered. He is a nice person, and is entertaining but his style of teaching is somewhat sloppy, which is fine for some people. If you like orderly, don't take him.
                
                   A great Chem 101 professor. If you do your OWLs somewhat early, read the textbook, and attend his sessions, and you should get an A. His 3rd exam and final are difficult and even more difficult, respectively, so be prepared for that.
                
                   Dr. Mawk,either you understand his humor or you don't. I didn't. He was my first really hard class in life. I did make an A, but i did attend class every day. I had a study group,I studied my but off,Went to every SI session. Completed ALL of my owls,Sometimes read the book. (He uses the bold words on the test). He has messy notes a and goes fast.
                
                   He is very helpful when you ask him questions and genuinly cares about wether you learn or not. go to the lectures if you want a decent grade and study a whole big bunch if you want an A. His tests are hard.
                
                   If you want to make an A in Dr. Mawk's class, you gotta start studying very hard from the very beginning. His tests are short, so if you miss one you get a lot of points off. I really don't like the way he lectures, very sloppy; However, he does know his stuff. I recommend him because he is challenging and if you work smartly an A is possible.
                
                   He did not teach. His powerpointa are pointless and dont make sense. His tests were hard. The owls were okay, and usually were fairly short. The quizzes will help you if you do them. Overall I don't recommend him if you are not super great at chemistry. I usually went to A plus and would choose A plus over class.
                
                   His tests were hard, the material was hard. Hated the class he was a nice guy though.
                
                   If you're really bad at chemistry or math than do NOT take this prof. I am a senior supposed to be graduating and made all A's in my other senior level classes, but got an F in his class. He does NOT curve. The powerpoint slides are sort of useless; I read the book, and it was still hard to understand.
                
                   Great prof. Makes lectures interesting and funny, although most of the laughing is at him. Nice guy though.
                
                   His Chem 101 class was ok. Most of the grade comes from tests, online quizzes and online homework. He uses clickers to check for understanding (attendance) and it is less than 1% of your grade (5 points out of 585 points total). I ended with a C. Chem 102 was very hard. Very Math Intensive. Same grading scale; lucky to get a D.
                
                   He is a good prof, he works out all the problems and is very entertaining. His tests are mostly multiple choice and if you study your notes and review his podcast you will do well.
                
                   very entertaining
                
                   If you didn't take his class for CHEM I, then its useless to take the class. I couldnt understand anything he was trying to teach.
                
                   Lectured to us as if we were 5 years old, tested us as if we were associate professors.
                
                   We had a test every other week, which seemed good at 1st, however, having a test every other week made it feel like you never got a break from the class. The tests weren't easy,  he aimed for a 50 avg. He also ended up throwing out a question because they were worded wrong, which really made an impact since they were only 10 questions.
                
                   A lot of his reviews said he was fair and he explained concepts very well. WRONG. I was in his first class that he decided to do a test every two weeks. Not only is taking a test every other week slightly ridiculous, the tests themselves were ridiculous. His ideal average is a 50. Right now I have a 44.5 average and it's considered a B.
                
                   His tests aren't as hard compared to some of the other Chem 107 profs, but he's hard to understand and tends to ramble in lectures.
                
                   He was a very good teacher. He has an light accent but won't really matter at all. He has office hours and if you are in the tough spot, he will be there for you. The test tend to be similar to the review he gives you. Overall, I would highly recommend him.
                
                   Tak is a cool prof and is easy to understand regardless of his accent. He is very helpful if you go to office hours. We had three exams, and the practice exams given are fairly similar. It's not imperative that you read the textbook, but it does help to skim through the required sections before each test.
                
                   Funny guy who cares about his students learning the material. Often pushes back tests and homework assignments when students are behind. He gives a practice exam and answer key which are very similar to the actual exam (unfortunately I didn't figure this out until the last test). It's not an easy subject, but I'd recommend taking him for Chem 107.
                
                   funny professor at times, easy test 
                
                   Easy TA. He's pretty chill and helpful.
                
                   Awesome guy. Fun, fun, fun!!
                
                   I already had taken Chemistry so it was super easy for me, but she has a monotone voice, but she explains the content well, so just load up on coffee.
                
                   Joanna Goodey is phenomenal. She is my favorite professor that I've had so far.  Her lectures are very straight forward. She has great easy to understand explanations, and her grading is very fair. A lot of people me included bombed the last midterm, so our lowest midterm got averaged with our final, if it was better.  Would recommend to everyone.
                
                   She is a good teacher. I wish she would upload the notes she took in class to the web but oh well. The test are pretty easy if you know the material, no curveballs or anything. If you learn the material thoroughly, you should get an A.
                
                   She is an amazing and inspirational professor. I bombed my first test in her class but after talking to her and really putting in the time I did great on my next exam. The lectures are long but she definitely knows what she's talking about. Very friendly and down to Earth. Take this professor!!!
                
                   She is a very good professor, she wants her students to succeed and is very helpful during office hours. Don't procrastinate studying, she gives you all the material that is covered on the test. 
                
                   Her lectures kind of drag and it's hard to stay awake, but she is really clear. There is homework, but if you get stuck and go to office hours she helps a lot. If you get stuck on anything in this class I recommend going to office hours, because if you don't understand one concept it's going to come back and bite you since tests are cumulative.
                
                   She is very easy to understand. Tests are straightforward. If you do the homework and pay attention in class, you will be fine. iClicker quizzes in almost every lecture. There is a lot of homework, but it is very helpful.
                
                   Tests are very hard, but she is a good teacher. Complete overload on assignments.
                
                   She's very helpful and her tests are extremely easy!
                
                   
                
                   Long story short: be way more prepared than the average student. The professor was unhelpful when approached and did not care whether I did well or not, tests were rather difficult, mostly because the test material isn't stated and the professor would not provide what material to study most.
                
                   very cool prof. super easy
                
                   Avoid at all costs. Exams consist of random pages from note packets. There is no way to confirm correctness when filling out the packet. He tells you to use wikipedia. If you get one little arrow slightly wrong on the test, 50% of the credit is lost for the question. Wish I had more characters to describe how horrible this professor is.
                
                   I really enjoyed his class. He taught straight from his notes and did several examples. His tests and quizzes were straight from the packet as well. I actually felt like I learned the mechanisms and there was plenty of help outside of class. He was also one of the nicest profs I've had who actually learned our names. I definitely recommend him.
                
                   Dr. Burgess speaks very clearly in his lectures and the focus of the class is more on mechanisms rather than individual reactions. He does a fantastic job at going through all of the steps of a mechanism and using that knowledge, you can answer pages of questions. His class is based on application rather than memorization.
                
                   I had him in 1997 for Undergraduate Organic 2. He knows his stuff; I liked his class (but then I liked Chemistry). I think what students don't like about him is that his exams will focus on one particular topic, so you better know ALL of the material really well. For example, one exam was entirely on NMR spectra and coupling...
                
                   Do yourself a favor and wait to take whatever class he is taking with someone else.  He is a nice guy though, and is doing a lot of good reserach.
                
                   This class is SO HARD!
                
                   Do NOT take his class! The tests are not related to what he is teaching at all. Moreover he does not know what he is talking about, he brings in books, asks questions and reads the answers while being in class. Otherwise he wouldn't know how to answer.
                
                   Biswas is a TA not a professor yet he is difficult to understand, isn't very helpful and doesn't do much in the lab except walk around and ask you over and over again if you understand it.
                
                   He was a nice guy and generally curved, however his lectures were very boring and it was hard to learn from him. You pretty much had to go to class because he gave pop quizzes that were very hard (avg was in the 30's). His tests were hard but much like the sample test he posted online.
                
                   he is pretty good teacher, tests are a little hard, but doable
                
                   Great Guy! His class was farely difficult but he is always willing to help you. I should have recieved an F and somehow got a C at the end of the year due to how much he curves the class at the end of the year. Also drops some grades. This class will take the majority of your time during the semester
                
                   Passionate about chemistry.  Willing to answer questions during lecture.  Exams are relatively hard.
                
                   He is relatively easy. There will be 13 something pop quizzes throughout the semester, but in the end he will take only 9 highest quizzes. There will be 4 exams, but the lowest one will be dropped and the exam average will be the average of the highest 3. There is some extra credit stuff on OWL to rescue your grade also.
                
                   I love him so much. He is very nice and sweet. I took him in Summer and it was the hard time for me. You should to read the book, do practice and really study because it's CHEMISTRY. His test is not too hard. Sometimes he has a big curve. He would like to work with you in his office. It is very useful since he explain clearer than he did in class. 
                
                   It's a tough class. Always make sure to go to the reviews he gives. They may take time out of your day but they saved my life. He's a good professor, it's just the content that makes it hard.
                
                   I took him for Chem1405 and I love it. He is helpful,  if you don't have the book you can print the power points and take to class. He gives test review two days before the test. lOVe him 
                
                   took chem 1411 during the ****SUMMER***. his lectures were really good and he gives out lecture notes (which is a plus). tons of book homework; its not hard but its very long at times. very good at giving feedback, always available to answer questions, very friendly, cool guy, good class, just material itself is difficult!  
                
                   Good teacher overall. Always willing to help. He is new to teaching so he is learning but he knows his material very well. If you dedicate the time that a chemistry class needs you'll get an A. Do the problems at the end of the chapter helps you understand the material. And ALWAYS go to his review, he will notice your interest. Very nice person. 
                
                   Dr. Yarbrough is a very nice guy. He isn't fond of curves however, if you work hard and ask lots of questions he will curve your tests and your final grade (he curved mine). My only problem with him was that he went a little too fast sometimes and he didn't "dumb it down" enough for me. Other than that he's a great professor.
                
                   he is a nice guy but if an arrow is not perfectly above bc you were anxious and working quickly but the answer is clearly correct you will lose 5pts. overall lectures didn't teach me much, made it to every lecture-still had to teach myself. if  taking his class expect to spend your whole semester studying for ONLY his class, get outside help.
                
                   The 3032013 was hilarious.  Putty made me wish I was dead.  
                
                   O chem is super tough.  His grading is harsh - if your arrow is not in the perfect angle or length you will love points.  His notes are gold - if it's in the notes, you must know it - all of it.  There are only a couple things to know from the books.  If you ask for help, he'll send you to another student or TA.  Get a tutor through WT. 
                
                   Dr Woodyard is tough, but fair. That is a good thing since by being a hard class it weeds out those people who would not do well in professional school. To get through this course make sure you ask your TA's lots of questions, make study guides for each test that summarizes the slides in a condensed form. Make sure you form study groups they help. 
                
                   Dr. Woodyard is the sweetest old man I've ever met, he tries so hard to keep you interested and be funny, is very caring and invested in his students. He gives you every note you ever need printed out and loves to help you. He just understands chemistry on a level that he can't teach it simply. He's great but don't take if you struggle with chem.
                
                   Easiest Class I’ve taken by far... I don’t see why everyone complains... I love Putty! best thing ever!
                
                   This is the hardest class i have taken in my three years of college. His tests get harder every year (I have 2007-2011 tests) and an A was nearly impossible this semester. I am going to Tech to take ochem 2 next semester. I would say to stay away from this class unless you need a GPA hit.
                
                   Just study hard and you will make an A. Dr. Woodyard follows a Bell Curve no matter what, at the end of the semester if you failed, it's because you're an idiot and deserved to fail.
                
                   Worst professor of my life. Woodyard is the reason that my major looses so many amazing prospective professionals. His goal in life is to make yours miserable. If you want to keep a good GPA and also not devote your semester to ONE class only i highly suggest that you go to Tech for the summer and take Organic 1 and 2. Study very very hard.
                
                   The hardest class you will take as an undergraduate. If you think Organic 1 was hard, well Organic 2 is ten times harder. Do not forget anything from Organic 1.There is much more material, but I found it easier than Organic 1 since it just builds on the concepts. Lab tests are kinda of fair unless he throws a curve ball. Know NMR very well.Goodluck
                
                   Great teacher, The class is a definite &quot;weeder&quot; class. Thank god some teachers still believe that a student should understand the material in order to pass the class.  People who are taking organic are the doctors, pharmacists, dentists......etc of the future!  Thanks for everything Dr.Woodyard, your apart of a rare breed.
                
                   Don't expect to get an A if you're female-he prefers males.  Online homework is ridiculous, and the tests and precise grading are hard to get used to.  He does teach well, though, and if you pass, you know your stuff!
                
                   Where can I start he is a good teacher..his test are not bad but he throws in stuff he does not cover..his homework is harder than the actual tests and a waste of time..89.5 is not an A in his class...he has favorites...his final hardly covers the material he covered in class..not hard if you try just study..goodluck you'll need it
                
                   boring, hard tests, designs his own program for online homework which is hard in its self, and does not answer questions clearly
                
                   monotone...have a question&#63; stay after class for an answer.
                
                   Cool guy.  Easy class for a chemistry class, although his tests are a bit more challenging.  I found attendance to be optional as long as I made it to the tests.  Tests are only 20 questions, and multiple choice.  Looking forward to having him again for organic.
                
                   He's a good teacher and willing to help. I can't garentee you'll understand his answers. His test are outrageously hard. Don't take him if you can help it. But you will hit him in Organic Chem 1. So watch out.
                
                   I must admit, his monotone voice has put me to sleep many a times; however, if you ever have any questions he is more than willing to help.  Overall, the class is ****ing hard and the whole 20 dollars for a practice exam is ****.
                
                   Sure the labs are easy but the material in class is so clustered and crammed together makes the exams hard
                
                   understandalbe as a fence post
                
                   Yes, the tests are ridiculously hard but he curves them just as ridiculously. Make sure you read or else anything he says will not make sense. 
                
                   Bad handwriting, lectures did not help with homework, used book to do homework, tests are passable if you understand the homework.
                
                   Lectures are hard to follow, and cannot read his writing. Writes his own homework questions, so good luck trying to find examples or get help online. Questions often don't make sense.  Tests are ridiculously hard. Tough grader on homework. Tells you to infer information, but takes points for not telling him, or not doing it the "way he would". 
                
                   He just graduated from graduate school, and this was his first semester teaching. With that being said, he performed horribly. Test averages are around a 40, but he did offer extra credit and homework is for completion. His tests are ridiculously hard. His homework assignments average around 8 hours to complete.
                
                   He is NOT CLEAR in his lecture, tests are hard and don't know what he is doing
                
                   She was a great teacher, and said funny things a lot, but her class was kind of hard.  The concepts weren't, but she wasn't clear about what would be on tests.
                
                   She goes out of her way to help you understand.  She allows x-tra credit to help you with the grade.  Very funny lady.  I actually enjoyed her class and learned a lot.
                
                   Very enthusiastic. only curves at the end of the classes. deals with &quot;Carrots and sticks&quot; and tries to motivate students with both hard tests but also mercy and exciting material. Very good for upper level classes. Struggles to balance goals of equipping chem majors and passing enough non-majors. if you're struggling, he wants to help. LET HIM KNOW
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is not good at explaining things and very random and unsystematic in his teaching. Keep up with the reading, or you will be very confused. His tests are NOTHING like he says they are going to be, and he never curves them. However, if you show up regularly he curves at the end some.
                
                   Worst professor I've ever had. Had a 65 thought the semester, went to him a month before the final and asked what I could do to make a C. His response "I don't give out extra credit, your lab is an easy 15 points" The average for lab tests is a 50 "I don't see anybody making a 90 or above on the final, I will be seeing you next semester."
                
                   Took him a couple of years ago and didn't realize how well he prepared me for medical school until I took Biochem there. While other students were struggling with metabolism it was a breeze for me. I'm glad to hear he's still teaching it at WT.
                
                   Great prof - you can get a skeleton copy of the notes.  Exams are short answer and he does everything he can to give you partial credit.  Plus you have one week to go over your exam with him to get points back.   The class is tough and you have to earn your grade, but Dr. Flynn gives you lots of opportunities to succeed.  
                
                   Great professor. Really cares about making his courses good. Class is taught at 8 AM which isn't everyone's cup of tea.
                
                   RUDE!!
                
                   Great professor, clear expectations, and very helpful.  Just do the homework and practice problems - and you'll be all set.  
                
                   Very good professor he knows his stuff. The review sessions help out, and if you do the recommended problems in the book you'll be fine.
                
                   Great professor. Willing to work with students and tries to keep material interesting.
                
                   Not very understanding. Very strict with turning things in even though you have a valid excuse. Online hw. High textbook use. Bad handwriting, makes it hard to take notes sometimes. Heard many complaints in my class. Take khan
                
                   Good CHEM 1411 teacher. I appreciate review sessions he gives.
                
                   He is a nice guy and a good teacher, but sometimes he has trouble explaining things well. Homework is difficult to do based on his lecture. I use the science lab. Tests aren't too hard, but there's only 25 ?s. If you get a previous test it will really help. Go to class and take notes!
                
                   Attend class if you want an A or B - his Power Points are not online. He's good about answering questions after class and in e-mail. Tests are fair but have few questions. Would not need the textbook. DO NOT TAKE HIM FOR THE HONORS OR MAJORS LAB. Assignments are difficult and the topics have little research available online. Grades paper harshly.
                
                   Dr. Flynn is the Chemistry professor to take Chemistry with at WT.  He's tough but he's totally fair.  He's available to his students anytime.
                